IMPACT  AND  POLICY  IMPLICATIONS  OF 

SPYWARE  ON  CONSUMERS  AND  BUSINESSES 

S.  HRG.  110–1178 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JUNE  11,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

76–328 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

Page 
1 
2 
1 
2 

12 
13 

16 
18 

29 
31 

3 
4 

23 
24 

35 
36 

49 

52 

55 

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 11, 2008  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Butler,  Arthur  A.,  Attorney,  Ater  Wynne  LLP,  on  behalf  of  Americans  for 
Fair Electronic Commerce Transactions (AFFECT)  ..........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Cerasale, Jerry, Senior Vice President, Government Affairs, Direct Marketing 
...................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Edelman,  Benjamin  G.,  Assistant  Professor,  Business  Administration,  Har-
vard Business School  ...........................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Harrington, Eileen, Deputy Director, Bureau of Consumer Protection, Federal 
...............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Rotenberg,  Marc,  Executive  Director,  Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center 
...................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Weafer,  Vincent,  Vice  President,  Security  Response,  Symantec  Corporation, 
on behalf of the Business Software Alliance (BSA)  ...........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Trade Commission 

Association, Inc. 

(EPIC) 

APPENDIX 

Legal, Policy and Compliance, TRUSTe, to Hon. Mark Pryor 

Letter dated June 24, 2008, from John P. Tomaszewski, Esq., Vice President, 
.........................
Letter  dated  June  25,  2008,  to  Hon.  Mark  Pryor  from  Arthur  A.  Butler, 
Attorney,  Ater  Wynne  LLP;  on  behalf  of  Americans  for  Fair  Electronic 
Commerce Transactions (AFFECT)  ....................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  David  Vitter  to  Eileen 
Harrington  ............................................................................................................

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

IMPACT  AND  POLICY  IMPLICATIONS  OF 

SPYWARE  ON  CONSUMERS  AND  BUSINESSES 

WEDNESDAY,  JUNE  11,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  3:07  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Mark  Pryor,  pre-
siding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Someone out there told me, don’t start being like 
the  airlines,  being  late  on  everything.  So  we  won’t  do  that.  I’m 
sorry that I was a few minutes late, but I got caught in a previous 
meeting. 

I  want  to  thank  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice  Chairman  Stevens 
for holding this hearing to review the efforts by industry, the Fed-
eral  Trade  Commission,  and  Congress,  to  combat  spyware  and  its 
effects  on  consumers.  Specifically,  this  hearing  will  look  at  the  im-
pact  of  spyware  on  computer  performance,  along  with  privacy  and 
security risks associated with this software. 

In particular, the hearing will consider a bill that I filed, S. 1625, 
the  Counter  Spy  Act,  and  that  I  introduced  with  Senator  Bill  Nel-
son  and  Senator  Boxer.  Also,  just  to  let  other  Senators  and  other 
staff  know,  we  thought  we’d  have  this  hearing  and  sit  down  with 
our  bill  and  see  if  we  can  get  some  other  cosponsors  and  help  us 
think  through  some  issues  there.  So  I  want  to  thank  all  the  wit-
nesses today for being part of that process. 

Spyware  is  a  pervasive  problem  that  really  I  believe  demands 
swift  action  by  Congress  to  protect  American  consumers  from  very 
significant  privacy  and  security  risks.  There  are  very  few,  if  any 
that I can determine, legitimate reasons for this practice of having 
spyware  in  the  first  place,  and  there  are  numbers  of  reasons  why 
we should do something to try to stop spyware. 

Basically, I think our bill needs to do two very important things. 
One  is  we  need  a  good  workable  definition  of  spyware.  It’s  hard  to 
define,  but  we  need  to  come  up  with  a  Federal  definition  where 
there’s a standard. 

The second thing is we need to come up with some civil penalties 
in  the  event  that  someone  is  out  there  using  spyware  in  an  unau-
thorized  manner.  We  need  to  have  a  civil  penalty  regime  so  that 
the  FTC  knows  exactly  what  they  need  to  do  and  what  steps  they 
need to take. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

2 

I  guess  the  other  part  that’s  kind  of  implicit  in  both  of  those  is 
that  we  need  to  make  sure  that  whatever  we  pass  is  very  con-
sumer-friendly,  so  consumers  know  that  when  spyware  is  present 
on  their  system  or  asking  to  be  loaded  or  whatever  the  case  may 
be,  that  the  consumers  have  a  chance  to  stop  it  from  being  added 
to their computers in the first place. 

So with that, what I would like to do is ask Senator Vitter if you 

have an opening statement. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I’ll  be  very  brief. 
Thank  you  for  this  hearing.  This  is  an  extremely  important  topic. 
I  agree  with  you  that  it’s  a  really  serious  problem  that  we  should 
move absolutely as quickly as possible to address. I certainly want 
to be part of the discussions and the solution. 

That’s  the  easy  part.  The  tough  part  is  how  we  do  that  effec-
tively.  I  think  the  biggest  challenge  in  so  many  of  these  issues  is 
to come up with legislation that isn’t outpaced or becomes outdated 
by  technology  in  a  month  or  a  year.  So  I  believe  we  should  focus 
on  passing  legislation  against  improper  activity  and  not  be  too 
technologically  specific,  because  I  think  that’s  going  to  end  up  get-
ting  us  in  trouble,  having  unintended  consequences,  or  just  being 
outdated relatively soon. 

So  I’m  very  interested  in  legislation.  Some  of  the  things  I  want 
to  avoid  is  to  enact  things  that  would  be  technology  mandates,  to 
enact  things  that  might  unintentionally  hamper  the  ability  of  the 
FTC  and  law  enforcement  to  adopt  a  technology  and  that  could  be 
interpreted  so  broadly  that  it  would  extend  beyond  unwanted 
spyware to affect all web pages or to affect online transactions that 
folks do want and get some convenience out of. 

So  thank  you  again  for  this  hearing.  I  look  forward  to  hearing 
from  the  witnesses  and  asking  questions  with  the  goal  of  helping 
develop that sort of bipartisan legislation. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Senator Nelson, I’ll call on you for an opening statement if you’d 
like  to  make  one  and  then  ask  you  to  introduce  the  first  witness. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  you  have  to  go  back  to  a  con-

ference committee? 

Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Senator NELSON. So I will await your return. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Senator  NELSON [presiding].  Consumer  Reports  in  a  recent  edi-
tion  had  a  survey  and  of  the  2,000  people  surveyed,  one  in  eleven 
reported a major spyware infection on their computer. These infec-
tions are costly, may well cost over $100 to fix, and the overall cal-
culated impact on the economy is $1.7 billion. That’s a figure that’s 
only going to increase. 

So  that’s  why  we  filed  this  legislation.  We  also  hope  that  the 
Federal Trade Commission and other law enforcement agencies are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

3 

going to take further action to pursue to the maximum extent pos-
sible foreign spyware developers. 

Now,  in  another  arena,  in  the  intelligence  arena,  in  the  defense 
arena, we have a particular concern which is not the subject of the 
discussion  here  today.  But  clearly  that  overlays  the  problem  that 
we’re talking about on consumers today. 

So  we  are  delighted  to  have  Ms.  Eileen  Harrington,  Deputy  Di-
rector  of  the  Bureau  of  Consumer  Protection  at  the  FTC.  So,  Ms. 
Harrington, your presentation, please. Your lengthy statement will 
be  a  part  of  the  record,  so  if  you  would  just  summarize,  and  then 
we’ll get right into the questions. Thank you. 

STATEMENT  OF  EILEEN  HARRINGTON,  DEPUTY  DIRECTOR, 
BUREAU  OF  CONSUMER  PROTECTION,  FEDERAL  TRADE 
COMMISSION 
Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Nelson  and 
Chairman Pryor and Members of the Committee. I am Eileen Har-
rington. 

Spyware  and  other  malware  causes  substantial  harm  to  con-
sumers  and  to  the  Internet  as  a  medium  of  communication  and 
commerce.  Protecting  consumers  from  this  harm  is  a  priority  for 
the Federal Trade Commission and we thank you for giving us the 
opportunity  to  appear  here  today  to  talk  about  the  FTC’s  activity 
in  this  area  and  to  comment  on  S.  1625,  the  Counter  Spy  Act, 
which  was  introduced  by  Senator  Pryor,  Senator  Boxer,  and  Sen-
ator Nelson. 

Since 2004 the FTC has brought 11 spyware-related law enforce-
ment  actions  and,  while  we  certainly  haven’t  solved  the  spyware 
problem,  our  law  enforcement  efforts  have,  we  believe,  had  an  ef-
fect  and  have  reduced  the  prevalence  of  pop-up  ads  generated  by 
nuisance adware. Our spyware law enforcement actions reaffirmed 
three key principles. 

The  first  is  that  a  consumer’s  computer  belongs  to  him  or  her, 
not  to  the  software  distributor,  and  it  must  be  the  consumer’s 
choice whether or not to install software. This principle reflects the 
basic common sense notion that Internet businesses are not free to 
help themselves to the resources of a consumer’s computer. 

The second principle articulated in our enforcement work is that 
buried  disclosures  of  material  information  necessary  to  correct  an 
otherwise  misleading  impression  are  not  sufficient,  just  as  they 
have  never  been  sufficient  in  more  traditional  areas  of  commerce. 
Specifically,  burying  material  information  in  an  End  User  License 
Agreement will not shield a spyware purveyor from Section 5 liabil-
ity. 

The  third  principle  underscored  by  our  work  is  that  if  a  dis-
tributor puts a program on a computer that the consumer does not 
want the consumer should be able to uninstall or disable it. 

As  in  so  many  other  areas,  cooperation  among  law  enforcement 
agencies  is  vital  to  successful  enforcement  in  the  spyware  area. 
Many of the worst abuses connected with spyware are criminal ac-
tivity in nature and we at the FTC coordinate very closely with our 
colleagues  at  the  Department  of  Justice  to  see  to  it  that  these 
criminals  are  prosecuted.  The  FTC  also  coordinates  closely  with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

4 

State  law  enforcement  partners  who  bring  enforcement  actions 
against spyware distributors. 

Now,  in  addition  to  engaging  in  law  enforcement  and  coordi-
nating  with  others  in  the  enforcement  community,  the  FTC  has 
made  consumer  education  a  priority.  In  September  2005,  the  FTC 
formed a partnership with other Federal agencies in the technology 
industry  to  launch  a  multimedia  interactive  consumer  education 
initiative,  OnGuard  Online.  The  OnguardOnline.gov  website  now 
attracts over 350,000 unique visits each month and many organiza-
tions have taken the OnGuard Online materials for their own secu-
rity  training.  The  comprehensive  website  has  general  information 
on  online  safety  as  well  as  sections  with  specific  information  on  a 
range of topics, including spyware. 

Turning to the bill under discussion, S. 1625, we would make two 
points.  First,  although  we  have  successfully  used  Section  5  of  the 
FTC Act to challenge conduct related to spyware distribution under 
Section 5, legislation authorizing the Commission to seek civil pen-
alties  in  spyware  cases  would  provide  a  welcome  addition  to  rem-
edies available to us. Currently under Section 13(b) of the FTC Act 
we have authority to file actions in Federal district court and to ob-
tain  injunctive  and  equitable  monetary  relief  in  the  form  of  con-
sumer redress or disgorgement. In spyware cases, however, restitu-
tion  or  disgorgement  may  be  neither  appropriate  nor  sufficient 
remedies because consumers often have not purchased a product or 
a service from the defendants, the harm to consumers may be very 
difficult  to  quantify,  or  the  defendant’s  profits  may  be  slim  or  dif-
ficult to calculate with certainty. In such cases a civil penalty may 
be a far better remedy and serve as a stronger deterrent. 

Second,  under  general  consumer  protection  principles  and  tradi-
tional  Section  5  jurisprudence,  the  Commission  need  not  show 
knowledge or intent in order to obtain injunctive relief, but several 
sections  of  S.  1625  impose  an  overarching  knowledge  or  intent 
threshold for enforcement that could create a higher and more dif-
ficult  evidentiary  burden  for  the  FTC  in  obtaining  injunctions  in 
civil spyware cases. 

Section  5(m)(1)  of  the  FTC  Act  already  requires  that  the  Com-
mission  prove  knowledge  in  any  civil  penalty  action.  Eliminating 
the  knowledge  or  intent  threshold  from  S.  1625  would  not  change 
the  Commission’s  elevated  burden  regarding  civil  penalties,  but  it 
would maintain the ordinary burden that we have to meet in order 
to obtain injunctive relief. So we would recommend that change. 

I  thank  you  for  focusing  your  attention  on  this  important  issue 
and giving us the opportunity to discuss the Commission’s enforce-
ment record. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Harrington follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EILEEN HARRINGTON, DEPUTY DIRECTOR, 
BUREAU OF CONSUMER PROTECTION, FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION 

I. Introduction 

Chairman  Pryor  and  members  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation,  I  am  Eileen  Harrington,  Deputy  Director  of  the  Bureau  of  Con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

5 

sumer  Protection  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  (‘‘Commission’’  or  ‘‘FTC’’).1 
Spyware  and  other  malware  can  cause  substantial  harm  to  consumers  and  to  the 
Internet  as  a  medium  of  communication  and  commerce.  Protecting  consumers  from 
such harm is a priority for the Commission, and the agency thanks this Committee 
for  the  opportunity  to  describe  what  the  FTC  is  doing  in  this  area  and  to  provide 
input  on  S.  1625,  the  ‘‘Counter  Spy  Act’’  introduced  by  Senators  Pryor,  Boxer,  and 
Nelson. 

This  written  statement  provides  background  on  the  Commission’s  active  program 
to  address  concerns  about  spyware  and  other  malware,  which  includes  law  enforce-
ment  actions  and  consumer  education  efforts.  First,  it  discusses  the  Commission’s 
three key principles related to spyware as illustrated by the eleven spyware-related 
law  enforcement  actions  the  agency  has  initiated  to  date.  Second,  the  statement 
highlights  the  Commission’s  consumer  education  efforts  on  spyware.  Third,  the 
statement offers the Commission’s views on the proposed legislation, S. 1625. 

The  Commission  has  a  broad  mandate  to  prevent  unfair  methods  of  competition 
and  unfair  or  deceptive  acts  or  practices  in  or  affecting  commerce.2 Although  it  is 
often  challenging  to  locate  and  apprehend  the  perpetrators,  the  FTC  has  success-
fully challenged the distribution of spyware that causes injury to consumers online. 
Spyware  and  other  malware  that  is  downloaded  without  authorization  can  cause 
a  range  of  problems  for  computer  users,  from  nuisance  adware  that  delivers  pop- 
up ads, to software that causes sluggish computer performance, to keystroke loggers 
that  capture  sensitive  information.  As  described  below,  the  Commission  has  an  ac-
tive  program  to  address  concerns  about  spyware  and  other  malware,  including  law 
enforcement  and  consumer  education.  Since  2004,  the  Commission  has  initiated 
eleven spyware-related law enforcement actions.3 While the problem of spyware has 
not been solved, our cases have had a significant effect and, based on our investiga-
tive  experience,  we  believe  the  prevalence  of  pop-up  ads  generated  by  nuisance 
adware has been dramatically reduced. 
II. Spyware Law Enforcement 
A. FTC Cases 

The Commission’s spyware law enforcement actions reaffirm three key principles. 
The  first  is  that  a  consumer’s  computer  belongs  to  him  or  her,  not  to  the  software 
distributor, and it must be the consumer’s choice whether or not to install software. 
This  principle  reflects  the  basic  common-sense  notion  that  Internet  businesses  are 
not free to help themselves to the resources of a consumer’s computer. For example, 
in FTC v. Seismic Entertainment Inc.,4 and FTC v. Enternet Media, Inc.,5 the Com-
mission  alleged  that  the  defendants  unfairly  downloaded  spyware  to  users’  com-
puters without the users’ knowledge, in violation of Section 5 of the FTC Act. Stipu-
lated  permanent  injunctions  were  entered  against  the  defendants  in  both  matters, 
and defendants were ordered to disgorge more than $6 million, combined. 

The  second  principle  is  that  buried  disclosures  of  material  information  necessary 
to  correct  an  otherwise  misleading  impression  are  not  sufficient,  just  as  they  have 
never  been  sufficient  in  more  traditional  areas  of  commerce.  Specifically,  burying 
material  information  in  an  End  User  License  Agreement  will  not  shield  a  spyware 
purveyor from Section 5 liability. This principle was illustrated in FTC v. Odysseus 
Marketing,  Inc.6 and  Advertising.com,  Inc.7 In  these  two  cases,  the  Commission’s 
complaint  alleged  (among  other  violations)  that  the  defendants  failed  to  disclose 
adequately that the free software they were offering was bundled with harmful soft-
ware programs. The orders entered in both cases require the defendants to disclose 
properly the effects of software programs that they offer in the future. 

The  third  principle  is  that,  if  a  distributor  puts  a  program  on  a  computer  that 
the  consumer  does  not  want,  the  consumer  should  be  able  to  uninstall  or  disable 

1 The written statement presents the views of the Federal Trade Commission. Oral statements 
and  responses  to  questions  reflect  the  views  of  the  speaker  and  do  not  necessarily  reflect  the 
views of the Commission or any Commissioner. 

2 15 U.S.C. § 45. 
3 Detailed  information  regarding  each  of  these  law  enforcement  actions  is  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/microsites/spyware/lawlenfor.htm. 

4 FTC  v.  Seismic  Entertainment,  Inc.,  No.  04–377–JD,  2004  U.S.  Dist.  LEXIS  22788  (D.N.H. 

Mar. 22, 2006), available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0423142/0423142.shtm. 

5 FTC  v.  Enternet  Media,  Inc.,  CV  05–7777  CAS  (C.D.  Cal.,  Aug.  22,  2006),  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0523135/0523135.shtm. 

6 FTC  v.  Odysseus  Marketing,  Inc.,  No.  05–CV–330  (D.N.H.  Oct.  24,  2006)  (stipulated  perma-

nent injunction), available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0423205/0423205.shtm. 

7 In the Matter of Advertising.com, Inc., FTC Dkt. No. C–4147 (Sept. 12, 2005) (consent order), 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0423196/0423196.shtm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

6 

it.  This  principle  is  underscored  by  cases  against  Zango,  Inc.8 and  DirectRevenue 
LLC.9 These  companies  allegedly  provided  advertising  programs,  or  adware,  that 
monitored  consumers’  Internet  use  and  displayed  frequent,  targeted  pop-up  ads— 
over  6.9  billion  pop-ups  by  Zango  alone.  According  to  the  Commission’s  complaints, 
the  companies  deliberately  made  these  adware  programs  difficult  for  consumers  to 
identify,  locate,  and  remove  from  their  computers,  thus  thwarting  consumer  efforts 
to  end  the  intrusive  pop-ups.  Among  other  relief,  the  consent  orders  require  Zango 
and  DirectRevenue  to  provide  a  readily  identifiable  means  to  uninstall  any  adware 
that  is  installed  in  the  future,  as  well  as  to  disgorge  $3  million  and  $1.5  million, 
respectively. 

Similarly,  in  FTC  v.  Digital  Enterprises,  Inc.,10 the  Commission  alleged  that  the 
defendants  installed  software  onto  consumers’  computers  that  repeatedly  launched 
text  and  video  pop-ups  that  consumers  could  not  close  or  minimize.  These  pop-ups 
demanded payment for access to the defendants’ purported entertainment websites. 
Among  other  relief,  the  September  2007  stipulated  permanent  injunction  requires 
the  defendants  to  provide  a  way  for  consumers  to  remove  the  software,  bars  future 
downloads without consumer consent, and requires the defendants to pay more than 
$500,000 for consumer redress. 

In  addition,  the  agency’s  law  enforcement  efforts  have  alerted  the  Commission  to 
novel  spyware-related  consumer  protection  issues  such  as  the  marketing  of  bogus 
anti-spyware  programs.  For  example,  in  FTC  v.  MaxTheater,  Inc.11 and  FTC  v. 
Trustsoft,  Inc.,12 the  FTC  alleged  that  the  defendants  made  false  claims  to  con-
sumers about the existence of spyware on their machines and then used these false 
claims  to  convince  consumers  to  conduct  free  ‘‘scans’’  of  their  computers.  These 
scans would identify innocuous software as spyware, helping to persuade consumers 
to purchase the defendants’ spyware removal products at a cost of between $30 and 
$40.  Moreover,  the  FTC  alleged,  the  defendants  claimed  their  spyware  removal 
products  could  effectively  uninstall  many  different  types  of  known  spyware  pro-
grams,  but  the  defendants’  products  did  not  perform  as  promised.  In  both  cases, 
courts  entered  stipulated  permanent  injunctions  prohibiting  the  claims  and  requir-
ing the defendants to disgorge a total of nearly $2 million. 
B. Cooperation with Department of Justice and State Law Enforcement 

As  in  so  many  other  areas,  cooperation  among  law  enforcement  agencies  is  vital 
to successful law enforcement in the spyware arena. Many of the worst abuses con-
nected  with  spyware  are  criminal,13 and,  in  appropriate  cases,  the  Commission  co-
ordinates closely with the Department of Justice. For example, in FTC v. ERG Ven-
tures,  LLC,14 the  FTC’s  complaint  alleged  that  the  defendants  secretly  downloaded 
multiple  malevolent  software  programs,  including  spyware,  onto  millions  of  com-
puters without consumers’ consent. The defendants also allegedly tricked consumers 
into  downloading  harmful  software  by  hiding  the  malicious  programs  within  seem-
ingly  innocuous  free  software.  The  U.S.  Attorney’s  Office  for  the  District  of  Colum-
bia launched a parallel criminal investigation, and executed search warrants simul-
taneously with the filing of the FTC’s civil case.15 

The Commission also coordinates with state partners who bring their own law en-
forcement actions against spyware distributors. The FTC has established a Federal- 
state  spyware  law  enforcement  task  force  to  discuss  issues  and  trends  in  spyware 
law  enforcement.  The  task  force  consists  of  representatives  from  agencies  such  as 

8 In the Matter of Zango, Inc. f/k/a 180 Solutions, Inc., FTC Dkt. No. C–4186 (Mar. 7, 2007), 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0523130/index.shtm. 

9 In  the  Matter  of  DirectRevenue  LLC,  FTC  Dkt.  No.  C–4194  (June  26,  2007),  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0523131/index.shtm. 

10 FTC v. Digital Enterprises, Inc. d/b/a Movieland.com, CV06–4923 (C.D. Cal. Sept. 5, 2007), 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0623008/index.shtm. 

11 FTC  v.  MaxTheater,  Inc.,  No.  05–CV–0069  (E.D.  Wa.  Dec.  6,  2005),  available  at 

http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0423213/0423213.shtm. 

12 FTC  v.  Trustsoft,  Inc.,  No.  H–05–1905 

http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0523059/0523059.shtm. 

(S.D.  Tex.  Nov.  30,  2005),  available  at 

13 See, e.g., Department of Justice, Computer Crime & Intellectual Property Section, Computer 

Crime News Releases, available at http://www.usdoj.gov/criminal/cybercrime/ccnews.html. 

14 FTC v. ERG Ventures, LLC, 3:06–CV–00578–LRH–VPC (D. Nev. Oct. 3, 2007), available at 
http://www.ftc.gov/os/caselist/0623192/index.shtm.  Pursuant  to  the  stipulated  order  entered 
by the court in the FTC action, the defendants must disgorge $330,000. A permanent injunction 
also  bars  the  defendants  from  downloading  software  onto  consumers’  computers  without  dis-
closing  its  function  and  obtaining  consumers’  consent  prior  to  installation,  bars  them  from 
downloading  software  that  interferes  with  consumers’  computer  use,  and  bars  false  or  mis-
leading claims. 

15 See FTC News Release, Court Shuts Down Media Motor Spyware Operation (Nov. 13, 2006), 

available at http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2006/11/mediamotor.shtm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

7 

the  Department  of  Justice  and  state  attorneys  general.  Federal  criminal  and  state 
law enforcement actions are a critical complement to the FTC’s law enforcement ac-
tions. 
III. Education 

In  addition  to  engaging  in  law  enforcement,  the  FTC  has  made  consumer  edu-
cation  a  priority.  In  September  2005,  the  Commission  and  a  partnership  of  other 
Federal  agencies  and  the  technology  industry  launched  a  multimedia,  interactive 
consumer  education  initiative,  OnGuard  Online,  along  with  a  Spanish-language 
version,  AlertaenLinea.  The  OnGuardOnline.gov  site  now  attracts  over  350,000 
unique  visits  each  month,  and  many  organizations  have  adapted  the  OnGuard  On-
line  materials  for  their  own  security  training.  The  comprehensive  website  has  gen-
eral  information  on  online  safety,  as  well  as  sections  with  specific  information  on 
a range of topics, including spyware. The spyware module includes up-to-date infor-
mation,  as  well  as  interactive  features  like  quizzes  and  videos.  As  part  of  the 
OnGuard Online initiative, the FTC also has distributed a million copies of the bro-
chure  and  two  million  copies  of  the  bookmark,  ‘‘Stop  Think  Click:  7  Practices  for 
Safer  Computing,’’  with  information  on  spyware  and  other  computer  safety  topics. 
The FTC also has issued a Consumer Alert on spyware, as well as Alerts addressing 
other online security issues such as viruses and peer-to-peer file sharing.16 
IV. Legislative Steps to Address Spyware 

Although the FTC has successfully challenged conduct related to spyware dissemi-
nation  under  Section  5,  legislation  authorizing  the  Commission  to  seek  civil  pen-
alties  in  spyware  cases  could  add  a  potent  remedy  to  those  otherwise  available  to 
the Commission. Currently, under Section 13(b) of the FTC Act, the Commission has 
the  authority  to  file  actions  in  Federal  district  court  and  to  obtain  injunctive  relief 
and  equitable  monetary  relief  in  the  form  of  consumer  redress  or  disgorgement.  It 
has  been  the  agency’s  experience  in  spyware  cases,  however,  that  restitution  or 
disgorgement  may  not  be  appropriate  or  sufficient  remedies  because  consumers 
often have not purchased a product or service from the defendants, the harm to con-
sumers  may  be  difficult  to  quantify,  or  the  defendants’  profits  may  be  slim  or  dif-
ficult to calculate with certainty. In such cases, a civil penalty may be the most ap-
propriate  remedy  and  serve  as  a  strong  deterrent.  Accordingly,  the  Commission  is 
pleased  that  S.  1625  provides  the  Commission  this  valuable  law  enforcement  tool. 
Last  June,  FTC  staff  provided  this  Committee  with  technical  comments  to  S. 
1625.  Of  the  various  suggestions  respectfully  made  by  staff,  one  important  aspect 
of the bill relating to both injunctive relief and civil penalties stands out. Under gen-
eral  consumer  protection  principles  and  traditional  Section  5  jurisprudence,  the 
Commission  need  not  show  knowledge  or  intent  in  order  to  obtain  injunctive  relief: 
that is, for stopping the violative conduct itself. But, several sections of S. 1625 im-
pose an overarching knowledge or intent threshold for enforcement that could create 
an  additional—and  often  very  challenging—evidentiary  burden  for  the  FTC  in  ob-
taining  injunctions  in  civil  cases.  Moreover,  Section  5(m)(1)  of  the  FTC  Act  already 
requires the Commission to prove knowledge in any action where civil penalties are 
sought.  Eliminating  the  knowledge  or  intent  threshold  from  the  bill  would  not 
change the Commission’s elevated burden regarding civil penalties, while maintain-
ing  the  ordinary  burden  for  obtaining  injunctive  relief.17 The  agency  looks  forward 
to  working  with  the  Committee  regarding  the  knowledge  and  intent  aspects  of  the 
legislation,  as  well  as  any  of  the  other  important  considerations  raised  by  staff’s 
technical comments. 
V. Conclusion 

The  FTC  will  continue  its  aggressive  law  enforcement  and  innovative  consumer 
education  programs  in  the  spyware  arena.  The  FTC  thanks  this  Committee  for  fo-
cusing  attention  on  this  important  issue,  and  for  the  opportunity  to  discuss  the 
Commission’s law enforcement program. 

16 See. e.g., P2P File-Sharing: Evaluate the Risks (Feb. 2008), available at http://www.ftc.gov/ 
bcp/edu/pubs/consumer/alerts/alt128.shtm;  Botnets  and  Hackers  and  Spam  (Oh,  My!)  (June 
2007),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/edu/pubs/consumer/alerts/alt132.shtm,  Spyware 
(July 2005), available at http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/conline/pubs/alerts/spywarealrt.shtm:, Detect, 
Protect, Dis-infect: Consumers Online Face Wide Choices in Security Products (Sept. 2004), avail-
able  at  http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/conline/pubs/alerts/idsalrt.shtm; 
see  generally  http:// 
www.ftc.gov/bcp/menus/consumer/tech/privacy.shtm. 

17 Indeed,  removing  the  knowledge  or  intent  requirements  from  S.  1625  would  be  consistent, 
for  example,  with  the  approach  in  the  CAN–SPAM  Act.  See  15  U.S.C.  § 7706(e)  (granting  the 
FTC  authority  to  seek  cease-and-desist  orders  and  injunctive  relief  without  alleging  or  proving 
knowledge). Spam raises similar enforcement issues to spyware regarding quantifying consumer 
injury and defendants’ profits. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

8 

Senator NELSON. Senator Vitter? 
Senator VITTER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Thank  you  very  much  for  your  testimony.  In  October  2005,  then 
Chairman Majoras had a discussion with Senator Allen about these 
issues and I believe Senator Allen asked if new notice and consent 
requirements would help combat spyware. The then Chair testified 
that  she  didn’t  think  that  it  would  do  so  because  studies  showed 
the more consumers are bombarded with disclosure and consent re-
quirements  the  more  they  don’t  read  them  and  sort  of  let  them 
pass by and ignore them. What’s your reaction to that question? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  I  think  probably  our  view  has  not  changed, 
but,  more  importantly,  I  think  the  nature  of  the  spyware  problem 
has  shifted  some,  from  the  sort  of  pervasive  pop-up  and  nuisance 
ads  that  adware  brought  us,  to  far  more  malicious  and  malevolent 
consequences from spyware. 

I  think  that  it’s  very  unlikely  that  criminals  using  spyware  to 
take  over  consumers’  computers  and  cause  them  to  do  bad  things 
would  comply  with  notice  requirements.  These  are  criminals  and 
their stock in trade is to sneak around. 

Senator  VITTER.  OK.  What  do  you  think  our  general  approach 
should  be  in  terms  of  how  technology  specific  we  have  to  be  or  to 
what extent we can avoid that? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Well,  we  certainly  know  from  what  is  really  a 
very  brief  period  of  time  during  which  the  Internet  has  operated 
as  a  principal  method  of  commerce  that  the  technology  shifts  very 
quickly. To the extent that the Congress chooses to legislate in this 
area,  I  recommend  staying  away  from  specific  technology  and  fa-
voring broad principles like those that are found in Section 5 of the 
FTC Act, which as an enforcement tool has proven over the decades 
to be a marvelously flexible and resilient statute. The FTC Act was 
adopted in the earlier part of the 20th century and it has stood us 
very well. It is the statute that we have used to stop spyware pur-
veyors in 11 enforcement actions. That kind of flexibility in a stat-
ute  is  very  helpful  when  the  technology  changes  virtually  over-
night. 

Senator  VITTER.  OK,  that’s  all  I  have  right  now,  Mr.  Chairman. 
Senator  NELSON.  Ms.  Harrington,  you  note  that  one  of  the  Com-
mission’s  spyware  enforcement  principles  is  a  consumer  should  be 
able  to  uninstall  or  disable  unwanted  spyware.  In  the  Zango  and 
DirectRevenue consent orders, this principle was interpreted requir-
ing  those  parties  to  provide  a  readily  identifiable  means  to 
uninstall. How is that readily identifiable means identified? How is 
it defined? 

Ms. HARRINGTON. The order sets the standard. The test is wheth-
er  a  reasonable  consumer  having  the  experience  of  having  that 
software  loaded  onto  his  or  her  computer  can  readily  see  how  it  is 
that it can be uninstalled. It’s really a reasonable consumer stand-
ard that’s incorporated in those orders. 

Senator NELSON. So it’s not a case by case analysis? 
Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Well,  do  you  mean  for  purposes  of  complying 

with that order, Senator, or across the board? 

Senator NELSON. Of defining it. 
Ms. HARRINGTON. Well, we would always look case by case to see 
whether—but  employing  the  reasonable  consumer  standard.  That 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

9 

is  how  the  Commission  proceeds  also  in  using  Section  5  as  an  en-
forcement  tool  and  it  is  how  the  courts  have  interpreted  Section  5 
and ordered relief. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  you  need  to  include  an  operating  system 

toolbar? 

Ms. HARRINGTON. Do you need to? 
Senator NELSON. Does the readily identifiable means need to in-

clude an operating system toolbar? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  I’m  going  to  turn  to  one  of  our  lawyers  who’s 

right behind me who worked on that case. 

Senator NELSON. Does the—— 
Ms. HARRINGTON. I don’t want to give a wrong answer. 
Senator NELSON. OK, come on up. 
Ms.  HARRINGTON.  It  doesn’t  necessarily  require  a  toolbar,  Sen-
ator,  but  we  would  generally  think  that  the  consumer  would  look 
to  the  add-remove  function  to  find  and  remove  the  software.  Or 
there could be a link that the consumer could use to get to the add- 
remove. 

Senator NELSON. And if it’s another kind of spyware, there would 

be another kind of toolbar to remove? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Any  software  that  would  be  loaded  onto  the 
consumer’s  computer  would  need  to  be  easily  found  and  removed. 
I  think  generally  we  would  expect  that  it  would  be  very  apparent 
when the add-remove function is chosen. But a link would work as 
well. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  you  think  some  clear  rules  or  definitions 
might  be  helpful  to  consumers  so  that  they  would  know  where  to 
look for this uninstall tool? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  I  think  that  generally,  that  the  standard  that 
requires  that  it  be  readily  apparent  and  useable  would  be  a  better 
standard  in  a  situation  where  the  technology  and  format  are 
changing  frequently.  So  I  would  be  concerned  about  tying  by  rule 
to  a  particular  technique  for  removal.  I  think  that  the  better  ap-
proach  would  be  to  require  that  it  be  readily  apparent  and  acces-
sible to consumers, and we would assume that over time what that 
means  would  change;  in  very  specific  terms  what  it  means  would 
change with the technology. 

Senator  NELSON.  What  if  the  spyware  is  a  keystroke  logger  and 
it’s  capturing  all  of  the  keystrokes  that  the  computer  user  uses, 
such as it is trying to get passwords or personal information? 

Ms. HARRINGTON. Well, that’s criminal. 
Senator NELSON. It is. But what about a toolbar to remove that? 

How would you go about that? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  How  would  I  go  about  that?  I  think  that  it 
would  be  unlikely,  frankly,  that  someone  installing  a  keystroke 
logger  would  willingly  put  a  clear  and  apparent  tool  right  before 
the  consumer  to  alert  him  or  her  to  the  fact  that  the  keystroke 
logger  has  been  loaded  on  and  to  allow  them  to  remove  it.  The 
whole purpose of that kind of software is to surreptitiously steal in-
formation from consumers. 

Senator  NELSON.  So  how  does  the  consumer  clean  his  computer 

of that spyware? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  It  may  be  that  the  consumer’s  security  pro-
gram  that  presumably  includes  a  scan  function  that  can  be  regu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

10 

larly run, will identify that program. Typically, when you run those 
kinds  of  scans  you  get  a  box  with  a  report  that  tells  you  what  you 
have and it’s really easy to remove. 

If the software can’t be detected by those kinds of programs, and 
the really bad stuff that we’re talking about oftentimes flies under 
that  radar,  the  consumer  may  not  be  able  to  discern  its  presence 
on  his  or  her  computer  until  something  really  bad  happens,  and 
then the consumer has to backtrack to try to figure out how his or 
her  information  fell  into  the  hands  of  bad  guys.  It  may  be  very 
tough  for  consumers  to  know  that  they  have  that  kind  of  software 
on their computer. 

Senator  NELSON.  What  percentage  of  the  spyware  do  you  think 

currently originates outside of the United States? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  We  don’t  have  a  way  of  measuring  that,  but 
we  certainly  know  that  there  are  problems  with  malevolent  soft-
ware  that  shows  up  through  spyware,  through  e-mail  on  people’s 
computers. We know that there are big problems with that kind of 
material  originating  outside  of  the  United  States.  But  we  don’t 
have  a  way  of  measuring  it,  just  as  we  don’t  have  a  way  of  meas-
uring  the  totality  of  spyware  that’s  loaded  onto  consumers’  com-
puters,  whether  it  comes  from  within  or  outside  of  the  United 
States. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  we  need  to  give  the  FTC  new  tools  to  go 

after these foreign bad actors? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Well,  we’re  very  grateful  to  the  Congress  for 
having  given  us  some  new  tools  a  couple  of  years  ago  in  the  U.S. 
SAFE  WEB  Act.  We  have  enhanced  authority  now  to  share  infor-
mation  with  foreign  counterparts  and  obtain  information  from 
them, and we are using it in nonpublic investigations all the time, 
and we’re most appreciative of the Congress for giving us those au-
thorities. 

Senator NELSON. So we have enough? We don’t need more? 
Ms. HARRINGTON. We’re in good shape now, thank you. 
Senator  NELSON.  How  well  do  commercial  anti-spyware  applica-

tions work? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Well,  some  work  well  and  some  don’t  work 
well.  Some  anti-spyware  applications  are  actually  hawked  by 
crooks  to  put  more  spyware  on  your  computer  instead  of  taking  it 
off.  So  there’s  quite  a  spectrum  of  performance.  But  the  reputable 
software  companies  that  are  selling  anti-virus  and  security  soft-
ware  sell  reasonably  good  products,  and 
if  you  visit  our 
OnGuardOnline  website,  we  recommend  that  everyone  make  sure 
to  have  good  security  programs  on  their  computer  and  run  them 
regularly. 

Senator NELSON. Well, the government and the commercial anti- 
spyware providers seem to have been talking for quite a while now 
and  still  the  message  isn’t  getting  out  to  a  lot  of  consumers.  How 
can we do it better? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Well,  first  of  all,  we  would  urge  everyone, 
every  government  and  commercial  entity  that  cares  about  this  to 
have  a  link  to  OnGuardOnline  right  on  their  website.  It  is  a  very 
consumer-friendly  site  with  really  easy-to-understand  and  use  di-
rections  about  how  to  protect  your  computer  from  a  host  of  bad 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

11 

things  and  how  to  prevent  oneself  from  experiencing  bad  experi-
ences in the online environment. 

So  help  us  get  the  message  out.  I  think  that  to  the  extent  that 
the  manufacturers  of  anti-spyware  software  and  other  security 
products  can  continue  to  make  these  products  very  user  friendly, 
anything  that  we  can  do  to  encourage  movement  in  that  direction 
is a good thing. These products have become far more user friendly. 
I  know,  I  can  actually  use  them  reasonably  well  myself  now  and 
I used to find them to be quite difficult. 

Senator  NELSON.  Yesterday’s  New  York  Times  carried  a  story 
about  the  Attorney  General  of  New  York  going  after  child  pornog-
raphy  and  it  seemed  like  an  inventive  way  that  he  was  doing  it, 
by  going  and  holding  the  people  who  convey  the  information  ac-
countable.  First  of  all,  would  you  comment  on  what  it  is,  explain 
it, and then tell us what you think about it? 

Ms.  HARRINGTON.  Well,  I’ve  read  the  same  press  accounts  that 
you have. That’s what I know about this. But my understanding is 
that the agreement that the attorney general of New York entered 
into  is  with  three  large  ISPs,  and  the  ISPs  have  agreed  to  block 
their  users  from  accessing  sites  that  have  been  identified  as  con-
taining child pornography material. 

This is an agreement or a settlement. I don’t know what the un-
derlying legal theory is. I noted in some of the press accounts that 
I  read  this  morning  that  some  are  raising  First  Amendment  con-
cerns. Beyond that, I really don’t know more about that agreement. 
Stepping  back,  there  are  certainly  times  when  companies  that 
operate  portals  or  control  the  means  of  access  have  been  able  to 
step  up  and  use  that  influence  and  leverage  to  shut  off  or  discour-
age  bad  activity.  That’s  not  a  new  approach.  I  really  don’t  know 
about  this  particular  settlement  and  how  effective  it  will  be  at 
eliminating the problem that they’re seeking to address. 

We  are  very  pleased  to  have  Mr.  Arthur  Butler,  who  is  with  the 
Americans  for  Fair  Electronic  Commerce  Transactions;  Mr.  Jerry 
Cerasale,  who  is  Senior  Vice  President,  Government  Affairs  with 
Direct  Marketing  Association;  Mr.  Marc  Rotenberg,  Executive  Di-
rector,  the  Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center;  Dr.  Benjamin 
Edelman,  who  is  at  the  Harvard  Business  School;  Mr.  Vincent 
‘‘WAE-fer’’—— 

Mr. WEAFER. ‘‘WEE-fer.’’ 
Senator  NELSON.  ‘‘WEE-fer,’’  who  is  Vice  President,  in  Security 
Response with the Symantec Corporation, and on behalf also of the 
Business Software Alliance. 

We’ll  start  in  the  order  that  you  are  listed  on  the  agenda.  Mr. 
Butler.  And  what  I  want  you  to  do,  I  don’t  want  you  to  sit  here 
and read a statement to us. We’re going to take your printed state-
ments.  That’s  going  to  be  a  part  of  the  record.  So  what  we  want 
you to do is talk to us. 

Senator NELSON. Senator Vitter? 
Senator VITTER. I’m fine. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator NELSON. Well, Ms. Harrington, thank you very much for 

Ms. HARRINGTON. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator  NELSON.  We  would  ask  the  second  panel  to  please  come 

your testimony. 

up. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

So, Mr. Butler. 

12 

STATEMENT OF ARTHUR A. BUTLER, ATTORNEY, ATER WYNNE 
LLP,  ON  BEHALF  OF  AMERICANS  FOR  FAIR  ELECTRONIC 
COMMERCE TRANSACTIONS (AFFECT) 
Mr.  BUTLER.  Good  afternoon.  My  name  is  Art  Butler.  I’m  an  at-
torney  with  the  Ater  Wynne  law  firm  in  Seattle,  Washington,  and 
I’m  here  today  on  behalf  of  AFFECT,  which  is  a  diverse  group  of 
nonprofits  and  commercial  entities,  including  consumer  groups, 
who are firmly committed to promoting the growth of fair and com-
petitive transactions in software and other digital products. 

I  first  wanted  to  commend  Senator  Pryor  and  the  other  cospon-
sors of the Counter Spy Act for introducing what we think is a very 
important piece of legislation and for holding this hearing, because 
you, like the members of AFFECT, are very worried about the pri-
vacy and security issues that are presented by spyware. 

As  our  long  statement  indicates,  we  firmly  support  S.  1625  be-
cause  we  believe  that  spyware  is  an  insidious  problem  that  des-
perately needs to be addressed. The sad fact is that every computer 
in  the  United  States  is  under  attack  from  numerous  sources  that 
are  trying  to  surreptitiously  install  or  prevent  the  removal  of 
spyware programs that will allow the spies to intercept or gain par-
tial control of the user’s interaction with his or her computer with-
out obtaining the user’s informed consent. 

Often  the  spyware  that  is  introduced  contains  what  are  called 
back  doors,  which  essentially  are  ways  in  which  a  computer  spy 
can  get  around  normal  authentication  and  remotely  gain  control 
over the computer and avoid detection. Once someone gains control 
of  your  computer,  they  can  install  all  kinds  of  different  devices  to 
compromise  the  security  of  that  computer.  In  fact,  it  is  generally 
agreed that spyware represents a significant threat to the security 
of any user’s computer system and data. 

While  we  support  the  bill,  we  do  have  a  major  concern  with  the 
exceptions section of the bill. That is due to, one, the fact that real-
ly we don’t see that any of the exceptions that are listed there are 
really  needed  or  justified.  But  we’re  particularly  concerned  about 
the exception in subsection 6(a)(10) which would permit a provider 
to monitor or interact with a computer in order to prevent or detect 
the unauthorized use of software, fraudulent or other illegal activi-
ties. 

We think this language is overly broad and it would in effect per-
mit  or  protect  activities  which  could  be  harmful  to  computer  users 
in  direct  opposition  to  the  objective  of  the  bill.  It  would  in  effect 
allow  a  software  vendor  to  freely  monitor  everything  that’s  on  a 
user’s  computer,  essentially  setting  them  up  as  an  ad  hoc  police 
force to conduct warrantless searches and seizures. We don’t think 
that  private  entities  should  be  allowed  to  engage  in  law  enforce-
ment activities. 

The  most  troubling  fact  to  us  is  the  fact  that  that  language 
would permit a software vendor to unilaterally remotely disable the 
software on a computer or to disable a network connection or serv-
ice. Often the question about whether use is unlawful or fraudulent 
or illegal is subject to legitimate dispute, and it really merits some 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

13 

judicial consideration before you allow a software vendor to unilat-
erally employ such a drastic remedy as remote disablement. 

This is a major concern to our members and we have in our long 
statement  given  examples  of  cases  where  you  have  seen  software 
purveyors  unilaterally  decide  that  they  didn’t  get  an  adequate  li-
cense  payment  and  then  just  go  in  and  shut  down  someone’s  com-
puter,  causing  some  very  significant  negative  consequences  for  the 
computer user. 

But  it’s  also  important  to  realize  that  a  lot  of  these  disputes 
never make it to the courthouse steps because the balance of harm 
that’s caused by someone unilaterally shutting down your computer 
is  so  far  against  the  computer  user  that  the  mere  threat  that  that 
can  be  used  will  cause  the  user  to  essentially  cave  in  to  the  de-
mands of a vendor. 

We  are  particularly  concerned  about  what  happens  when  some-
one  remotely  accesses  a  computer  and  attempts  to  disable  it  be-
cause  that  act  alone  can  cause  damage  to  other  files  owned  by  the 
computer user and the simple fact is that the existence of that code 
that  allows  remote  access  and  disablement  can  present  a  vulner-
ability  that  will  allow  security  breaches  by  hackers,  by  saboteurs, 
by industrial and foreign government spies, and by terrorists. 

This  is  a  major  issue  for  our  group,  for  both  the  smaller  users 
and  the  large  users.  We  have  a  suggestion  for  an  amendment  to 
subsection  6(a)(10)  that  would  essentially  limit  that  to  the  detec-
tion or prevention of fraudulent or other illegal activities as prohib-
ited by the Act, which we think is the appropriate limitation there. 

Thank you. I’d be glad to respond to any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Butler follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ARTHUR A. BUTLER, ATTORNEY, ATER WYNNE LLP, ON 

BEHALF OF AMERICANS FOR FAIR ELECTRONIC COMMERCE TRANSACTIONS (AFFECT) 
Good  afternoon.  My  name  is  Art  Butler.  I  am  an  attorney  with  Ater  Wynne  LLP 
in  Seattle,  Washington.  I  am  very  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  on  behalf  of 
AFFECT  (Americans  for  Fair  Electronic  Commerce  Transactions)  at  this  important 
hearing  on  the  impact  and  policy  implications  of  spyware  on  consumers  and  busi-
nesses. AFFECT is a national coalition of consumer representatives, retail and man-
ufacturing  businesses,  insurance  institutions,  financial  institutions,  technology  pro-
fessionals,  librarians,  and  public  interest  organizations  committed  to  promoting  the 
growth of fair and competitive commerce in software and other digital products. 

We  commend  you,  Chairman  Pryor,  and  all  the  sponsors  of  the  Counter  Spy  Act 
(S.  1625),  for  introducing  this  important  bill  because,  like  you,  our  members  are 
very worried about the privacy and security risks associated with spyware. AFFECT 
strongly supports S. 1625. However, we are very concerned with the exception provi-
sion and believe it is overly broad. In our view, it could in fact be construed to pro-
tect wrongful acts that can result in great harm to computer users. We believe this 
section is in direct opposition to the laudable purpose of the bill and hope very much 
that you will consider the amendment which we propose today. 
AFFECT’s Concerns with Spyware 

AFFECT  has  been  active  in  representing  the  interests  of  software  consumers  in 
the  debates  about  the  appropriate  language  to  be  included  in  anti-spyware  legisla-
tion  in  several  states  and  has  advocated  strenuously  that  these  legislatures  not 
adopt exception language so broad that it swamps the prohibitions that are designed 
to protect computer users. Since AFFECT began actively educating legislators in the 
states of the potential for damage, creation of security vulnerabilities, and for inva-
sion  of  privacy  and  unauthorized  search  and  seizure  in  relation  to  consumers’  com-
puters  due  to  the  exception  language  in  question—the  language  has  failed  to  pass 
in even one state legislature. 

The  sad  fact  is  that  every  computer  in  the  United  States  is  under  attack  from 
numerous  sources  trying  to  surreptitiously  install  or  prevent  removal  of  spyware 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

14 

that will allow the spy to intercept or take partial control over the user’s interaction 
with the computer, without the user’s informed consent. 

While  the  term  ‘‘spyware’’  suggests  software  that  secretly  monitors  the  user’s  be-
havior, the functions of spyware extend well beyond simple monitoring. Spyware can 
collect various types of personal information, interfere with the user’s control of the 
computer, change computer settings, result in slow connection speeds, loss of Inter-
net or other programs, disable software firewalls and anti-virus software, and/or re-
duce browser security settings, thus opening the system to further infections. It can 
enable identity theft and fraud. 

Often  spyware  will  contain  a  ‘‘backdoor,’’  which  is  a  method  of  bypassing  normal 
authentication,  securing  remote  access  to  a  computer  and  obtaining  access  to 
plaintext,  while  attempting  to  remain  undetected.  Someone  who  has  gained  access 
to  your  computer  can  install  many  types  of  devices  to  compromise  security,  includ-
ing  operating  system  modifications,  software  worms,  key  loggers,  and  covert  listen-
ing devices. Some backdoors, such as the Sony/BMG rootkit 1 distributed silently on 
millions of music CDs through late 2005, are intended as digital rights management 
(DRM)  measures  and,  in  that  case,  as  data  gathering  agents,  since  both  surrep-
titious programs they installed routinely contacted central servers. The copy preven-
tion  software  Sony/BMG  included  on  its  CDs  was  automatically  installed  on  Win-
dows desktop computers when customers tried to play the CDs. The software inter-
feres  with  the  normal  way  in  which  the  Microsoft  Windows  operating  system  plays 
CDs, opening security holes that allow viruses to break in, and causing other prob-
lems.2 

It is generally agreed that spyware represents a significant threat to the security 
of any computer owner’s data. Even for large enterprises spyware represents a seri-
ous threat to the integrity of intellectual property, confidential data, and personally 
identifiable information of employees and customers. Accordingly, AFFECT supports 
legislative  efforts,  like  S.  1625,  that  are  designed  to  curb  the  use  of  harmful 
spyware.3 
AFFECT’s Concerns with the Exception Provision of S. 1625 

AFFECT  has  concerns  with  the  exception  section  of  S.  1625,  section  6,  which  is 
overly broad and could be construed to protect wrongful acts that can result in great 
harm to computer users in direct opposition to the purpose of the bill. 

We  are  particularly  concerned  about  Subsection  6(a)(10),  which  would  permit  a 
provider  to  monitor  or  interact  with  an  individual’s  computer,  or  Internet  or  other 
network  connection  or  service  for  the  ‘‘detection  or  prevention  of  the  unauthorized 
use  of  software  fraudulent  or  other  illegal  activities.’’  The  reference  to  ‘‘unauthor-
ized’’  is  too  vague  and  raises  a  number  of  questions.  ‘‘Authorized’’  by  whom?  What 
is the process for authenticating the identity of the person using the software? And 
what  are  the  standards  for  determining  whether  that  person  has  the  authority  to 
perform a certain operation, and who decides? 

This  language  would  allow  a  software  vendor  to  surreptitiously  download  code 
onto  a  user’s  computer  and  freely  violate  the  user’s  privacy  by  monitoring  every-
thing  on  his  or  her  computer,  as  long  as  it  did  so  under  the  guise  of  looking  for 
unauthorized use, fraudulent, or illegal activities. It would allow the provider to set 
itself  up  as  an  ad  hoc  police  force  to  conduct  warrantless  searches  and  to  act  as 
judge and jury to conduct unilateral seizures. Private entities do not and should not 
have the right to conduct law enforcement activities. 

More  troubling  is  the  fact  that  the  language  of  Subsection  6(a)(10)  would  effec-
tively  allow  a  software  provider  to  unilaterally  decide  to  remotely  shut  down  the 
user’s computer or Internet or other network connection or service. But whether the 
use of a particular software is ‘‘unauthorized,’’ ‘‘fraudulent,’’ or ‘‘illegal’’ is often sub-
ject  to  legitimate  dispute  and  merits  some  judicial  consideration  before  a  provider 
is allowed to unilaterally employ a drastic remedy like remote disablement. 

Permitting  unilateral  remote  disablement  is  simply  bad  public  policy.  Unilateral 
remote  disablement  can  cause  great  harm  to  any  computer  owner  who  depends  on 

1 A ‘‘rootkit’’ is a program designed to take fundamental control of a computer system, without 
authorization by the system’s owners and legitimate managers. Typically, rootkits act to obscure 
their presence on the system through subversion or evasion of standard operating system secu-
rity mechanisms. Often, they are also Trojans as well, fooling users into believing they are safe 
to run on their systems. 

2 As  a  result,  a  number  of  parties  filed  lawsuits  against  Sony/BMG;  the  company  eventually 

recalled all the affected CDs. 

3 S. 1625 (Pryor), introduced in June 2007, would protect against the unauthorized installation 
of software that is used to take control of a computer in order to cause damage, collect personal 
information without consent, or otherwise enable identity theft. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

15 

access  to  and  use  of  that  computer,  connection  or  service.  For  example,  the  shut-
down of an owner’s system can cause great harm to: 

• a teacher using a computer to prepare for classroom lectures; 
• an insurer depending on a computer system to pay claims; 
• a manufacturer trying to deliver its products to meet contractual commitments; 
• the public’s access to online library materials. 
That  harm  can  be  significantly  larger  than  the  harm  to  the  software  vendor  (not 

or 

getting a license fee). 

Even  large  enterprises  are  concerned  about  the  threat  of  remote  disablement. 
There have been a number of reported cases where software developers unilaterally 
determined that licensees didn’t make appropriate payments and simply shut down 
the  computer  programs.4 The  most  widely  reported  was  a  case  where  a  small  soft-
ware  developer,  Logisticon,  Inc.,  installed  malware  within  warehouse-management 
software delivered to cosmetic company, Revlon Inc. When the parties got into a dis-
pute  over  whether  the  software  had  bugs  and  didn’t  perform  as  promised,  Revlon 
withheld payment. Logisticon then tapped into Revlon’s computers and disabled the 
program, which paralyzed Revlon’s shipping operations for 3 days. Losses to Revlon 
were about $20 million. Revlon sued, charging extortion. Logisticon claimed this was 
simply ‘‘electronic repossession.’’ The case was settled out of court. 

Clearly many disputes never make it to the courthouse steps because the balance 
of harm to be done via exercise of remote disablement is so overwhelmingly against 
the  computer  user  that  the  mere  threat  of  its  use  puts  the  user  in  an  unfair  posi-
tion, and it must cave to the demands of the software vendor. The ability to unilat-
erally disable a user’s computer or critical software running on it provides the soft-
ware,  network,  or  service  provider  undue  leverage  in  a  dispute  even  if  the  remedy 
is  not  exercised.  Faced  with  a  crippling  and  possibly  even  fatal  disruption  of  its 
business,  a  user  could  be  intimidated  into  relinquishing  its  rights  and  setting  up 
precedents for its further disadvantage. This is because the risk to the provider that 
it  will  be  held  to  have  acted  improperly  is  indefinite  and  its  potential  liability  se-
verely  limited.  Even  if  a  provider  wrongly  exercises  the  remote  disablement,  it  is 
unlikely the injured user will be able to recover money damages for the harm result-
ing  from  this  action,  including  losses  to  the  user’s  business  attributable  to  the 
wrongful  act,  because  providers  routinely  disclaim  consequential  damages  in  their 
licensee agreements; in fact, they routinely limit recoverable damages to the amount 
of the license fee. 

4 Other  cases  include  the  following:  In  1998  in  Franks  &  Sons,  Inc.  v.  Information  Solutions, 
Inc.,  the  software  developer  installed  a  ‘‘drop-dead’’  code  in  the  program.  When  the  customer 
failed to pay as promised, the developer activated the drop-dead code, which prevented the cus-
tomer from accessing the software as well as any stored information. The customer didn’t know 
about the drop-dead code, and the court found that it would be unconscionable to allow the soft-
ware developer to hold the licensee ransom as it did. 

In  1991,  in  American  Computer  Trust  Leasing  v.  Jack  Farrell  Implement  Co.,  763  F.  Supp. 
1473  (D.  Minn.  1991),  the  software  developer,  in  a  dispute  over  payment  for  the  software,  re-
motely deactivated the software. The contract provided that the developer, who owned the soft-
ware,  could  remotely  access  the  licensee’s  computer  in  order  to  service  the  software  and  that, 
if  the  licensee  defaulted,  the  agreement  was  canceled.  When  the  licensee  didn’t  pay,  the  devel-
oper  told  the  licensee  that  it  was  going  to  deactivate  the  program,  which  it  promptly  did.  The 
licensee  sued  for  damages,  but  the  court  ruled  in  favor  of  the  developer  on  the  grounds  that 
the  deactivation  was  ‘‘merely  an  exercise  of  [the  developer’s]  rights  under  the  software  license 
agreement . . .’’ 

There  have  been  many  other  cases  involving  software  developers  either  putting  drop-dead 
code  in  their  products  or  remotely  disabling  code  when  they  thought  the  other  party  was  in 
breach.  For  example,  a  Dallas  medical  device  software  developer  was  sued  in  1989  for  using  a 
phone  line  to  deactivate  software  that  compiled  patients’  lab  results.  The  case  was  settled.  In 
1990,  during  a  dispute  about  the  performance  of  a  piece  of  code,  the  developer  simply  logged 
in  and  removed  the  code,  until  the  licensee  released  the  developer  from  any  liability.  The  li-
censee  claimed  that  the  general  release  was  signed  under  duress,  since  he  was  being  held  eco-
nomic  hostage.  Art  Stone  Theatrical  Corp.  v.  Technical  Programming  &  Support  Systems,  Inc., 
549 N.Y.S. 2d 789 (App. Div. 1990). 

In  1991,  in  Clayton  X-Ray  Co.  v.  Professional  Systems  Corp.,  812  S.W.2d  565  (Mo.  Ct.  App. 
1991),  a  company  involved  in  a  payment  dispute  logged  into  the  licensee’s  computer  and  dis-
abled  the  software.  When  the  licensee  tried  to  log  on  to  see  its  files,  all  it  saw  was  a  copy  of 
the unpaid bill. A jury awarded the licensee damages. 

In  Werner,  Zaroff,  Slotnick,  Stern  &  Askenazy  v.  Lewis,  588  N.Y.S.  2d  960  (Civ.  Ct.  1992), 
a law firm contracted with a company to develop billing and insurance software. When the soft-
ware reached a certain number bills, and when the developer decided it had not been paid suffi-
ciently,  it  shut  down  the  software  disabling  access  to  the  law  firm’s  files.  The  law  firm  sued 
successfully. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

16 

Moreover,  in  reaching  into  an  individual’s  computer  remotely  to  disable  software 
residing on that computer, the software provider may not only violate privacy rights, 
but  also  damage  the  computer  owner’s  other  files.  And  the  monitoring  and  remote 
disablement  of  software  on  an  owner’s  computer  by  an  outsider  may  compromise 
private  information  of  employees,  confidential  and  proprietary  information  of  the 
owner,  and,  in  some  cases,  national  security  information.  As  a  result,  it  is  possible 
that they could put an owner into breach of obligations it has under other laws (e.g., 
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act). 

The  simple  fact  is  that  the  code  used  to  remotely  enter  a  computer  and  disable 
the  software  or  the  network  connection  makes  the  computer  vulnerable  to  security 
breaches by hackers, saboteurs, industrial and foreign governmental spies, and ter-
rorists.  The  consequences  of  a  successful  intentional  or  even  accidental  misuse  of  a 
computer system range from loss of confidentiality to loss of system integrity, which 
may lead to more serious concerns, like data theft or loss, or, in the case of a busi-
ness,  significant  financial  losses  or  worse.  When  there  is  an  opportunity  to  nego-
tiate,  many  enterprises,  including  governmental  entities,  will  insist  that  their  soft-
ware  license  agreements  contain  a  warranty  prohibiting  any  ‘‘self-help  code’’  or 
other  software  routing  designed  to  disable  a  computer  program  automatically  or 
that is under the positive control of a person other than the licensee of the software. 
Unfortunately, with mass market licenses individual consumers and businesses are 
not able to negotiate for a ‘‘no self-help code’’ warranty. 
Proposed Amendment 

S. 1625 is a commendable piece of legislation that addresses a real problem faced 
by  computer  users  throughout  this  country.  AFFECT  supports  it,  but  strongly  rec-
ommends that the exception provision of S. 1625 should only limit liability for inter-
action with a network, service, or computer that is undertaken to detect or prevent 
fraudulent  or  other  illegal  activities  as  prohibited  by  the  act  itself.  Therefore,  AF-
FECT proposes that Section 6(a)(10) of the bill be amended as follows: 

‘‘(10)  detection  or  prevention  of  the unauthorized use of software fraudulent  or 
other illegal activities as prohibited by this Act.’’ 

Conclusion 

On behalf of AFFECT, thank you very much for the opportunity to appear before 
you  today  and  for  your  consideration  of  our  concerns.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer 
any questions you might have. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Cerasale? 

STATEMENT  OF  JERRY  CERASALE,  SENIOR  VICE  PRESIDENT, 
GOVERNMENT  AFFAIRS,  DIRECT  MARKETING  ASSOCIATION, 
INC. 
Mr.  CERASALE.  Senator  Nelson,  Members  of  the  Committee: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  here  today.  I’m  Jerry 
Cerasale,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Government  Affairs  for  the  Di-
rect  Marketing  Association,  an  association  of  3,600  marketers  who 
present offers and services to consumers directly. 

It  is  important  in  that  kind  of  a  business  model  that  we  have 
trust, that the consumer trust the marketer, but the consumer also 
has  to  trust  the  channel  of  marketing,  and  that’s  what  we’re  here 
talking  about  today.  In  the  past  3  years  we  have  moved  quite  a 
ways  in  trying  to  prevent  spyware,  and  I  think  we  have  to  praise 
quite  a  few  groups.  One  is  Congress  for  constantly  looking  at  this 
and putting pressure on us. 

The second are the software vendors, one of whom is sitting here 
on  the  table  with  me,  for  producing  excellent  products  to  go  after 
and being able to remove objectionable software. 

Third,  organizations,  TRUSTe  and  even  DMA,  for  setting  up 
guidelines  and  establishing  education.  DMA  has  worked  with, 
partnered  with,  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  OnGuard  On-
line. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

17 

Finally  but  not  least,  law  enforcement,  looking  at  the  Federal 
Trade Commission, the Department of Justice, and the State Attor-
neys General, pursuing bad actors. 

DMA  supports  removal  of  objectionable  software  and  the  means 
to  do  that.  Our  guidelines  that  we  produce  that  all  our  members 
have  to  follow—and  it’s  attached  to  my  larger  testimony—bans  or 
prohibits  putting  on  software  that  takes  over  someone’s  computer. 
It  requires  for  installing  other  software  that  there  be  notes,  that 
there  be  an  easy  means  to  uninstall  or  disable  the  program,  that 
there  be  contact  information  concerning  the  organization  that  put 
the  software  on  the  computer  so  that  the  consumer  can  contact 
them,  and  that  there  be  an  easy,  identifiable  link  to  the  privacy 
policy of that organization. 

So  we  have  taken  these  steps  and  will  continue  to  look  at  it 
more,  and  we  had  to  write  these  guidelines  in  looking  at  it  being 
not  technologically,  not  focused  on  one  technology,  but  to  try  and 
be  broader  so  that  as  we  get  changes  tomorrow  and  the  next  day, 
that we do not have to go back and rewrite our guidelines. 

We have a few specific comments concerning S. 1625. As we look 
at  Section  4(b)(2)  of  the  bill,  we  think  also  that  this  can  be  read 
very broadly and can in fact be used to cover legitimate advertising 
practices, those same practices that have helped create Cyber Mon-
day  to  be  a  larger  shopping  day  than  Black  Friday  or  support  the 
great amount of free content on the Internet. 

We  think,  our  suggestion  is,  in  the  previous  Congress  Section 
4(b)(2) had an additional provision in it dealing with bad acts, and 
we think that that is a suggestion we have for Section 4(b)(2). 

As  we  look  on,  and  I  have  to  comment  on  Section  6(a)(10),  one 
of the things to be careful about when looking at legislation or reg-
ulation in anti-fraud arenas is that we have, many of our members 
have anti-fraud provisions and those are out there to protect users 
from  identity  theft,  and  they  have  been  fairly  successful  and  suc-
cessful  in  stopping  credit  card  fraud  and  so  forth.  So  as  you  look 
at things looking at the exceptions in 6(a)(10) is to make sure that 
we don’t have unintended consequences there. 

Finally, 6(a)(8) and (9), giving limited liability. Our concern here 
is that it will remove accountability for software vendors. We think 
that  this  is  very  important,  to  have  this  accountability.  Objection-
able software is a subjective term and you can disagree on it. Many 
DMA  members  have  written  to  and  contacted  software  vendors 
whose software has removed their particular software on someone’s 
computer  and  they  have  been  able  to  work  it  out,  very,  very  rep-
utable  organizations.  Sometimes  there  has  not  been  a  resolution, 
and  where  do  you  go  if  there’s  not  a  resolution  on  this  subjective 
term? 

Finally, there are some software vendors who don’t answer phone 
calls,  who  don’t  respond  to  letters,  and  who  don’t  respond  to  e- 
mails.  If  you  have  this  kind  of  argument  on  a  subjective  issue, 
where  do  you  go?  So  we’re  very  concerned  that  you,  Congress  not 
eliminate accountability. 
Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Cerasale follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

18 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JERRY CERASALE, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

GOVERNMENT AFFAIRS, DIRECT MARKETING ASSOCIATION, INC. 

I. Introduction and Summary 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  am  Jerry 
Cerasale, Senior Vice President for Government Affairs of the Direct Marketing As-
sociation,  and  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  the  Committee  as 
it examines S. 1625 and the spyware issue in general. 

The Direct Marketing Association, Inc. (‘‘DMA’’) (www.the-dma.org) is the leading 
global  trade  association  of  businesses  and  nonprofit  organizations  using  and  sup-
porting  multichannel  direct  marketing  tools  and  techniques.  DMA  advocates  indus-
try  standards  for  responsible  marketing,  promotes  relevance  as  the  key  to  reaching 
consumers with desirable offers, and provides cutting-edge research, education, and 
networking  opportunities  to  improve  results  throughout  the  end-to-end  direct  mar-
keting process. Founded in 1917, DMA today represents more than 3,600 companies 
from dozens of vertical industries in the U.S. and 50 other nations, including a ma-
jority of the Fortune 100 companies, as well as nonprofit organizations. Included are 
catalogers, financial services, book and magazine publishers, retail stores, industrial 
manufacturers,  Internet-based  businesses,  and  a  host  of  other  segments,  as  well  as 
the service industries that support them. 

DMA and our members appreciate the Committee’s outreach to the business com-
munity on this important issue. I note at the outset that this is a complicated issue. 
In  part  due  to  congressional  attention,  over  the  past  several  years  there  have  been 
significant  developments  that  have  fundamentally  improved  the  consumer  experi-
ence  as  it  relates  to  spyware.  Where  once,  just  three  short  years  ago,  invasive  pop- 
up ads, drive-by downloads, and software that hijacked computers were on the rise, 
consumers  in  2008  experience  fewer  such  unwanted  practices.  Industry  guidelines 
for  legitimate  software  downloads,  strong  self-regulation,  major  technological  im-
provements, and Federal Trade Commission (‘‘FTC’’) and state Attorney General en-
forcement  have  all  contributed  to  the  current,  significantly  improved  environment 
where the prevalence of spyware has been vastly reduced. While DMA supports the 
Committee’s interest in combating spyware, given that the marketplace has evolved 
considerably since previous Congresses considered this issue, we believe that a stat-
utory  approach  that  would  cover  a  broad  range  of  software  downloads  and  online 
marketing  might  not  achieve  the  desired  purpose  of  limiting  spyware,  but  might 
have the unintended effect of interfering with important e-commerce and marketing 
functionalities. 

Internet growth over the past 10 years has been nothing short of remarkable, and 
this growth is fueled by the seamlessness of interactions of content, software, adver-
tising, and other services. The dramatic rise of the Internet is evident in the dollar 
amounts  consumers  spend  purchasing  products  through  Internet  sales.  Last  year, 
on  Cyber  Monday,  the  busiest  Internet  shopping  day  of  the  year,  shoppers  spent 
more  than  $733  million  online.1 This  represents  an  increase  of  21  percent  from  the 
same  day  the  previous  year  and  is  more  than  the  amount  shoppers  spent  on  Black 
Friday.2 

Additional  statistics  demonstrate  the  staggering  growth  in  e-commerce.  The  U.S. 
Census  Bureau,  which  releases  quarterly  retail  e-commerce  statistics,  recently  re-
ported that estimated retail e-commerce sales for the 1st quarter of 2008 were $33.8 
billion, an increase of 13.6 percent from the 1st quarter of 2007. The Census Bureau 
also  noted  that  1st  quarter  e-commerce  sales  accounted  for  3.4  percent  of  total 
sales.3 

As  these  and  similar  figures  suggest,  the  Internet  revolution  has  had  a  tremen-
dous  impact  on  economic  growth.  The  Internet  has  become  a  preferred  mechanism 
of  commerce  for  many  consumers,  and  a  key  part  of  multi-channel  sales  efforts  for 
businesses. This phenomenon has changed the way products and services reach the 
market,  and  enables  consumers  to  shop  in  an  environment  that  knows  no  restric-
tions on time or place. 

1 Cyber  Monday  is  the  first  Monday  following  Thanksgiving.  In  2007,  Cyber  Monday  fell  on 
November 26. The Friday after Thanksgiving Day is known as Black Friday and is traditionally 
the largest brick and mortar shopping day of the year. 

2 See http://www.comscore.com/press/release.asp?press=1921. 
3 U.S.  Census  Bureau,  Quarterly  Retail  E-commerce  Sales,  1st  Quarter  2008,  May  15,  2008. 

See http://www.census.gov/mrts/www/data/pdf/08Q1.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

19 

II.  Strong  Guidelines,  Technology,  and  Enforcement  Have  Reduced  the 

Need for Legislation 

The combination of strong industry guidelines, anti-spyware technologies, and en-
forcement  of  existing  laws  over  the  past  3  years  has  limited  pernicious  software 
downloads,  reducing  spyware’s  threat  to  the  positive  consumer  experience  online. 
Together, we are winning the battle against such malicious practices. That said, this 
battle  will  be  ongoing.  Today’s  solutions  and  remedies  may  be  obsolete  tomorrow. 
As  technology  continues  to  evolve  rapidly,  so  too  will  the  challenges  posed  by 
spyware and related bad practices. 
A. Industry Guidelines 

DMA  has  long  been  a  leader  in  establishing  comprehensive  self-regulatory  guide-
lines for its members on important issues related to privacy and e-commerce, among 
many  others.  DMA  and  its  member  companies  have  a  major  stake  in  the  success 
of  electronic  commerce  and  Internet  marketing  and  advertising,  and  are  among 
those benefiting from its growth. Our members understand that their success on the 
Internet is dependent on consumers’ confidence in the online medium, and they sup-
port efforts that enrich a user’s experience while fostering consumer trust in online 
channels. Understanding the importance of standards and best practices in building 
consumer  confidence,  DMA,  working  with  its  members,  in  2006  developed  and 
adopted  standards  for  software  downloads  as  part  of  our  Guidelines  for  Ethical 
Business  Practice  (‘‘Guidelines’’),  to  specifically  discourage  illegitimate  software 
download  practices  that  threaten  to  undermine  electronic  commerce  and  Internet 
advertising.4 In our experience, industry guidelines are the most effective way to ad-
dress concerns that arise in the continuously changing technological landscape. Such 
guidelines are flexible and adaptable in a timely manner so as to cover bad practices 
and  not  unintentionally  or  unnecessarily  cover  legitimate  actors.  These  software 
guidelines and an analysis of their requirements are attached. 
B. Current Law Enforcement Efforts 

Technology,  self-regulation,  and  enforcement  of  existing  laws  are  adequately  ad-
dressing  the  problems  caused  by  spyware.  In  the  past  couple  of  years,  law  enforce-
ment  officials  have  been  using  existing  enforcement  tools  to  pursue  sources  of 
spyware.  The  FTC  has  aggressively  pursued  adware  companies  engaging  in  im-
proper  business  practices.  Since  2004,  the  Commission  has  brought  more  than  10 
such  cases  under  its  deceptive  and  unfair  practices  authority.5 In  addition,  the  De-
partment  of  Justice  (‘‘DOJ’’)  is  actively  combating  spyware  under  the  Computer 
Fraud  and  Abuse  Act  and  the  Wiretap  Act,  also  with  more  than  10  cases  to  date.6 
The  states  have  been  an  important  part  of  the  enforcement  efforts  in  this  area  as 
well,  with  state  attorneys  general  using  their  fraud  and  consumer  protection  laws 
to  target  distributors  of  spyware.7 Strong  enforcement  of  existing  laws,  combined 
with industry self-policing and innovative technologies, thus, have drastically slowed 
the spread of spyware and its effects. As these efforts indicate, continued dedication 
of resources to enforcement has proven an effective response to spyware. 
C. Marketplace Technology Has Adapted to Combat Spyware 

The technological tools available to consumers to prevent spyware also have seen 
significant  improvement  in  their  effectiveness.  These  tools  are  highly  sophisticated, 
user  friendly,  and  widely  available,  and  in  many  instances  are  available  at  no  cost 
to  the  consumer.  For  instance,  today’s  anti-spyware  software  is  proactive  in  detect-
ing malware before it can penetrate a consumer’s personal computer, thereby elimi-
nating  frustrations  of  spyware  by  preventing  it  from  ever  being  downloaded.  Con-
sumers  also  have  access  to  new  web  browsers  with  stronger  security  features  and 
better  warning  features.  In  addition,  as  spyware  became  a  problem,  industry  re-

4 Use  of  Software  or  Other  Similar  Technology  Installed  on  a  Computer  or  Similar  Device, 
DMA  Guidelines  for  Ethical  Business  Practice,  at  21  (attached)  (available  at  http://www.the- 
dma.org/guidelines/EthicsGuidelines.pdf). 

5 See,  e.g.,  In  the  Matter  of  DirectRevenue  LLC,  FTC  File  No.  052–3131  (filed  Feb.  16,  2007); 
In  the  Matter  of  Sony  BMG  Music  Entertainment,  FTC  File  No.  062–3019  (filed  Jan.  30,  2007); 
FTC  v.  ERG  Ventures,  LLC,  FTC  File  No.  062–3192  (filed  Nov.  29,  2006);  In  the  Matter  of 
Zango, Inc. f/k/a 180solutions, Inc., FTC File No. 052–3130 (filed Nov. 3, 2006). 

6 CFAA,  18  U.S.C.  § 1030;  Wiretap  Act,  18  U.S.C  § 2511.  See,  e.g.,  U.S.  v.  Jerome  T. 
Heckenkamp,  http://www.usdoj.gov/criminal/cybercrime/heckenkampSent.htm;  U.S.  v.  Chris-
topher Maxwell, http://www.usdoj.gov/criminal/cybercrime/maxwellPlea.htm. 

7 For example, New York attorneys general over the past few years, as well as other attorneys 
general, have been actively pursuing cases against companies for deceptive practices in connec-
tion  with  spyware  and  adware.  See  New  York  Attorney  General  settlement  with  online  adver-
tisers, 
with 
DirectRevenue, http://www.oag.state.ny.us/press/2006/apr/apr04abl06.html. 

http://www.oag.state.ny.us/press/2007/jan/jan29bl07.html; 

settlement 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

20 

sponded  by  installing  anti-spyware  software  onto  personal  computers  before  ship-
ping them to customers. This service provides personal computers with an early vac-
cination against spyware. 
III. Specific Concerns about S. 1625 

I  would  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  discuss  specific  comments  regarding  S. 
1625, which is pending before the Committee. We believe that the significant devel-
opments  described  warrant  reevaluation  of  certain  provisions  of  this  legislation  by 
the  Committee,  which  we  hope  that  the  sponsors  of  this  bill  and  the  members  of 
the Committee will consider. 

DMA  is  concerned  that  Section  4(b)(2)  of  the  bill  could  create  compliance  uncer-
tainty,  which  could,  in  turn,  limit  current  and  future  critical  e-commerce  functions 
designed to make the Internet browsing experience seamless. For this reason, DMA 
believes that Section 4(b)(2) should be tailored to specifically target ‘‘bad practices,’’ 
rather than create the regulation of many legitimate information practices resulting 
from  software.  The  current  language  in  Section  4(b)(2)  could  be  interpreted  to  ex-
tend  well  beyond  regulating  ‘‘surreptitious  surveillance’’  practices.  We  recommend 
that  any  restriction  on  data  collected  and  correlated  with  a  user’s  online  history  be 
narrowed, as this bill did the last time it was considered and approved by this Com-
mittee by adding the language contained in the previous bill. Our suggestion would 
apply  only  if  the  computer  software  was  installed  in  a  manner  designed  to  conceal 
from a computer user the fact that the software was being installed and would per-
form  an  information  collection  function.  This  type  of  approach  would  make  clear 
that the bill targets deceptive acts—which should be the objective of any such legis-
lation—and does not restrain legitimate practices. 

DMA  also  is  concerned  about  Sections  6(a)(8)  and  (9),  the  provisions  that  would 
bestow  limited  liability  on  a  business  that  removes  ‘‘objectionable  content’’  or  soft-
ware used in violation of the Act. While on its face, the authority to remove ‘‘objec-
tionable  content’’  may  appear  reasonable,  the  term  ‘‘objectionable’’  is  not  defined 
and,  as  a  consequence,  section  6(a)(8)  would  allow  any  anti-spyware  entity  to  act 
unilaterally, and without review, to block any material that it defines as ‘‘objection-
able.’’ Under this authority, for example, an anti-spyware tool would be free to iden-
tify and remove anti-fraud software from a computer, with no liability for doing so, 
or  for  fraudulent  activities  that  may  then  be  perpetrated,  or  it  could  use  the  unfet-
tered  discretion  provided  for  in  this  subsection  to  block  a  competitor’s  access  even 
if that competitor has the specific consent of the user. Moreover, it could do so with-
out any notice whatsoever to the user. We are, therefore, concerned that this provi-
sion would grant full immunity to a business that oversteps its power to remove le-
gitimate  content  and  causes  harm  to  another  business  or  the  user.  This  type  of 
broad  immunity  would  have  negative  consequences  for  consumers  by  undermining 
their  personalized  Internet  experience.  For  instance,  what  may  be  ‘‘objectionable 
content’’ to an anti-spyware entity may be a consumer’s valued tool bar or personal-
ized cookie. 

For similar reasons, DMA has concerns about Section 6(a)(9), which would permit 
a  business  to  remove  software  used  in  violation  of  sections  3,  4,  or  5  the  Act.  In 
previous versions of this bill, this type of immunity has been referred to as a ‘‘Good 
Samaritan’’ provision. We are concerned that providing limited liability to providers 
acting  under  ‘‘Good  Samaritan’’  protection  may  also  have  unintended  consequences 
for  consumers  and  businesses.  DMA  supports  a  provider’s  ability  to  remove  or  dis-
able  a  program  employed  to  perpetrate  a  bad  act.  However,  we  are  concerned  that 
a  provision  as  broad  as  Section  6(a)(9)  would  allow  a  provider  to  remove  legitimate 
software  without  consequence.  The  current  framework,  under  which  existing  laws 
are  used  to  hold  anti-spyware  companies  liable  for  removal  of  legitimate  software, 
has served as an important check on overreaching by such providers and should be 
preserved. 

In  addition,  the  policy  goal  underlying  a  ‘‘Good  Samaritan’’  exemption  is  unclear. 
This  type  of  protection  would  limit  liability  for  violations  for  providers  of  anti- 
spyware  software  that  remove  spyware  from  a  computer.  The  operative  provisions 
of  Sections  3,  4,  and  5  impose  liability  for  causing  the  installation  of  software  on 
a  machine,  not  removing  software.  Thus,  it  is  unclear  why  a  provision  limiting  li-
ability for ‘‘removal’’ of software is even necessary. Given the fact that it would limit 
liability  where  none  exists  in  the  first  instance,  DMA  suggests  that  this  provision 
be deleted. 

Finally,  DMA  recommends  that  the  exemption  provided  in  the  definition  of  ‘‘soft-
ware’’  (Section  12(14))  be  modified  to  include  ‘‘cookies  and  any  other  software  that 
performs  a  similar  or  identical  function  or  functions.’’  By  limiting  the  exemption 
solely  to  cookies,  the  bill  is  essentially  regulating  technology  rather  than  conduct. 
As a result, the bill would foreclose the inclusion of new and innovative technologies 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

21 

that  perform  a  similar  or  identical  function  as  a  cookie.  This  type  of  limitation 
would stifle innovation. 
IV. Conclusion 

In  summary,  the  combination  of  advances  in  industry  self-regulation,  enforce-
ment,  and  technology,  coupled  with  concerns  about  interfering  with  legitimate  uses 
of  software  for  marketing  purposes,  necessitates  that  certain  sections  of  S.  1625  be 
revisited.  If  regulation  is  necessary,  and  we  believe  that  it  is  unclear  that  a  need 
for  legislation  remains  in  light  of  recent  technological  innovations,  it  should  be 
drafted  in  manner  that  does  not  undermine  current  efforts  or  upset  consumers’  ex-
pectations regarding the types of available, legitimate online marketing. 

I  thank  you  for  your  time  and  the  opportunity  to  speak  before  your  Committee. 
I look forward to your questions and to working with the Committee on this legisla-
tion. 

Analysis of DMA Guidelines 

ATTACHMENT 1 

The Direct Marketing Association requires member organizations to adhere to its 
Guideline  on  Use  of  Software  or  Other  Similar  Technology  Installed  on  a  Computer 
or Similar Device, which encourages members to provide notice and choice regarding 
software  that  may  be  downloaded  onto  a  consumer’s  personal  computer  or  similar 
devices  (attached).  This  Guideline  clearly  states  that  marketers  should  not  install, 
have installed, or use, software or other similar technology on a computer or similar 
device that initiates deceptive practices or interferes with a user’s expectation of the 
functionality of the computer and its programs. Such practices include software that 
takes control of a computer, modem hijacking, denial of service attacks, and endless 
loop pop-up advertisements. This Guideline also is clear that businesses should not 
deploy  programs  that  deceptively  modify  or  disable  security  or  browser  settings  or 
prevent  the  user’s  efforts  to  disable  or  uninstall  the  software.  DMA’s  Ethics  Policy 
Committee  evaluates  compliance  with  its  guidelines  and  regularly  publishes  sum-
maries of outcomes of matters considered. Penalties can include removal from mem-
bership, referral to the Federal Trade Commission, and public disclosure of concern. 
This  Guideline  also  details  responsible  practices  for  marketers  offering  software 
or  other  similar  technology  that  is  installed  on  a  computer  used  to  further  legiti-
mate  marketing  purposes.  Specifically,  such  programs  must  provide  a  user  with 
clear  and  conspicuous  notice  and  choice  at  the  point  of  joining  a  service  or  before 
the  software  or  other  similar  technology  begins  operating  on  the  user’s  computer, 
including  notice  of  significant  effects  of  having  the  software  or  other  similar  tech-
nology  installed.  Marketers  also  must  give  the  user  an  easy  means  to  uninstall  the 
technology and/or disable all functionality. Finally, marketers should always provide 
an easily accessible link to privacy policies and contact information, as well as clear 
identification of the company making the offer. 

Given  the  rapid  evolution  of  technology,  DMA  believes  that  self-regulation  is  the 
most effective means for setting business standards for legitimate marketing. Guide-
lines like those published by DMA and TRUSTe condemn deceptive practices, strive 
to  protect  consumers,  and  foster  legitimate  Internet  advertising  and  marketing. 
Guidelines are flexible and adaptable to changes in markets, business practices, and 
advances in technology. 

Another issue that DMA has sought to address through self-regulatory best prac-
tices  is  the  role  of  advertisers  in  ensuring  that  their  advertisements  are  being  dis-
seminated responsibly. In some instances, there may be advertisers with good inten-
tions who do not understand where their ads are appearing online. To help address 
some  of  these  issues,  DMA  adopted  best  practices  regarding  online  advertising  net-
works and affiliate marketing.8 These best practices state, among other things, that 
marketers  should  obtain  assurances  that  their  partners  will  comply  with  legal  re-
quirements and DMA’s Guidelines for Ethical Business Practice, undertake due dili-
gence  in  entering  into  these  partnerships,  define  parameters  for  ad  placement,  and 
develop  a  monitoring  system  for  online  advertising  and  affiliate  networks.  These 
should limit the appearance of advertisements related to spyware. 

8 See DMA Best Practices for Online Advertising Networks and Affiliate Marketing (attached) 

(available at http://www.the-dma.org/guidelines/onlineadvertisingandaffiliatenetworkBP.pdf). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

22 

ATTACHMENT 2 

EXCERPT FROM THE DMA GUIDELINES FOR ETHICAL BUSINESS PRACTICE 

Use  of  Software  or  Other  Similar  Technology  Installed  on  a  Computer  or 

Similar Device 

Article #40 

Marketers  should  not  install,  have  installed,  or  use,  software  or  other  similar 
technology  on  a  computer  or  similar  device  that  initiates  deceptive  practices  or 
interferes with a user’s expectation of the functionality of the computer and its pro-
grams. Such practices include, but are not limited to, software or other similar tech-
nology that: 

denial of service attacks, or endless loop pop-up advertisements) 

• Takes control of a computer (e.g., relaying spam and viruses, modem hijacking, 
• Deceptively modifies or deceptively disables security or browser settings or 
• Prevents  the  user’s  efforts  to  disable  or  uninstall  the  software  or  other  similar 

technology 

Anyone that offers software or other similar technology that is installed on a com-

puter or similar device for marketing purposes should: 

• Give  the  computer  user  clear  and  conspicuous  notice  and  choice  at  the  point  of 
joining a service or before the software or other similar technology begins oper-
ating  on  the  user’s  computer,  including  notice  of  significant  effects*  of  having 
the software or other similar technology installed 
• Give  the  user  an  easy  means  to  uninstall  the  software  or  other  similar  tech-
• Give an easily accessible link to your privacy policy and 
• Give clear identification of the software or other similar technology’s name and 

nology and/or disable all functionality 

company information, and the ability for the user to contact that company 

* Determination of whether there are significant effects includes, for example: 

» Whether pop-up advertisements appear that are unexpected by the consumer 
» Whether there are changes to the computer’s home page or tool bar 
» Whether there are any changes to settings in security software, such as a fire-
wall,  to  permit  the  software  to  communicate  with  the  marketer  or  the  com-
pany deploying the software, or 

» Whether there are any other operational results that would inhibit the user’s 

expected functionality 

Cookies or other passive means of data collection, including web beacons, are not 
governed  by  this  Guideline.  Article  #37  provides  guidance  regarding  cookies  and 
other passive means of data collection. 

ATTACHMENT 3 

June 2006 

DMA’s  Internet  Marketing  Advisory  Board  (IMAB)  Best  Practices  for 

Online Advertising Networks and Affiliate Marketing 

Online marketers using advertising and affiliate networks should: 

1. Obtain assurances that the online advertising and affiliate network is in full 
compliance  with  state  law,  Federal  law,  and  the  DMA  Guidelines  for  Ethical 
Business Practice. 
2. Perform due diligence on prospective network advertising partners and make 
sure  you  are  working  with  reputable  firms.  Additionally  (if  possible),  obtain  a 
sample  list  of  current  advertising  clients.  Due  diligence  should  also  include  ei-
ther: (1) asking for a full disclosure of eligible sites, or (2) a review of processes 
to  limit  access  to  unwanted  sites  or  channels.  When  partnering  with  an  aggre-
gate  site  online  advertising  and  affiliate  networks  should  provide  the  marketer 
with a sampling of sites that are in their network. Due diligence should encom-
pass the entire process from the marketer to the end consumer. 
3. Always utilize a written contract/agreement. This will provide you the great-
est  possible  control  over  your  ad  placement.  This  will  also  be  the  mechanism 
by which you devise and enforce formulas and/or guidelines for where and how 
online ads will be placed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

23 

4.  Include  specific  parameters  that  must  be  employed  to  determine  placement 
of your online ads in written agreements. Altering of offer by an advertising or 
affiliate  network  is  prohibited.  If  laws,  guidelines  or  set  standards  are  violated 
your  contract  with  the  violating  advertising  or  affiliate  network  should  be  ter-
minated. 
5.  Develop  a  system  to  routinely  monitor  your  ad  placements  as  well  as  your 
contract with any online advertising or affiliate network. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Rotenberg? 

STATEMENT OF MARC ROTENBERG, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ELECTRONIC PRIVACY INFORMATION CENTER (EPIC) 

Mr.  ROTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator,  and  thank  you 
for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  The  Electronic  Privacy  Infor-
mation Center has a long-term interest in the ability of the Federal 
Trade  Commission  to  police  business  practices  that  impact  Amer-
ican  consumers.  We  have  worked  with  the  FTC  now  for  almost  a 
decade to try to ensure that the Section 5 authority is used to pro-
tect  consumers  because  if  consumers  do  not  have  trust  and  con-
fidence  in  the  electronic  marketplace  clearly  it’s  not  good  for  con-
sumers or businesses. 

Of course, the concerns about spyware are very real and the costs 
are  very  real.  For  consumers  it’s  not  only  their  privacy  and  per-
sonal  information,  it’s  also  the  risk  that  financial  details  of  bank 
account information, checking account information will be disclosed 
to others. It’s the risk of identity thieves. It’s the risk frankly sim-
ply  of  the  hassle  of  having  to  monitor  your  personal  computer  to 
make  sure  that  there’s  no  improper  surveillance  taking  place  on 
your private activity. 

So we see a real urgency in addressing the spyware issue and en-
suring  that  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  has  the  authority,  has 
the necessary tools to crack down on these activities. 

Now,  since  you’ve  asked  us  to  make  some  brief  remarks  and  be-
cause  my  full  statement  will  be  entered  into  the  hearing  record,  I 
thought it might be helpful to place this bill a little bit in the con-
text of where we’ve been and where I think we may be going. This 
bill  addresses  the  specific  problem  of  products,  applications  and 
techniques that are placed on the consumer’s computer that surrep-
titiously  take  information  from  the  user  or  exploit  vulnerabilities 
on the computer’s system. 

Clearly  these  are  bad  practices.  They  should  be  prohibited.  I 
think there are some changes that could be made in terms of scope 
and  definition  that  might  make  the  bill  a  little  bit  more  effective. 
But  I  also  think  it’s  important  to  understand  that  this  is  simply 
one category of spyware and that there are other types of activities 
which I think you need to be aware of. 

We  have  concerns,  for  example,  about  Internet  service  providers 
that  now  view  the  opportunity  to  intercept  communications,  the 
routine Internet traffic of their customers, for advertising purposes. 
From  our  perspective  that’s  a  form  of  spyware  and  if  it’s  not  ad-
dressed in this legislation perhaps it could be addressed somewhere 
else. 

We’re concerned about similar techniques that might be deployed 
against  mobile  telephones.  A  lot  of  information,  personal  informa-
tion,  is  available  on  phones.  These  phones  are  becoming  more  so-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

24 

phisticated.  They’re  essentially  mobile  computers  and  many  of  the 
same concerns about privacy protection and spyware exist there as 
well.  Even  the  advertising  techniques  on  social  networking  sites 
such as Facebook which make it possible for third party developers 
to  get  access  to  a  lot  of  detailed  personal  information  they  don’t 
really  need  access  to  is  another  issue  we  hope  the  Committee  will 
consider. 

Again,  it  may  not  be  possible  to  get  to  all  these  issues  with  this 
legislation,  and  we  do  think  this  legislation  is  a  step  in  the  right 
direction.  But  I  think  it  is  important  as  the  Committee  thinks 
broadly  about  evolving  business  practices  to  be  aware  of  these 
threats. 

Now,  to  speak  specifically  about  some  of  the  recommendations 
that we would make for S. 1625, which we do favor—it’s an impor-
tant  bill—we  think  it  is  clearly  important  to  expand  the  FTC  au-
thority  in  this  area  so  that  when  they  do  pursue  these  investiga-
tions  we  think  it’s  important  that  the  FTC  authority  not  preempt 
State  authority.  We  already  have  very  important  examples.  In 
Washington State, for example, the State attorney general was able 
to go after a company that actually claimed it was offering a prod-
uct  to  help  people  with  spyware.  The  way  it  did  it  was  to  put  up 
advertising  on  the  user’s  computer  which  said:  Oh,  we’ve  detected 
spyware on your computer; you need to purchase our product. 

Well,  the  State  attorney  general  was  able  to  go  after  that  com-
pany and reached a million dollar settlement. We think those types 
of innovative investigations and prosecutions are very important. 

There  is  an  issue  with  the  exclusion  for  liability.  A  company 
under one provision in the bill would be given very broad authority 
to  install  spyware  and  we  think  that  really  needs  to  be  reined  in 
a  bit  and  it  is  an  exception.  I  don’t  think  it’s  too  difficult  to  deal 
with. 

Finally,  the  category  of  information  that  the  bill  protects,  what 
we  think  of  as  personally  identifiable  information,  of  course  is 
changing very rapidly. Ten years ago we might have said, well, it’s 
a person’s telephone number and maybe their Social Security num-
ber.  Now  we  need  to  think  about  their  identity  or  user  number  on 
a  Facebook  or  social  networking  service,  because  that’s  also  a 
unique identifier that makes it possible to identify someone. 

Even a person’s password information, the person’s Internet pro-
tocol address that’s uniquely linked to a computer, is a type of per-
sonally  identifiable  information.  We  think  those  changes  could  be 
made in the bill as well. 

But  it  is  important  legislation.  It  takes  on  part  of  the  problem 

and I hope the Committee will be able to act favorably on it. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Rotenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARC ROTENBERG, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ELECTRONIC PRIVACY INFORMATION CENTER (EPIC) 

Senator  Pryor,  Chairman  Inouye,  Senator  Stevens  and  members  of  the  Com-
mittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  on  the  topic  of  spyware  and 
S. 1625, the Counter Spy Act. My name is Marc Rotenberg and I am Executive Di-
rector of the Electronic Privacy Information Center. EPIC is a non-partisan research 
organization  based  in  Washington,  D.C.  EPIC  was  founded  in  1994  to  focus  public 
attention on emerging civil liberties issues and to protect privacy, the First Amend-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

25 

ment,  and  constitutional  values.  EPIC  recently  filed  a  complaint  at  the  Federal 
Trade Commission on the specific problem of commercial spyware.1 

Spyware,  adware,  and  other  information  collection  techniques  are  a  growing 
threat  to  the  privacy  of  Internet  users.  Computer  users  have  noticed  the  effects. 
Ninety  percent  of  users  say  they  have  adjusted  their  online  behavior  out  of  fear  of 
falling  victim  to  software  intrusions.2 The  Webroot  automated  threat  research  tool 
has identified more than half a million different potential malware sites since Janu-
ary 2005.3 Spyware can cause significant degradation in system performance, result 
in  loss  of  Internet  access  and  impose  substantial  costs  on  consumers  and  busi-
nesses.4 Spyware  can  assert  control  over  the  operation  of  computers.5 The  privacy 
risks of spyware include the theft of private information, monitoring of communica-
tions and tracking of an individual’s online activity.6 

Importantly,  privacy  threats  are  growing  not  just  in  numbers,  but  also  in  type. 
Traditional  spyware,  adware  and  tracking  cookies  are  now  joined  by  other  threats 
such  as  mobile  device  spyware,7 ‘‘stalkerware,’’  and  the  potential  for  social  net-
working  applications  to  function  as  spyware.  Spyware  comes  from  several  sources 
including online attackers, organized crime, marketing organizations and trusted in-
siders.8 

A  new  motivation  for  the  cyber  criminal  is  that  spyware  has  become  a  profitable 
business.9 Individuals  can  also  deploy  spyware  against  each  other.10 Some  ISP’s 
have also begun to install their own spyware-like services.11 

These  threats  require  vigorous  policy  response.  Policy  must  be  able  to  innovate 

to recognize new challenges while substantively protecting consumer privacy. 
Notice  and  Consent  Schemes  Do  Not  Adequately  Protect  User  Information 
Ultimately,  users  must  be  able  to  control  how  and  when  information  about  them 
is  used,  disclosed  and  held.  Solutions  which  rely  on  simple  notice  and  consent  will 
not  adequately  protect  users.  A  recent  survey  of  California  consumers  showed  that 
they  fundamentally  misunderstand  their  online  privacy  rights.12 In  two  separate 
surveys  almost  60  percent  of  consumers  incorrectly  believed  that  the  presence  of 
‘‘privacy  policy’’  meant  that  their  privacy  was  protected.13 In  a  different  survey,  55 
percent  of  participants  incorrectly  believed  that  the  presence  of  a  privacy  policy 
meant that websites could not sell their address and purchase information. 

Users  also  routinely  click  through  notices.  The  Pew  Internet  and  American  Life 
Project found that 73 percent of users do not always read agreements, privacy state-
ments or other disclaimers before downloading or installing programs.14 In such an 
environment, merely giving notice to users before the collection of sensitive informa-
tion  from  their  computers  fails  to  adequately  protect  privacy  in  the  way  consumers 
expect. 

Consumer  data  should  instead  receive  substantive  protection.  Information  should 
be  kept  securely,  and  users  should  have  the  ability  to  know  what  data  about  them 
is being kept, who it has been shared with, and to withdraw consent for the holding 
of  this  data.  Further,  data  should  only  be  collected  and  kept  for  specified  purposes. 
Important  security  information  should  also  receive  protection,  even  if  it  does  not 
identify  a  user.  The  Counter  Spy  Act  places  conditions  on  software  that  collects  in-
formation  such  as  the  user’s  Social  Security  number  and  driver’s  license  number. 
It also protects as ‘‘sensitive personal information’’ information such as financial ac-
count  numbers  when  combined  with  passwords  or  other  security  codes.15 Password 
and  access  information  to  other  accounts,  such  as  e-mail  or  social  networking,  are 
not included. 

EPIC  recommends  that  strict  protection  be  afforded  to  security  information,  such 
as username/password pairs, encryption keys, biometric data, or other access control 
information.  The  mining  of  this  information  may  not  lead  directly  to  identity  theft 
and  other  financial  harm,  but  facilitates  its  spread.  Gaining  access  to  a  user’s  non- 
financial accounts allows further information to be collected and further crimes per-
petrated.  Compromised  accounts  may  have  valuable  information  stored  in  them  or 
be  used  to  originate  further  malware  attacks,  including  by  impersonating  the  com-
promised account. 
Privacy Requires Strong and Innovative Enforcement 

EPIC supports giving the FTC the ability to seek treble fines and penalize pattern 
or  practice  violations,  as  section  7  of  the  Counter  Spy  Act  does.  These  changes  will 
improve  the  FTC’s  effectiveness  in  pursuing  repeat  offenders,  and  also  change  the 
economic incentives and disincentives for purveyors of spyware. 

Several  states  are  using  innovative  policies  to  protect  their  citizens’  privacy. 
Spyware  legislation  has  been  passed  in  several  states,  including  Alaska,16 Ari-
zona,17 California,18 Florida,19 Georgia,20 Illinois,21 Indiana,22 Iowa,23 Louisiana,24 
Nevada,25 New  Hampshire,26 Rhode  Island,27 Texas,28 Utah,29 and  Washington.30 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

26 

The  Utah  statute,  for  example,  makes  provision  for  a  private  cause  of  action  which 
may  be  brought  by  a  mark  owner  who  does  business  in  Utah  and  is  directly  and 
adversely  affected  by  the  violation.31 In  such  a  suit  a  mark  owner  may  recover  the 
greater of $500 per each ad displayed or actual damages.32 

State  Attorneys  General  have  pursued  spyware  providers  under  state  spyware 
laws.  Washington  State  successfully  applied  the  Washington  State  Computer 
Spyware  Act 33 (Spyware  Act)  to  stop  Secure  Computer’s  use  of  their  free  computer 
scan  that  always  detects  spyware  leading  to  instructions  to  buy  their  Spyware 
Cleaner product in a $1,000,000 settlement.34 The State alleged violations under the 
state’s  Spyware  Act,  Federal  and  state  spam  laws,  and  the  state  Consumer  Protec-
tion  Act.35 The  Attorney  General’s  Office  accused  the  company  of  ‘‘falsely  claiming 
computers were infected with spyware’’ to entice the consumer to pay for their pro-
gram  that  claimed  to  remove  it.36 The  settlement  required  the  company  to  inform 
consumers of their right to a refund and pay a $1,000,000 judgment. 

For  these  reasons  EPIC  recommends  that  the  Counter  Spy  act  not  preempt  state 
laws  and  state  enforcement  actions,  as  section  11(b)  does.  Federal  law  should  set 
a baseline of privacy protection. It should not cap it. 

EPIC recommends that the limitation in section 6(a)(10) be removed. The Counter 
Spy  Act’s  liability  limitations  broadly  permit  monitoring  of  users’  computers  and 
personal information for the ‘‘detection or prevention of the unauthorized use of soft-
ware  fraudulent  or  other  illegal  activities.’’ 37 These  limitations  should  be  scaled 
back.  The  determination  of  whether  uses  are  unauthorized,  fraudulent  or  illegal 
may be complicated. 
Privacy Threats Beyond Traditional Spyware Programs 

Information  collection  online  is  not  performed  solely  with  spyware  programs  exe-
cuted on user’s computers. Third-party and opt-out cookies present growing threats. 
The  proliferation  of  mobile  devices  means  a  potential  new  place  for  spyware  to  act. 
Internet  service  providers  are  begging  to  deploy  their  own  adware  and  profiling 
services  in  ways  which  users  will  find  difficult,  if  not  impossible,  to  detect.  Impor-
tant user information is leaving the desktops and instead is residing on online social 
networking  profiles.  This  information  includes  sensitive  personal  information  such 
as  contact  information,  one’s  social  and  business  relationships,  political  interests, 
sexual orientation, as well as the contents of communications. Further, online social 
networking sites are increasing their own information collection practices. 

A ‘‘cookie’’ is information about a particular user’s identity and browsing behavior 
that web servers store on his computer, typically without his consent.38 Cookies per-
mit a user to customize his interface with a particular website, for example by auto-
matically entering his username and password.39 However, since cookies can match 
an individual user to his interests and browsing habits, they are increasingly placed, 
gathered, and exploited by advertisers and others with a commercial interest in pre-
cisely  targeting  ads  and  services.40 Anyone  with  access  to  that  user’s  cookies  can 
track his browsing history and gather information about his behavior and identity.41 
As  a  result,  Internet  users  who  are  concerned  about  privacy  are  widely  encouraged 
to  routinely  purge  the  cookies  they  have  accumulated  or  to  refuse  cookies  from 
websites that require them.42 

The  recent  Google/Doubleclick  merger  raises  significant  privacy  issues  because  of 
the  planned  merger  of  the  Google  search  engine  database  with  Doubleclick’s  exten-
sive data collection accomplished with third-party cookies.43 EPIC filed a complaint 
with the FTC urging the Commission to impose privacy protections upon the merg-
er, concluding: 

Google’s  proposed  acquisition  of  DoubleClick  will  give  one  company  access  to 
more  information  about  the  Internet  activities  of  consumers  than  any  other 
company in the world. Moreover, Google will operate with virtually no legal ob-
ligation  to  ensure  the  privacy,  security,  and  accuracy  of  the  personal  data  that 
it  collects.  At  this  time,  there  is  simply  no  consumer  privacy  issue  more  press-
ing  for  the  Commission  to  consider  than  Google’s  plan  to  combine  the  search 
histories and website visit records of Internet users.44 

In  November  2007  Facebook  launched  its  Beacon  service.45 Beacon  collects  infor-
mation  from  Facebook  users  when  engaged  in  actions  on  other  websites.  Facebook 
then  uses  this  information  to  broadcast  advertisements  to  that  user’s  friends  on 
Facebook,  alerting  them  of  the  actions  that  the  user  took  on  these  other  websites. 
Initially,  Facebook  only  provided  a  brief  opportunity  for  an  opt-out.  Facebook  later 
added  an  opt-in  system,  and  the  option  to  globally  opt  out  of  Beacon.  Shortly  after 
Beacon’s launch, security researchers showed that Facebook is receiving information 
even  from  those  who  are  not  logged  in  to  Facebook  and  are  not  Facebook  mem-
bers.46 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

27 

Users  of  social  networking  sites  are  also  exposed  to  the  information  collection 
practices  of  third  party  social  networking  applications.  On  Facebook,  installing  ap-
plications grants this third party application provider access to nearly all of a user’s 
information.47 Significantly, third party applications do not only access the informa-
tion  about  a  given  user  that  has  added  the  application.  Applications  by  default  get 
access  to  much  of  the  information  about  that  user’s  friends  and  network  members 
that the user can see. This level of access is often not necessary. Researchers at the 
University  of  Virginia  found  that  90  percent  of  applications  are  given  more  access 
privileges than they need.48 

These features may be exploited and the information used for other purposes. In-
vestigators  at  the  BBC  took  3  hours  to  write  an  application  that  collected  informa-
tion that had been marked as unable to be shared with friends.49 Facebook, as part 
of  its  response,  cautioned  that  users  should  ‘‘employ  the  same  precautions  while 
downloading  software  from  Facebook  applications  that  they  use  when  downloading 
software on their desktop.’’ 50 

Mobile device spyware also presents a future privacy threat, with unique features 
due  to  the  mobile  environment.  In  December  2006,  McAfee  reported  on  a  new  kind 
of mobile phone spyware, called SymbOS/Mobispy.A.51 SymbOS/Mobispy.A installed 
on phones and recorded incoming and outgoing SMS messages.52 It also tracked the 
phone  numbers  of  all  dialed  and  received  calls.  Mobile  tracking  presents  unique 
dangers  because  it  allows  the  tracker  to  determine  the  user’s  location.  While  the 
data  may  be  able  to  follow  users  anonymously  it  may  also  easily  identify  them— 
they are likely at home in the evenings. Location information should receive signifi-
cant protection from tracking applications. 

A new more insidious form of adware has been tested in the United Kingdom, and 
at  least  one  U.S.  company  has  announced  it  will  also  use  the  system.53 British 
Telecom contracted with the former adware company Phorm to create secret profiles 
of its users.54 Users’ traffic was routed via Phorm boxes, which replaced ads on the 
pages  users  were  visiting  with  its  own  targeted  ads.  In  the  U.S.,  Charter  commu-
nications announced that it will monitor consumers’ browsing in order to serve them 
targeted ads.55 Charter sent several of its users cryptic notices of an ‘‘enhancement’’ 
to their web browsing experiences.56 The letter pointed users to a website with more 
details, including the claim that ‘‘[t]here is no application downloaded onto a user’s 
computer  and,  therefore,  there  is  no  ‘‘adware’’  or  ‘‘spyware’’  on  your  computer  from 
Charter  in  this  enhanced  service.’’ 57 Thus  a  system  that  is  functionally  equivalent 
to  spyware,  and  more  dangerous  due  to  its  undetectability,  is  touted  as  safer  be-
cause it does not reside on the victim’s computer. 

Finally,  some  companies  market  spyware  directly  for  consumers  to  use  for  stalk-
ing  and  other  criminal  activities.  These  technologies  are  promoted  to  consumers  to 
spy  on  e-mail  and  instant  message  exchanges,  record  websites  visited,  and  capture 
passwords and logins. EPIC has filed a complaint with the FTC against such ‘‘Stalk-
er  spyware,’’  highlighting  the  unfair  and  deceptive  practices  used  to  market  this 
software.58 These practices include the promotion of illegal surveillance targets, the 
promotion  of  ‘‘Trojan  Horse’’  e-mail  attacks,  and  the  failure  to  warn  purchasers  of 
the legal consequences of illegal use. 

We hope the FTC will take action on this complaint and take action against these 

firms. 
Conclusion 

Privacy online continues to face many threats, both from criminal entities as well 
as intrusive commercial ventures. Substantive consumer protections and innovative 
enforcement  strategies  are  necessary  to  protect  consumers  from  the  evolving  threat 
of  information  collection  online.  These  threats  include  not  just  traditional  spyware, 
but  also  the  merger  of  online  consumer  databases,  new  social  networking  features, 
mobile spyware and stalker spyware. 

EPIC  recommends  passage  of  Counter  Spy  Act  in  line  with  the  changes  pointed 
out  above.  The  Counter  Spy  Act  should  not  preempt  state  law  or  enforcement;  it 
should protect important security information like username/login pairs; and the li-
ability  limitations  should  be  narrowed.  Congress  should  also  be  aware  of  other  de-
veloping threats to privacy beyond traditional spyware programs. 
Footnotes 

1 Complaint,  Request  for  Investigation,  Injunction  and  Other  Relief,  In  the  Matter  of 

Awarenesstech.com, et al., (March 6, 2008), http://epic.org/privacy/dv/spylsoftware.pdf. 

2 Pew Internet & American Life Project, Spyware: The Threat of Unwanted Software Programs 
is Changing the way People use the Internet, 2 (July 2005), available at http://pewinternet.org/ 
pdfs/PIPlSpywarelReportlJulyl05.pdf [hereinafter PEW Spyware Report]. 

3 Webroot,  State  of  Spyware  Report  Q2,  (2006),  available  at  http://www.webroot.com/pdf/ 

2006-q2-sos-US.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

28 

4 Fed.  Trade  Comm’n,  Spyware  Workshop—Monitoring  Software  on  your  PC:  Spyware, 
Adware,  and  other  software,  8  (Mar.  2005)  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/os/2005/03/ 
050307spywarerpt.pdf. 

5 Id. at 9. 
6 Id. 
7 Joseph  De  Avila,  Do  Hackers  Pose  a  Threat  to  Smart  Phones?,  THE WALL STREET JOURNAL, 
D1,  May  27,  2008,  available  at  http://online.wsj.com/article/SB121184343416921215 
.html?mod=todaysluslpersonalljournal. 

8 Aaron  Hackworth  USCERT,  Spyware,  3  (2005)  available  at  http://www.uscert.gov/read-

inglroom/spyware.pdf. 

9 See  Guillaume  Lovet,  Dirty  Money  on  the  Wires:  The  Business  Models  of  Cyber  Criminals, 
(2006),  available  at  http://www.momindum.com/ressources/produits/fortinetFlash/content/ 
llibraries/ldocuments/index1/GLlBusinesslModelsloflCybercriminals.pdf. 

10 EPIC,  Personal  Surveillance  Technologies  (May  2008),  http://epic.org/privacy/dv/per-

sonallsurveillance.html. 

11 Saul Hansell, Charter Will Monitor Customer’s Web Surfing to Target Ads, THE NEW YORK 
TIMES,  MAY 14,  2008,  http://bits.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/05/14/charter-will-monitor-customers- 
web-surfing-to-target-ads/. 

12 Joseph Turow, Deirdre Mulligan, and Chris Jay Hoofnagle, Consumers Fundamentally Mis-
understand  the  Online  Advertising  Marketplace  (Oct.  2007),  available  at  http://groups 
.ischool.berkeley.edu/samuelsonclinic/files/annenberglsamuelsonladvertising.pdf. 

13 Id. at 1. 
14 Pew Spyware Report, supra note 2, at 6. 
15 S. 1625, 110th Cong. § 12(13)(B) (2008). 
16 Alaska Stat. §§ 45.45.792, 45.45.794, 45.45.798, 45.45.471 (2007). 
17 Ariz. Rev. Stat. § 44–7301 to –7304 (2008). 
18 Cal. Bus. & Prof. Code § 22947 (2008). 
19 Fla. Stat. § 934.02, .03, .06 (2008). 
20 Ga. Code Ann. § 16–9–152, –157 (2008). 
21 720 Ill. Comp. Stat. 5/16D–3 (2008). 
22 Ind. Code. § 24–4.8–1 to –3 (2008). 
23 Iowa Code § 715 (2008). 
24 La. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 51:2006–14 (2008). 
25 Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 205.4737 (2007). 
26 N.H. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 359–H:1–6 (2008). 
27 R.I. Gen. Laws § 11–52.2–7 (2008). 
28 Tex.  Bus.  &  Com.  Code  § 48.001–4,  .051–057  (2008);  Tex.  Bus.  &  Com.  Code  § 324.001–7, 

.051–055, .101–.102 (2008). 

29 Utah Code Ann. § 13–40–101 to –401 (2008). 
30 Wash. Rev. Code § 19.270.010–.080,.900 (2008). 
31 Utah Code Ann. § 13–40–301. 
32 Id. 
33 Wash. Rev. Code § 19.270.010–.080,.900. 
34 State  of  Washington  v.  Secure  Computer,  LLC,  No.  C06–0126RSM  (W.D.  Wash.  Nov.  30, 
2006)  (Consent  Decree  as  to  Defendants  Secure  Computer,  LLC  and  Paul  E.  Burke),  http:// 
www.atg.wa.gov/uploadedFiles/Another/News/PresslReleases/2006/ 
SecureComputerConsentDecree112906.pdf. 

35 Press Release, Washington State Office of the Attorney General, Attorney General McKenna 
Announces  $1M  Settlement  in  Washington’s  First  Spyware  Suit  (Dec.  4,  2006),  available  at 
http://www.atg.wa.gov/pressrelease.aspx?id=5926. 

36 Id. 
37 S. 1625, 110th Cong. § 6(a)(10) (2008). 
38 Cookiecentral.com,  The  Cookie  Concept,  http://www.cookiecentral.com/clconcept.htm  (last 

visited June 6, 2008). 

39 Cookiecentral.com,  Purpose  of  Cookies:  The  Cookie  Controversy,  http://www.cookie 

central.com/ccstory/cc2.htm (last visited June 6, 2008). 

40 Id. 
41 EPIC, Cookies, http://epic.org/privacy/internet/cookies/. 
42 EPIC, Does AskEraser Really Erase?, http://epic.org/privacy/ask/default.html. 
43 See  EPIC,  Privacy?  Proposed  Google/DoubleClick  Deal,  http://epic.org/privacy/ftc/google/ 
44 EPIC  Complaint,  In  the  Matter  of  Google  Inc.  and  DoubleClick  Inc.,  10  (April  20,  2007), 

http://epic.org/privacy/ftc/google/epiclcomplaint.pdf. 

45 Facebook Beacon, http://www.facebook.com/business/?beacon. 
46 CA  Security  Advisor,  Facebook’s  Misrepresentation  ofBeacon’s  Threat  to  Privacy:  Tracking 
Users  Who  Opt  Out  or  Are  Not  Logged  In,  (Dec  3,  2007),  http://community.ca.com/blogs/ 
securityadvisor/archive/2007/11/29/facebook-s-misrepresentation-of-beacon-s-threat-to-privacy- 
tracking-users-who-opt-out-or-are-not-loggedin.aspx. 

47 EPIC, Facebook Privacy, http://epic.org/privacy/facebook/. 
48 Privacy  Protection  for  Social  Networking  APIs,  http://www.cs.virginia.edu/felt/privacy/ 

(last visited June 6, 2008). 

49 Press Release, BBC, Facebook’s loophole places personal profile data at risk—BBC investiga-
tion  (May  1,  2008),  http://www.bbc.co.uk/pressoffice/pressreleases/stories/2008/05lmay/01/ 
click.shtml. 

50 Q&A:  Facebook  Response,  BBC,  May  1,  2008,  http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/programmes/ 

51 McAfee  Avert  Labs  Blog,  http://www.avertlabs.com/research/blog/?p=145  (last  visited 

clicklonline/7375891.stm. 

June 5, 2008). 

52 Id. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

29 

53 See EPIC, Deep Packet Inspection and Privacy, http://epic.org/privacy/dpi/. 
54 Chris  Williams,  BT  and  Phorm  secretly  tracked  18,000  customers  in  2006,  THE REGISTER, 

April 1, 2008, http://www.theregister.co.uk/2008/04/01/btlphorml2006mltrial/. 

55 Saul Hansell, Charter Will Monitor Customers’ Web Surfing to Target Ads, THE NEW YORK 
TIMES, May 14, 2008, http://bits.blogs.nytimes.com/2008/05/14/charter-will-monitor-customers 
web-surfing-to-target-ads/. 

56 Charter Letter, available at http://www.epic.org/privacy/dpi/subscriberlltr.pdf. 
57 Charter  Communications,  Enhanced  Online  Experience  Frequently  Asked  Questions, 

http://connect.charter.com/landing/op1.html#6. 

58 Complaint,  Request  for  Investigation,  Injunction  and  Other  Relief,  In  the  Matter  of 

Awarenesstech.com, et al., (March 6, 2008), http://epic.org/privacy/dv/spylsoftware.pdf. 

Senator PRYOR [presiding]. Dr. Edelman? 

STATEMENT OF BENJAMIN G. EDELMAN, 

ASSISTANT PROFESSOR, BUSINESS ADMINISTRATION, 

HARVARD BUSINESS SCHOOL 

Dr.  EDELMAN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Pryor,  Senator  Nelson,  Mem-

bers of the Committee. 

Senator  Pryor,  I  want  to  structure  my  remarks  around  your  ini-
tial  question  about  the  proper  definition  of  spyware  and  Senator 
Vitter’s  response  immediately  thereafter,  concerned  about  both  the 
risk  of  being  over-inclusive  and  the  risk  of  being  under-inclusive, 
either  of  which  would  be  a  serious  problem  in  making  the  legisla-
tion as effective as the Committee hopes. 

I spend perhaps too much of my time in my lab testing spyware, 
going  to  the  sorts  of  sites  where  users  get  infected,  infecting  my 
computer  over  and  over,  measuring  the  effects  on  it,  figuring  out 
how it gets infected and what it would take to clean the infections 
off.  Well,  two  examples  that  I’ve  seen  in  the  past  months  I  think 
are  instructive  for  identifying  potential  under-inclusiveness  of  this 
legislation  and  then  in  rethinking  alternative  approaches  that 
might help the Committee be that much more effective. 

So  here’s  one  that  I  saw  just  2  weeks  ago  in  fact.  A  pop-up  ad 
promised  that  it  could,  quote,  ‘‘stop  spam.’’  Upon  clicking  on  the 
pop-up,  I  received  a  long  text,  several  hundred  words,  center- 
aligned.  Part  of  the  text  was  off  screen.  It  was  very  hard  to  read, 
in short. 

But  if  you  read  it  carefully,  you  would  find  that  it  says  it  will 
show special offers in pop-up windows. OK, so it’s saying it’s going 
to  show  pop-up  ads,  but  it’s  in  a  small  font.  The  word  ‘‘pop-up’’  is 
actually off-screen, so you’d have to scroll around to find it. 

If  you  press  ‘‘yes’’  the  software  will  track  the  websites  that  you 
visit  and  the  search  terms  that  you  enter  and  then,  sure  enough, 
it will show you pop-up ads, quite a few of them. 

So  what  about  that  program  vis  a` vis  this  legislation?  Can  you 
point to a clause of this legislation that that program violates? It’s 
awfully  hard  to  do  actually.  The  program  tracks  some  of  the 
websites you visit, but when you look in Section 4, it needs to track 
those websites in a very particular way in order to fall afoul of that 
clause  of  Section  4.  The  underlying  deception  of  having  the  tricky 
disclosure  that’s  hard  to  read,  you  won’t  find  anything  about  that 
in this legislation. 

Here’s  another  one:  a  program  that  tracks  a  user’s  name,  street 
address,  and  all  of  the  web  searches  that  they  do,  then  sends  that 
to  their  server  for  a  variety  of  purposes,  market  research,  perhaps 
some  kind  of  marketing.  There  too,  it’s  hard  to  point  to  the  clause 
in  this  legislation  that  the  program  violates.  When  you  read 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

30 

through  the  specific  data  elements  that  are  prohibited  under  Sec-
tion 4, you don’t see the data that I listed that the program copies. 
I  think  members  of  this  committee  would  be  concerned  to  have 
that  sort  of  software  on  their  computers,  and  would  want  it  re-
moved  if  they  found  it  there  and  certainly  the  public  shares  that 
view, but it seems that this legislation wouldn’t cover at least those 
two examples. 

So  what  do  we  make  of  that?  Well,  Senator  Pryor,  as  you  and 
Senator  Vitter  immediately  recognized,  practices  change  quickly, 
and at our peril do we make a list of all the specific practices that 
ought  to  be  prohibited,  because  the  next  day  there  will  be  more 
practices that we didn’t think of, despite our best efforts. 

So  coming  back  to  Ms.  Harrington’s  remarks,  I  think  she’s  abso-
lutely  right  to  emphasize  the  effectiveness  on  a  long-term  basis  of 
the  FTC  Act.  By  prohibiting  acts  that  have  a  tendency  to  deceive, 
that  tend  to  be  unfair  to  consumers—that  is  the  sort  of  language 
that  can  prevent  these  one-sided  bargains,  where  they  show  you 
pop-up ads and you don’t get anything in return, or they track you 
in  great  detail  without  telling  you.  That  is  an  approach  that  has 
lasted for decades and will serve us well going forward. 

So  what  could  this  legislation  do  that  would  be  helpful?  Well, 
one, it seems the FTC lacks the statutory authority to get quite as 
large penalties as they ought to be able to receive. Imagine the set-
tlement  discussions  between  the  FTC  and  a  so-called  adware 
maker.  The  adware  maker  is  sitting  there  realizing  that  all  the 
FTC  can  get  is  disgorgement  of  ill-gotten  gains,  and  the  company 
managed  not  to  make  a  profit 
last  year.  So  what’s  the 
disgorgement?  The  disgorgement  is  zero.  How  much  of  a  penalty 
can the FTC really extract under those circumstances? 

Consider  a  statutory  grant  of  greater  authority,  of  bigger  pen-
alties, of liquidated damages perhaps or some amount certain as a 
floor. ‘‘Even if you didn’t manage to make money, well, we’re going 
to  make  certain  you  lost  money  if  you  went  around  causing  the 
kind of harm that’s at issue.’’ That could be very helpful. So I think 
that’s an approach the Committee might want to consider, avoiding 
attempting  to  define  spyware  because  we  have  enough  of  that 
under  the  FTC  Act,  but  instead  granting  greater  statutory  protec-
tions in the form of increased liability. 

My  written  remarks  flag  two  other  issues  I  hope  the  Committee 
will consider. For one, preemption of State law doesn’t seem to me 
a  good  idea,  given  that  there’s  more  than  enough  work  to  go 
around  to  keep  everyone  busy  and  some  innovative  statutory  ap-
proaches.  Second,  the  Committee  should  avoid  legislation  that 
doesn’t  quite  fill  the  field  and  makes  it  too  easy  for  a  vendor  to 
claim  to  not  be  spyware.  A  vendor  might  claim:  ‘‘We  are  federally 
certified  good  software;  we  passed  Senator  Pryor’s  standard  and 
therefore  we  must  be  good.’’  But  in  fact  that  vendor  could  still  be 
pretty  sneaky  and  could  continue  to  cause  users  substantial  harm. 
So  I’d  caution  the  Committee  at  setting  low  standards.  We  need 
to be tough on spyware for the protection of all the users counting 
on this committee and this legislation for protection going forward. 

Thank you for your interest in this matter. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Edelman follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

31 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BENJAMIN G. EDELMAN, ASSISTANT PROFESSOR, 

HARVARD BUSINESS SCHOOL 

Chairman Inouye, Senator Pryor, Members of the Committee: 
My name is Benjamin Edelman. I am an Assistant Professor at the Harvard Busi-
ness School, where my research focuses on the design of electronic marketplaces, in-
cluding  designing  online  marketplaces  to  assure  safety,  reliability,  and  efficiency. 
My  full  biography  and  publication  list  are  at  http://www.benedelman.org/bio  and 
http://www.benedelman.org/publications. 

Today  the  Committee  considers  the  important  problems  of  Internet  spyware  and 
deceptive adware—scourges that threaten the reliability, trustworthiness, and over-
all utility of many users’ Internet’s access. 

My bottom line: 
Despite  some  recent  progress,  spyware  and  adware  continue  to  present  substan-

tial harms to Internet users and to the Internet as a whole. 

Many improper practices are already prohibited under existing statutes including 
the FTC Act, state consumer protection statutes, and state anti-spyware legislation. 
These  statutes  have  given  rise  to  a  series  of  cases,  both  public  and  private,  that 
have somewhat reined in the problems of spyware and adware. 

Tough Federal legislation could assist in bringing spyware and adware purveyors 
to  justice,  and  in  further  deterring  creation  and  support  of  this  noxious  software. 
But the bill at hand addresses only a portion of the problem, while in some ways 
reducing the effectiveness of existing efforts. By prohibiting specific individual prac-
tices,  the  bill  invites  perpetrators  to  comply  with  the  letter  of  the  law  while  con-
tinuing  to  harm  and  deceive  consumers.  Moreover,  perpetrators  are  likely  to  boast 
of compliance—despite offering software no reasonable user would want. These loop-
holes  are  inevitable  in  the  bill’s  ‘‘laundry  list’’  approach,  which  unavoidably  omits 
deceptive schemes not yet invented. 

Pages  five  and  six  set  out  my  detailed  suggestions  for  revision.  I  favor  a  rewrite 
that  emphasizes  consumer  protection  fundamentals  such  as  a  consumer’s  right  to 
know what software runs on his PC, and to grant or deny consent to each program 
that  asks  to  be  installed.  But  the  FTC  has  already  established  these  principles 
through  its  existing  anti-spyware  litigation.  Thanks  to  existing  legislation  plus  the 
FTC’s  work  to  date,  this  bill  can  accomplish  its  apparent  purpose  without  adding 
new  prohibitions.  Instead,  this  bill  can  grant  the  FTC  discretion  to  seek  increased 
penalties  under  existing  statutes—sparing  this  committee  the  challenging  task  of 
deciding exactly what practices to prohibit. 
The Consumer Victims of Spyware and Adware 

Discussion of spyware and adware typically seeks, in the first instance, to attempt 
to  protect  the  users  who  receive  such  software.  After  all,  a  computer  with  spyware 
or  adware  is  often  virtually  crippled—filled  with  so  many  popups  that  doing  other 
work is impossible or impractical, and slowed so dramatically that it is unappealing 
to  use  the  computer  for  ordinary  purposes.  Legislation  and  enforcement  can  help 
prevent such damage. 

Adware  vendors  often  claim  their  software  arrives  on  users’  computers  only  after 
users agree. As a threshold matter, my hands-on testing has repeatedly proven that 
adware can become installed without a user’s consent.1 But even if a user did accept 
the  software,  adware  popups  can  nonetheless  present  substantial  concern.  For  ex-
ample, some adware popups are sexually-explicit—sometimes appearing without any 
obvious  way  to  close  the  resulting  windows  to  remove  the  explicit  images.2 Other 
adware  popups  resort  to  deception  to  try  to  sell  their  wares—combining  the  inter-
ruption  of  popups  with  the  trickery  of  false  advertising.3 Moreover,  adware  popups 
appear  separate  from  the  programs  that  caused  them—making  it  hard  for  users  to 
understand  where  the  ads  came  from,  why  they’re  there,  and  how  to  make  them 
stop. 

Users  face  a  variety  of  costs  in  restoring  a  computer  to  good  working  order  after 
an infection of spyware and/or adware. Some users hire technicians to make appro-
priate  repairs.  Others  buy  anti-spyware  software.  Furthermore,  during  the  period 

1 See  e.g.,  ‘‘Who  Profits  from  Security  Holes?’’  http://www.benedelman.org/news/111804- 
1.html.  See  also  ‘‘Nonconsensual  180  Installations  Continue  . . .’’  http://www.benedelman.org/ 
news/022006-1.html.  See  also  ‘‘Spyware  Installation  Methods.’’  http://www.benedelman.org/ 
spyware/installations/. 

2 ‘‘Spyware  Showing  Unrequested  Sexually-Explicit  Images.’’  http://www.benedelman.org/ 

news/062206–1.html. 

3 See  e.g.,  ‘‘Zango  Practices  Violating  Zango’s  Recent  Settlement  with  the  FTC’’  (heading 
‘‘Zango  Ads  for  Bogus  Sites  that  Attempt  to  Defraud  Users’’).  http://www.benedelman.org/ 
spyware/zango-violations/. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

32 

in  which  spyware  or  adware  impair  a  computer’s  operation,  the  user  loses  some  or 
all access to the system he or she has paid for. These are real and troubling costs— 
out-of-pocket expense, lost time, and reduced productivity. 

These harms are not outweighed by any countervailing benefits. Rare is the user 
who  receives  anything  of  genuine  value  from  spyware  or  adware.  Some  vendors 
claim  their  software  is  useful,  e.g.,  letting  a  user  ‘‘participate  in  a  market  research 
community’’  or  ‘‘access  premium  content.’’  But  these  claims  rarely  survive  scrutiny. 
For  example,  it  is  hard  to  see  a  benefit  in  being  tracked  for  market  research,  when 
standard practice is to pay participants to allow their behavior to be tracked. More-
over,  when  a  vendor  promises  ‘‘premium  content’’  in  exchange  for  popups,  it  turns 
out  the  supposed  premium  material  is  often  readily  available  elsewhere  for  free, 
and/or material the vendor lacks proper license to redistribute.4 

The  harms  caused  by  spyware  and  adware  fall  within  the  general  realm  of  anti- 
consumer  practices  addressed  by  decades  of  consumer  protection  law.  For  example, 
just  as  other  industries  resorted  to  fine  print  to  hide  the  unsavory  aspects  of  their 
products,5 so too do adware vendors often turn to lengthy texts, scroll boxes, or eu-
phemisms  to  ‘‘disclose’’  key  effects  of  their  software.6 Similarly,  just  as  door-to-door 
salesmen made misleading claims to get consumers to let them in—literally, to ‘‘get 
a  foot  in  the  door’’ 7—so  too  do  adware  vendors  invoke  deceptive  campaigns  to  try 
to  attract  interest  in  their  products.8 That  the  truth  is  (in  some  way)  made  known 
prior  to  purchase  (or  installation)  is  no  defense:  Once  a  vendor  has  resorted  to  de-
ception,  caselaw  indicates  that  the  deception  cannot  be  cured  through  a  (supposed) 
corrective  disclosure.  Legislation  ought  to  consider  these  myriad  deceptive  prac-
tices—including anticipating that practices will continue to change as tricksters find 
new ways to deceive unsuspecting users. 
The Deeper Problem: Imposing Negative Externalities on Others 

In  my  view,  spyware  and  adware  legislation  should  also  consider  the  substantial 

negative externalities that such programs impose on others. 

For  example,  spyware  and  adware  impose  large  costs  on  ISPs,  computer  makers, 
and software developers. In practice, users often turn to their ISPs and/or computer 
makers  for  assistance  with  problems  caused  by  spyware  and  adware.  Meanwhile, 
independent  software  makers  must  consider  how  their  software  interacts  with 
spyware  or  adware  unexpectedly  on  a  user’s  computer—adding  additional  com-
plexity and unpredictability. 

Spyware  and  adware  cause  further  harm  to  the  Internet’s  infrastructure  and  to 
Internet users generally—even users who are not themselves infected with spyware 
or  adware.  As  much  as  half  of  spam  now  comes  from  ‘‘zombie’’  infections.9 Even  if 
you  keep  your  computer  clean,  others  may  not—and  their  computers  may  be  used 
to send you spam. 

Furthermore,  spyware  and  adware  often  attempt  to  defraud  online  advertisers— 
typically  by  claiming  to  show  ads  that  were  never  actually  shown,  or  by  showing 
ads  that  users  never  agreed  to  receive.  My  research  has  uncovered  spyware  and 
adware  performing  click  fraud—automatically  activating  pay-per-click  advertise-
ment links where advertisers are only supposed to pay if a user specifically and in-
tentionally clicks such links.10 Spyware and adware even interfere with advertising 
strategies  widely  perceived  to  present  a  lower  risk  of  fraud.  For  example,  some  ad-
vertisers  pay  advertising  commissions  only  upon  a  user’s  purchase—protecting 
against  click  fraud.11 But  pay-per-purchase  advertisers  can  nonetheless  be  tricked 
by spyware and adware. For example, spyware and adware popups sometimes claim 
commissions on purchases they actually did nothing to facilitate.12 

4 See  e.g., 

‘‘Debunking  Zango’s 

‘Content  Economy.’ ’’  http://www.benedelman.org/news/ 

052808-1.html. 

5 See e.g., Ha¨agen-Dazs Co., 119 F.T.C. 762 (1995) (challenging effectiveness of fine-print foot-
note  modifying  ‘‘98  percent  fat  free’’  claim  for  frozen  yogurt  products  that  were  not  low  in  fat). 

6 See e.g., ‘‘Gator’s EULA Gone Bad.’’ http://www.benedelman.org/news/112904-1.html. 
7 See  e.g.,  Encyclopedia  Britannica,  87  F.T.C.  421  (1976),  aff’d,  605  P.2d  964  (7th  Cir.  1979), 

cert. denied, 445 U.S. 934 (1980) (rejecting ‘‘deceptive door opener’’ sales pitches). 

8 See  e.g.,  ‘‘Zango  Practices  Violating  Zango’s  Recent  Settlement  with  the  FTC’’  (heading 
‘‘Widespread  Zango  Banner-Based  Installations  without  Unavoidable,  Prominent  Disclosure  of 
Material Terms (XP SP2)’’) (supra). 

9 Xie  et  al.,  ‘‘How  Dynamic  Are  IP  Addresses?’’  http://research.microsoft.com/projects/sgps/ 

sigcomm2007.pdf. 

‘‘CPA.’’ 

052107-1.html. 

10 ‘‘The Spyware—Click-Fraud Connection.’’ http://www.benedelman.org/news/040406-1.html. 
11 These  pay-per-purchase  advertising  systems  are  also  known  as  cost-per-acquisition  or 

12 See  e.g.,  ‘‘Spyware  Still  Cheating  Merchants  . . .’’  http://www.benedelman.org/news/ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

33 

In  short,  spyware  and  adware  make  the  Internet  a  place  where  ISPs  and  com-
puter  makers  incur  unexpected  costs  they  must  ultimately  pass  back  to  customers; 
where  even  those  who  keep  their  computers  safe  nonetheless  suffer  from  the  infec-
tions  that  plague  others;  where  advertisers  cannot  feel  confident  in  the  leads  they 
pay  to  receive.  The  resulting  costs  make  the  Internet  a  weaker  platform  on  which 
to do business, to all our detriment. 
How to Stop the Problems of Spyware and Adware 

Unlike  the  viruses  of  prior  decades,  spyware  and  adware  tend  to  be  created  by 
business enterprises—groups that design this unwanted software, foist it onto users’ 
computers,  and  reap  the  rewards.  The  appropriate  response:  Find  the  perpetrators 
and hold them accountable. 

The  past  4  years  have  brought  considerable  progress  in  identifying  spyware  and 
adware purveyors, and holding them accountable for what they have done. The New 
York  Attorney  General’s  office  brought  the  first  major  case  against  a  spyware  ven-
dor,  Intermix,  whose  KeenValue,  IncrediFind,  and  other  programs  were  widely  in-
stalled on users’ computers without any consent at all, and also without meaningful, 
informed  consent.  Subsequent  litigation  has  pursued  a  variety  of  other  vendors, 
with  cases  brought  by  the  FTC,  the  City  of  Los  Angeles,  and  Attorneys  General  in 
New  York,  South  Carolina,  Texas,  and  Washington.  Several  class  actions  have  also 
challenged nonconsensual and deceptive installations.13 

The  prospect  of  similar  litigation  has  pushed  some  spyware  and  adware  vendors 
to  substantially  cease  operations.  For  example,  in  the  face  of  litigation  against  sev-
eral  of  its  competitors,  Manhattan-based  eXact  Advertising  shut  its  ‘‘adware’’  busi-
ness,  thereby  ceasing  the  nonconsensual  installation  of  its  software  that  had  pre-
viously been so prevalent. 

Yet litigation has not stopped the deceptive practices of all vendors. Consider the 
actions  of  Bellevue,  Washington-based  Zango,  Inc.  During  an  FTC  investigation  of 
its  practices,  Zango  stopped  its  partners  from  placing  its  software  on  users’  com-
puters without first obtaining user consent. But despite its settlement with the FTC, 
Zango  continues  installations  that  are  predicated  on  deception.  For  example,  Zango 
continues  to  solicit  installations  via  fake-user  interface  banner  advertisements 
which  deceptively  masquerade  as  bona  fide  messages  from  software  already  on  a 
user’s computer.14 Moreover, despite a settlement requirement that every Zango ad-
vertisement  be  ‘‘clearly  and  prominently’’  identified  with  the  name  of  the  program 
that  delivered  that  ad,  some  Zango  advertising  toolbars  still  lack  the  required 
label.15 

More generally, experience and economic intuition confirm the need for tough liti-
gation  to  adequately  deter  sophisticated  corporate  wrongdoers.  At  present,  FTC  ac-
tions  typically  seek  disgorgement  of  ill-gotten  gains.  But  effective  deterrence  re-
quires  a  penalty  that  exceeds  disgorgement,  since  investigation  and  litigation  are 
less  than  certain.  (Otherwise,  a  rational  perpetrator  would  proceed  in  expectation 
of sometimes getting to keep the proceeds.) Experience shows inadequate deterrence 
to  be  a  real  problem.  Consider  the  FTC’s  $1.5  million  settlement  with 
DirectRevenue—letting  the  company’s  principals  retain  $20  million  of  ill-gotten 
gains. As FTC Commissioner Leibowitz pointed out in his dissent to that settlement, 
spyware purveyors ought not reap windfalls from their deceit. To that end, I support 
the  bill’s  granting  of  a  fine  of  three  times  the  amount  otherwise  available.  (Sec. 
7(b)(1).) 

Increasingly, purveyors of spyware and adware are not major U.S. companies that 
investigators  can  easily  locate.  Instead,  surviving  vendors  tend  to  reside  abroad,  or 
at least tend to attempt to hide their true location. Despite their far-flung location, 
these  vendors  sometimes  cause  even  more  harm  than  American  counterparts— 
seemingly  taking  greater  liberties  with  users’  computers  on  the  view  that  they  are 
beyond  prosecutorial  reach.  Legislation  ought  to  seek  to  disrupt  these  businesses 
and  limit  the  harm  they  cause.  In  my  view,  the  most  promising  approach  comes 
through financial investigations: Although they’re off-shore, these vendors still want 
to make money, and their primary revenue sources remain U.S. advertisers and ad 
networks. The New York Attorney General has already pursued selected advertisers 

13 See e.g., Sotelo v. DirectRevenue LLC, No. 05 C 2562 (N.D. Ill. Aug. 29, 2005). 
14 See e.g., ‘‘Zango Practices Violating . . .’’ (heading ‘‘Widespread Zango Banner-Based Instal-
lations  without  Unavoidable,  Prominent  Disclosure  of  Material  Terms  (XP  SP2)’’)  (supra).  More 
recent (May 2008) proof on file. 

15 See  e.g.,  ‘‘Zango  Practices  Violating  Zango’s  Recent  Settlement  with  the  FTC’’  (heading 
‘‘Unlabeled  Ads—Toolbars,  Desktop  Icons,  and  Pop-Ups’’).  http://www.benedelman.org/ 
spyware/zango-violations/. May 2008 proof on file. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

34 

that  intentionally  purchased  large  amounts  of  ‘‘adware’’  advertising.16 It  would  be 
little stretch to pursue advertisers and ad networks that intentionally fund remain-
ing spyware vendors. 
Specific Concerns in the Legislation at Hand 

Let  me  now  turn  to  S.  1625,  my  specific  suggestions,  and  some  areas  of  concern. 
S.  1625  Risks  Setting  Low  Standards  that  Do  Little  to  Protect  Against 

Remaining ‘‘Adware’’ 

S. 1625 rightly prohibits a range of outrageous and extreme behaviors. For exam-
ple, it would be hard to defend the ‘‘endless loop popups’’ prohibited by Sec. 3(1)(D). 
But it is possible to skirt the bill’s prohibitions while causing consumers substan-
tial  harm  and  continuing  the  same  practices  traditionally  associated  with  spyware 
and adware. Rather than showing so many popups that a user ‘‘cannot close the ad-
vertisements  without  turning  off  the  computer’’  (Sec.  3(1)(D)),  a  program  might 
show  one  popup  per  minute—still  a  substantial  intrusion,  yet  nowhere  proscribed 
by S. 1625 as it stands. Similarly, rather than tracking the specific information pro-
hibited  under  Sec.  4(a),  a  program  might  monitor  ‘‘only’’  a  user’s  name,  street  ad-
dress,  phone  number,  and  all  web  searches  conducted.  Although  remarkably  intru-
sive,  such  tracking  is  seemingly  permitted  under  Sec.  4.  Thus,  S.  1625’s  approach 
creates a serious risk that spyware and adware vendors can continue business sub-
stantially as usual. 

Moreover,  spyware  and  adware  vendors  are  likely  to  attempt  to  use  any  Federal 
legislation as a ‘‘shield’’ to deflect criticism of their practices. Indeed, Zango already 
invokes  its  settlement  with  the  FTC  as  a  supposed  indicator  of  endorsement.  Last 
year,  Zango  staff  wrote  to  security  vendors  to  say  Zango  has  received  ‘‘certification 
with  the  FTC.’’ 17 More  recently,  Zango  claimed  that  security  vendors  ought  not 
block or remove Zango software because if Zango’s software were harmful, ‘‘the FTC 
would  not  have  entered  into  a  consent  agreement  permitting  Zango  to  market  that 
software.’’ 18 Far  from  setting  a  minimum  standard  that  vendors  will  aspire  to  ex-
ceed, this bill thus risks creating a new supposed ‘‘certification’’ (or other low stand-
ard)  that  vendors  may  invoke  as  a  defense  against  allegations  of  impropriety.  As 
a  result,  weak  legislation  could  actually  make  the  spyware  and  adware  problem 
worse. 

Prohibiting  the  full  spectrum  of  deceptive  adware  would  require  substantial  re-
working of S. 1625. Rather than prohibiting a lengthy list of specific bad acts, a re-
write would probably begin with basic consumer protection fundamentals, e.g., that 
software must only be installed on a user’s computer after clear and prominent dis-
closure as well as meaningful consent. 

If  S.  1625  is  to  retain  its  present  approach,  a  partially-responsive  revision  would 
add  a  preface  or  other  comment  to  explicitly  confirm  the  Committee’s  intention— 
that compliance with S. 1625, in and of itself, does not assure that software is eth-
ical,  effective,  desirable,  or  even  useful.  I  realize  that  such  an  addition  may  seem 
vacuous—for  of  course  the  bill  does  not  aspire  to  define  what  software  is  desirable 
or  useful.  But  as  the  bill  stands,  adware  vendors  are  virtually  certain  to  attempt 
to invoke S. 1625 defensively—claiming that their software must be desirable since 
it  meets  the  bill’s  requirements.  An  appropriate  preface  could  prevent  that  unwel-
come strategy. 
S. 1625 Should Protect Security Vendors Assisting Users 

Security  vendors  face  a  barrage  of  complaints  and,  in  some  instances,  litigation 
claiming  that  security  firms  err  in  removing  harmful  or  deceptive  software  from 
users’  computers.  See  e.g.  Zango,  Inc.  v.  Kaspersky  Lab,  Inc.  and  New.net  v. 
Lavasoft. Federal anti-spyware legislation offers a natural context in which to grant 
Good  Samaritan  protection  to  computer  security  software—immunizing  the  efforts 
of  bona  fide  security  vendors,  in  the  ordinary  course  of  business,  to  identify,  block, 
and/or  remove  software  users  reasonably  view  as  objectionable.  S.  1625  could  and 
should include such an immunization. 
S. 1625 Should Not Preempt Tougher State Laws 

As it stands, S. 1625 preempts tougher state laws. Given S. 1625’s limited prohibi-
tions—a  list  of  some  specific  bad  acts,  rather  than  a  comprehensive  framework  for 
effective notice and consent—such preemption seems unwarranted. 

16 Assurances  of  Discontinuance—Cingular,  Priceline,  Travelocity.  http://www.oag.state.ny.us 

/press/2007/jan/adware-scannedAODs.pdf. 

17 Forwarded e-mail on file in my possession. 
18 Reply Brief of Appellant. Zango, v. Kaspersky Lab. U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Cir-

cuit. No. 07–35800. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

35 

In  particular,  S.  1625  leaves  ample  room  for  states  to  do  more  to  protect  their 
consumers. For example, states could identify additional specific bad acts that ought 
not be permitted. Alternatively, states could identify alternative methods of enforce-
ment—perhaps  private  litigation  by  those  who  are  harmed  (be  they  consumers, 
websites,  computer  makers,  advertisers,  ad  networks,  or  otherwise).  With  so  much 
room  for  innovation  to  further  address  these  important  problems,  I  see  no  proper 
basis for preemption of state legislation. 
A Simplified Bill Could Increase Penalties while Avoiding Other Questions 
A  simplification  of  S.  1625  would  strike  all  language  except  authorization  of  in-
creased penalties. The treble fine in Sec. 7(b) would apply to all FTC actions under 
existing legislation, pertaining to software installed on a user’s computer that tracks 
user  characteristics  or  activities,  or  that  shows  advertising.  This  dramatic  sim-
plification would relieve the Committee from the challenging questions of what spe-
cific behaviors to prohibit, and would side-step all the concerns identified in my tes-
timony. Yet this revision would offer major benefits—letting the FTC better sanction 
and deter perpetrators. I urge the Committee to consider this approach. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr. Weafer? 

STATEMENT OF VINCENT WEAFER, VICE PRESIDENT, 

SECURITY RESPONSE, SYMANTEC CORPORATION, ON BEHALF 

OF THE BUSINESS SOFTWARE ALLIANCE (BSA) 

Mr.  WEAFER.  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Committee:  Thank 

you very much for the opportunity to testify. 

Let  me  start  with  a  question  that  was  raised  earlier,  which  is 
how large is the problem. If we look at spyware and malicious code 
in  general,  there  is  about  1.8  million  pieces  of  unique  code.  Now, 
that’s  a  large  number,  but  if  you  remember  that  about  800,000  of 
those  malicious  codes  came  in  all  of  last  year,  so  if  you  look  at  all 
the previous years last year represented the vast majority of those 
pieces of spyware and malicious code. In the first 6 months of this 
year, we’ve already surpassed what we saw last year, in 2007. 

Looking  another  way,  we  did  a  survey  of  people’s  machines 
where  we  looked  and  we  found  about  57,000  unique  pieces  of  files 
on their machine—Office, Windows, operating system files. 65 per-
cent  of  those  files  were  deemed  to  be  potentially  malicious  or 
spyware on their machines. 

The  Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development 
has  estimated  that  something  like  95  million  U.S.  people  are  sit-
ting  with  spyware  on  their  machines.  It’s  a  large  problem  and  it’s 
still  growing.  Now,  this  includes  not  just  the  grey  actors,  but  also 
the  black  actors,  the  criminalization  that’s  occurring  very  much  at 
the moment as well. 

In terms of S. 1625, one of the areas we definitely want to focus 
on  is  on  the  focus  of  behavior,  not  technologies.  So  we  certainly 
want  to  prohibit  bad  conduct  rather  than  pick  certain  technologies 
and  say  this  act  is  good  or  this  is  bad,  because  that  frequently 
forms  a  low  bar  for  companies  that  try  and  target  or  simply  raise 
themselves to that minimum level and say: We’re certified. 

Second, we do want to include our support for the legislation, the 
so-called Good Samaritan portion. So a Federal court recently ruled 
in  the  Kaspersky  case  that  the  Communications  Decency  Act  gives 
such protection to providers of anti-spyware solutions. 

Now,  we’re  not  seeking  unlimited  protection.  In  fact,  we  believe 
the  legislative  codification  of  Kaspersky  could  include  language  re-
quiring good faith as well as a fair and effective dispute resolution 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

36 

process.  There  should  be  a  process,  it  should  be  fair,  it  should  be 
open. That’s what we’re looking for as part of this provision. 

We  also  want  to  commend  you  for  including  in  your  bill  a  provi-
sion  for  allowing  perfectly  legitimate  activities,  such  as  the  detec-
tion and prevention of unauthorized use of the software. This is es-
sential to our industry, the software industry, because fraud or pi-
racy  also  includes  almost  $50  billion  in  damage  every  year.  So  we 
believe this is also an important part. 

I’ll  keep  my  remarks  short  and  just  thank  you  very  much  for 

your time. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Weafer follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF VINCENT WEAFER, VICE PRESIDENT, SECURITY RESPONSE, 
SYMANTEC CORPORATION ON BEHALF OF THE BUSINESS SOFTWARE ALLIANCE (BSA) 
Mr. Chairman, Mr. Ranking Member, Members of the Committee, good afternoon. 
Thank you very much for the opportunity to testify here today. My name is Vincent 
Weafer  and  I  am  Vice  President  of  Security  Response  at  Symantec  Corporation.  I 
will be testifying today on behalf of the Business Software Alliance (BSA). 

Symantec is one of the world’s leading software companies. We are headquartered 
in  Cupertino,  California,  operate  in  40  countries  worldwide  and  have  more  than 
17,500  employees.  Symantec’s  mission  is  to  help  individuals  and  enterprises  assure 
the security, availability, and integrity of their electronic information. As the global 
leader in information security, we protect more people from online threats than any-
one  in  the  world.  Symantec  offers  our  customers  products  that  detect  and  remove 
spyware  and  harmful  adware,  and  our  Norton  brand  of  products  is  the  worldwide 
leader in consumer security and problem-solving solutions. 

The Business Software Alliance (www.bsa.org) 1 is the foremost organization dedi-
cated  to  promoting  a  safe  and  legal  digital  world.  BSA  is  the  voice  of  the  world’s 
commercial software industry and its hardware partners before governments and in 
the international marketplace. Its members represent one of the fastest growing in-
dustries in the world. BSA programs foster technology innovation through education 
and  policy  initiatives  that  promote  copyright  protection,  cyber  security,  trade  and 
e-commerce. 

It is a pleasure to be here today to discuss the serious issue of cyber security: pro-
tecting  millions  of  computer  users  from  those  who  maliciously  install  software  on 
computers  to  compromise  and  steal  sensitive,  personal  information.  Such  software 
goes by the name of ‘‘spyware.’’ Mr. Chairman, I commend you and your colleagues, 
Senator  Boxer  and  Senator  Nelson  for  your  leadership  in  addressing  this  invasive 
and deceptive practice through the Counter Spy Act (S. 1625). 

Today, I would like to make three points: 

First,  spyware  and  harmful  adware  represent  a  critical  threat  to  security  and 
privacy on the Internet. It is a threat that must be met and defeated. 
Second,  legislation  can  and  should  play  an  important  role.  We  urge  the  Com-
mittee  to  consider  language  which  focuses  on  the  malicious  intent  behind  this 
reprehensible  behavior,  not  ‘‘bad’’  technological  tools  like  computers,  software 
and the Internet. We want to work with you to ensure that anti-spyware legis-
lation  moving  through  Congress  targets  reprehensible  behavior  and  avoids  the 
trap of defining ‘‘good’’ or ‘‘bad’’ technology. 
Third,  we  believe  that  legislation  should  contain  specific  provisions  to  ensure 
that  developers  of  anti-spyware  tools  can  protect  their  customers  without  fear 
of threats and legal harassment. 
And  fourth,  we  commend  you  for  including  in  your  bill  a  provision  clarifying 
that security and anti-piracy activities are not in fact spyware. 

What Threat Are We Facing? 

Mr. Chairman, we commend you for your leadership in addressing the real threat 

and grave threat of spyware and harmful adware. 

1 BSA members include Adobe, Apple, Autodesk, Avid, Bentley Systems, Borland, CA, Cadence 
Design  Systems,  Cisco  Systems,  CNC  Software/Mastercam,  Corel,  Dell,  EMC,  HP,  IBM,  Intel, 
McAfee,  Microsoft,  Monotype  Imaging,  PTC,  Quark,  Quest  Software,  SAP,  Siemens  PLM  Soft-
ware, SolidWorks, Sybase, Symantec, Synopsys, and The MathWorks. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

37 

Spyware  and  harmful  adware  are  stand-alone  programs  that  can  monitor  system 
activity  and  either  relay  the  information  back  to  another  computer  or  hold  it  for 
subsequent retrieval. 

Spyware programs are placed on a user’s system—often times without the knowl-
edge  of  the  user—in  order  to  steal  confidential  information,  such  as  usernames, 
passwords  and  credit  card  details.  This  can  be  done  through  keystroke  logging,  or 
capturing e-mail and instant messaging traffic. Spyware is of particular concern be-
cause of its potential for use in identity theft and fraud. 

A growing type of spyware is rogue anti-spyware/anti-virus applications. They de-
ceive  users  by  displaying  scary  warnings  about  the  computer  being  infected  with  a 
large  number  of  fake  threats,  and  then  ask  the  user  to  buy  the  software  to  fix  the 
problems.  Another  recent  trend  is  programs  that  attempt  to  use  the  license  agree-
ment  to  prevent  the  end-user  from  sending  any  portion  of  the  spyware  program  to 
anti-spyware companies. 

Harmful  adware  programs  capture  information  about  the  computer  usage  and 
Internet browsing habits of the user (such as websites visited and e-commerce pur-
chases made). They generate a deluge of disruptive ads, usually in the form of pop- 
up  windows,  on  the  computer’s  screen.  This  represents  a  potential  violation  of  pri-
vacy,  and  degrades  user  experience  and  computer  performance  by  bogging  down  a 
computer’s normal functions. 

How prevalent is the problem of spyware and harmful adware? 
Symantec  publishes  twice  a  year  the  Internet  Security  Threat  Report  (ISTR),  a 
comprehensive compilation of Internet threat data, which gives us a unique perspec-
tive on the prevalence of spyware. The ISTR includes analysis of network-based at-
tacks, a review of known vulnerabilities, and highlights of malicious code and addi-
tional  security  risks.  We  compile  our  data  from  more  than  24,000  sensors  moni-
toring  network  activity  in  over  180  countries,  as  well  as  information  compiled  from 
over  120  million  client,  server  and  gateway  systems  that  have  deployed  our 
antivirus products, and through the 25 million e-mail messages we filter for our cus-
tomers everyday. 

According  to  our  most  recent  Internet  Security  Threat  Report,  spyware  continues 
to be a serious security risk for consumers. The latest Internet Security Threat Re-
port released by Symantec in April 2008 reveals that Attackers have adopted stealth 
tactics  that  prey  on  end-users  on  individual  computers  via  the  World  Wide  Web, 
rather  than  attempting  high-volume  broadcast  attacks  to  penetrate  networks.  This 
may be because enterprise network attacks are now more likely to be discovered and 
shut  down,  whereas  specifically  targeted  malicious  activity  on  end-user  computers 
and/or websites is less likely to be detected. Site-specific vulnerabilities are perhaps 
the  most  telling  indication  of  this  trend.  During  the  last  6  months  of  2007,  there 
were  11,253  site-specific  cross-site  scripting  vulnerabilities  =  Cyber  criminals  con-
tinue to refine their attack methods in an attempt to remain undetected and to cre-
ate  global,  cooperative  networks  to  support  the  ongoing  growth  of  criminal  activity. 
Adware  and  spyware  continue  to  propagate,  according  to  the  ISTR.  At  the  begin-
ning  of  June  2008,  there  are  over  1.8  million  known  malware  and  security  risks 
with  the  majority  of  these  being  discovered  in  the  past  18  months.  In  the  last  6 
months  of  2007,  threats  to  confidential  information  made  up  68  percent  of  the  vol-
ume of the top malicious code samples. Malicious code can expose confidential infor-
mation  in  a  variety  of  ways,  including  exporting  user  and  system  data,  exporting 
e-mail  addresses,  recording  keystrokes  and  allowing  remote  malicious  access  to  a 
computer. At the same time, today’s attacks are more surreptitious than ever before, 
less likely to be detected rapidly, and more likely to have a direct impact on a user’s 
finances. 

As an illustration of the scale of the problem, a recent report by the Organization 
for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), estimates that 59 million users 
in the U.S. have spyware or other types of malware on their computers. 

In  summary,  spyware  and  harmful  adware  are,  quite  simply,  a  critical  threat  to 

our online security and privacy. It is wrong and it must be stopped. 
Ban Bad Behavior, not Technology 

Fortunately, the marketplace is responding to the need to address this challenge. 
Cyber security companies are investing heavily in newer generations of classifica-
tion,  behavioral  detection  and  white  listing  technologies  to  handle  the  increasing 
volume  and  variety  of  spyware  and  malicious  code  threats.  For  example,  Symantec 
creates  security  programs  that  watch  out  for  known  malicious  threats,  as  well  as 
unknown  software  that  exhibits  suspicious  characteristics.  Symantec  products  clas-
sify and categorize programs according to functionality. This allows a user to select 
an  acceptable  risk  level  and  detect  only  programs  that  fall  outside  the  user’s  own 
acceptable  limits  We  continually  add  new  definitions  and  new  defenses  to  address 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

38 

the ever evolving dangers in the Internet threat landscape such as worms, spyware, 
spam, and phishing. 

In  addition,  critical  technologies  such  as  web  browsers  are  being  revamped  with 
more security, as they increasingly become a focus for attacks. Web browser security 
is  particularly  important  because  browsers  come  in  contact  with  more  untrusted  or 
potentially hostile content than most other applications. 

We  believe  however  that,  in  addition  to  the  response  of  the  marketplace,  legisla-
tion  can  and  should  play  a  role.  Spyware  is  a  serious  online  threat  to  the  public 
interest.  As  you  have  recognized,  Mr.  Chairman,  this  threat  requires  Congress  to 
empower Federal agencies to enforce prohibitions that will help curb the scourge of 
spyware and harmful adware. 

We  want  to  work  with  you  to  ensure  that  legislation  moving  through  Congress 
targets reprehensible behavior, rather than attempts to define ‘‘good’’ or ‘‘bad’’ tech-
nology. 

We  believe  that  legislation  should  not  prohibit  specific  technologies.  Computers, 
software  and  the  Internet  are  tools  that  are  used  in  thousands  of  ways  to  enhance 
how  we  work,  study,  communicate  and  live.  These  tools  are  an  indispensable  part 
of our daily lives. The fact that a number of bad actors have figured out how to use 
these  tools  for  illegitimate  purposes  does  not  mean  the  tools  themselves  are  the 
cause of the harm. 

If technology was to be constrained or regulated, we would lose much of the rich-

ness and power that computing has brought to our modern lives. 

Let  me  put  it  a  different  way.  We  don’t  ban  crowbars  because  some  people  use 
them to break into houses. We don’t ban cars because some people use them to flee 
from the scene of a crime. 

Prohibiting conduct, rather than technology, avoids the danger of dictating the de-
sign and operation of computer software and hardware. Congress has wisely avoided 
imposing  a  number  of  technology  mandates  to  maintain  the  U.S.  technology  indus-
try  as  the  envy  of  the  world.  It  has  been  responsible  for  incredible  improvements 
in productivity, millions of jobs, billions of dollars in exports, and immense benefits 
to  every  consumer.  Government  intervention  that  replaces  marketplace  solutions 
with  governmental  decisions  endangers  America’s  technology  leadership.  It  hurts 
users of technology products by stifling innovation, freezing in place particular tech-
nologies, impairing product performance, and increasing consumer costs. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Symantec  and  other  BSA  member  companies  want  to  work  with 
you  and  your  staff  to  ensure  that  S.  1625  focuses  even  more  clearly  on  harmful  ac-
tivities,  rather  than  on  the  technology  that  is  misused  to  perform  these  activities. 
Currently,  S.  1625  includes  a  few  provisions  that  risk  affecting  legitimate  soft-
ware  and  Internet  functionalities,  and  thus  compromise  the  operations  of  today’s 
computers—as well as the direction of future technology. Let me give you just a few 
examples: 

• Section  3(1)(A)  prohibits  the  installation  of  software  that  transmits  or  relays 
commercial  electronic  mail.  This  would  constrain  the  development  and  use  of 
legitimate  and  innovative  methods  to  generate  and  send  electronic  communica-
tions; 
• Section  3(3)(B)  regulates  how  software  that  is  installed  on  a  computer  must  be 
named and where it must be located, and how it can be uninstalled. Again, this 
would constrain how legitimate software is deployed and operates. 

We believe the problems inherent in such an approach can be avoided if Congress 
instead  focuses  directly  on  the  behavior  we  are  trying  to  stop:  the  use  of  unfair  or 
deceptive  means  to  install  software  on  computers,  as  well  as  the  unauthorized  ac-
quisition,  use  or  commercialization  of  information  from  individuals.  This  is  for  ex-
ample what section 2 and section 4(a) of your bill do. We commend you for the inclu-
sion  of  such  provisions,  which  strike  at  the  heart  of  the  spyware  and  harmful 
adware problem and which we believe would be useful tools in the hands of enforce-
ment agencies. 

Such an approach significantly mitigates the risk that legislation may hamper or 
constrain  the  development  and  use  of  technology,  while  achieving  your  objective  of 
protecting  computer  users.  In  addition,  while  products  can  be  moved  offshore  and 
out  of  reach  of  our  laws,  the  collection  of  information  from  computers  within  our 
borders is a problem that we can more easily and effectively address. 
Enable  Anti-Spyware  Companies  to  Continue  to  Best  Protect  Computer 

Users 

Developers  of  anti-spyware  solutions  are  providing  effective  protection  to  com-
puter users against online threats. Unfortunately, they are threatened with lawsuits 
for defamation and interference with their business by spyware and harmful adware 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

39 

companies.  These  spurious  threats  force  anti-spyware  companies  to  divert  precious 
resources  to  fight  to  protect  themselves  in  Court.  This  is  intended  to  disrupt  and 
deter  the  development  of  tools  that  empower  consumers  to  stop  unwanted  software 
from being put on their computers. 

BSA  supports  including  in  anti-spyware  legislation  what  is  often  called  a  ‘‘Good 
Samaritan’’ provision. This would limit remedies against developers of anti-spyware 
tools. This would be far from unprecedented. In fact, Congress has repeatedly legis-
lated  targeted  protection  for  a  host  of  similarly  beneficial  activities,  such  as  chari-
table  food  donations,  the  use  of  Automated  External  Defibrillators,  or  liability  aris-
ing  from  sharing  information  about  the  Y2K  problem.2 Last  but  not  least,  in  June 
of  last  year  the  House  of  Representatives  supported,  by  an  overwhelming  majority 
of  368  to  48,  H.R.  964,  the  Spy  Act.  The  Spy  Act  includes  such  a  Good  Samaritan 
provision for anti-spyware activities. 

Mr. Chairman, I want to bring to your attention an important Federal court case, 
Zango v. Kaspersky. In August 2007, the U.S. District Court for the Western District 
of Washington ruled that the protection afforded by section 230(c)(2) of the Commu-
nications  Decency  Act  (CDA)  of  1996  (47  U.S.C.  230),  to  providers  of  solutions  that 
filter objectionable content, covers providers of anti-spyware solutions.3 

Mr. Chairman, we understand why a former Attorney General like yourself would 
exercise caution in limiting judicial remedies. In fact, we are not seeking unlimited 
protection.  We  fully  agree  that  good  faith  and  due  process  must  be  applied  by  an 
anti-spyware  provider  when  his  product  targets  a  software  application  for  removal 
by the computer user. 

We  believe  that  the  protection  provided  by  Congress  in  section  230(c)(2)  of  the 
CDA can only extend to software providers who are truly seeking to empower users 
to exercise control over objectionable content received over the Internet. This protec-
tion does not apply if they are pursuing, for example, fraudulent or anti-competitive 
objectives  (such  as  an  anti-spyware  company’s  product  blocking  the  installation  of 
a competitor’s security solution.) 

Mr.  Chairman,  BSA  believes  that  legislative  codification  of  the  Kaspersky  ruling, 
including language that requires good faith and fair and effective dispute resolution 
would in fact exceed the safeguards provided by the House when it passed H.R. 964 
last  year.  It  would  thus  provide  a  strong  foundation  for  the  Senate  to  work  with 
the House toward enactment of legislation, which is a priority that BSA shares with 
you. 
Security and Anti-Piracy Activities Are Not Spyware 

Mr.  Chairman,  before  I  conclude  my  testimony,  I  would  like  to  commend  you  for 
including  in  section  6(a)  of  your  bill  a  provision  allowing  legitimate  security  and 
anti-piracy activities. 

This  exemption  has  been  supported  at  the  Federal  and  state  levels  by  a  host  of 
technology  industry  organizations  representing  telecom  providers,  cable  companies, 
software  producers,  and  Internet  service  providers.  The  activities  in  question  are 
perfectly legitimate, such as diagnostics, network or computer security, repairs, net-
work management, etc. All these activities are conducted by network administrators 
to maintain and secure their systems. 

Section  6(a)  also  covers  the  detection  and  prevention  of  the  unauthorized  use  of 
software.  This  is  essential  to  our  industry’s  ability  to  protect  our  products  against 
theft. Software piracy results in almost $50 billion in losses to the software industry 
each  year,  including  more  than  $8  billion  in  the  U.S.  alone.  Given  these  massive 
losses,  it  is  absolutely  critical  that  companies  that  engage  in  otherwise  lawful  con-
duct  to  detect  or  prevent  piracy  or  other  unlawful  acts  are  not  unwittingly  subject 
to  liability  under  anti-spyware  laws.  Section  6(a)  is  narrowly  and  carefully  drafted 
to address this important goal. 

Certain  interest  groups  may  seek  to  drastically  weaken  or  delete  this  provision. 
They may claim that it creates a license to snoop on people’s computers, shut down 

2 The  Bill  Emerson  Good  Samaritan  Food  Donation  Act  (42  U.S.C.  1791)  precludes  civil  and 
criminal  liability  arising  from  food  donated  in  good  faith,  except  in  cases  of  gross  negligence  or 
intentional misconduct. The Cardiac Arrest Survival Act of 2000 (42 U.S.C. 238q) precludes civil 
liability  arising  from  any  harm  resulting  from  the  use  of  an  Automated  External  Defibrillator, 
except  where  there  was  no  proper  notification  of  emergency  personnel,  maintenance  of  the 
defibrillator or employee training. The Year 2000 Information and Readiness Disclosure Act (15 
U.S.C. 1) precludes liability arising from statements and disclosures regarding the Y2K problem, 
except in cases of recklessness or intent to deceive. 

3 Zango has appealed the ruling and BSA, as well as several other online consumer protection 
organizations  such  as  the  AntiSpyware  Coalition  (ASC),  the  Center  for  Democracy  and  Tech-
nology  (CDT)  and  the  Electronic  Frontier  Foundation  (EFF),  have  filed  an  Amicus  Brief  asking 
the Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit to affirm the District Court’s decision. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

40 

their  IT  networks,  or  circumvent  state  consumer  protection,  privacy,  and  contract 
laws. This is patently false. The provision does not go beyond limiting liability under 
your  bill,  and  it  limits  liability  under  your  bill  only.  Anyone  who  engages  in  an  act 
that  violates  any  other  Federal  or  state  law  is  and  will  remain  fully  liable  under 
those  laws.  The  purpose  of  weakening  this  provision  is  not  to  protect  against 
spyware,  but  to  make  it  harder  for  legitimate  companies  to  fight  piracy,  or  other 
fraudulent  or  illegal  activities.  The  laudable  anti-spyware  goals  of  the  Act  should 
not be subverted for this purpose. 

Thank you again for this opportunity to comment on the issue of spyware and the 

Counter Spy Act. I would be happy to answer any question you may have. 

Senator PRYOR. Well, thank you. 
Let  me  go  ahead  and  start  with  you,  Mr.  Weafer,  because  I  as-
sume  that  your  company  has  a  working  definition  of  spyware.  Do 
you have a definition of spyware? 

Mr. WEAFER. Yes, we do. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  as  I  understand  it,  the  Federal  Trade  Com-
mission  does  not  have  an  adequate  definition  of  spyware;  is  that 
right? 

Mr.  WEAFER.  That’s  right.  There  are  different  definitions  out 
there.  One  thing  we  have  done  as  an  industry  is  come  together  to 
try  and  create  a  common  definition  of  spyware.  So  we’re  part  of  a 
coalition, the Anti-Spyware Coalition. We have posted what we be-
lieve is a shared and fair assessment of what spyware is. 

Even  within  that  definition,  there  is  some  degree  of  what  is  in-
cluded,  what  is  considered  personally  identifiable  information.  We 
do  believe  there  are  fairly  good  standards  relating  to  what  is 
spyware and why the concern is there. 

Senator  PRYOR.  So  is  there  then  an  industry  consensus  on  what 

spyware is and what it’s not? 

Mr.  WEAFER.  We  believe  there  is,  even  though  there  is  probably 

some differences or subtleties in the language themselves. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Do  we  have  that  definition?  Have  you  provided 

that to the Committee? 

Mr. WEAFER. If we haven’t, we will provide. 
Senator  PRYOR.  That  would  be  great  because  I  think  that  would 

be helpful for us. 

If I may, Mr. Edelman, it sounds like you spend a lot of time try-
ing to figure out what’s out there and you know how it infects peo-
ple’s  computers  and  what  it  does.  Tell  me  what  you’re  seeing  out 
there, two or three of the most prevalent forms of spyware that are 
currently infiltrating people’s computers? 

Dr. EDELMAN. Well, it’s easy to be complacent and think that the 
problem  of  unwanted  pop-up  ads  is  over.  That’s  not  what  I  see  in 
testing  the  sorts  of  websites  where  users  get  infected.  I  still  see 
plenty  of  websites  that  will  fill  your  computer  with  pop-ups  and 
make  money  from  those  pop-ups  through  the  biggest  American  ad 
networks out there. Maybe I shouldn’t name any names today, but 
you can imagine the sort of advertising intermediaries who fund all 
kinds of behavior on the web and, remarkably, continue to fund the 
pop-ups that users so despise. 

Separate  from  that,  there  are  so-called  market  research  compa-
nies  that  track  users’  behavior  in  great  detail—every  website  you 
visit, every search you make, every product you buy, every product 
you look at but don’t buy. That’s a little spooky to me, frankly. I’m 
not  sure  I  want  those  records  about  me  kept  anywhere.  What  if  it 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

41 

gets  hacked?  You  know,  what  if  that  goes  on  the  web  somewhere 
and everyone can see it? 

Beyond  that,  I  do  see  serious  criminal  enterprises  taking  over 
users’  computers,  using  them  to  send  spam.  I  have  to  defend  my 
computer  so  that  when  I  allow  my  computer  to  be  infected  by 
spyware,  it  doesn’t  go  around  sending  spam.  So  there’s  a  little  bit 
of complication even for me just in safely testing the software. 

Denial  of  service  attacks.  Often  you’ll  see  programs  that  take 
over  a  user’s  computer  and  use  it  to  attack  some  other  computer. 
All  of  these  behaviors  still  remain  prevalent,  the  same  kinds  of 
problems  we  were  talking  about  2  years  ago,  3  years  ago,  4  years 
ago  still  occurring,  albeit  some  of  them  somewhat  harder  to  track 
down. 

Senator  PRYOR.  You  mentioned  that  you  go  to  the  types  of 
websites  that  will  contain  spyware.  What  types  of  websites  typi-
cally expose people to spyware? 

Dr.  EDELMAN.  Well,  it  can  happen  anywhere.  You  know,  histori-
cally  there  have  been  examples  even  of  mainstream  news  sites 
being  hacked  so  that  they  would  distribute  spyware.  But  the  sites 
that  I  find  the  most  reliable  tend  to  be  second-tier  entertainment 
sites. There’s a wrestling site that is awfully effective at giving me 
spyware,  with  no  offense  intended  to  those  who  like  professional 
wrestling,  but  this  site  isn’t  the  one  to  go  to.  Again,  I’ll  leave  it 
unnamed. 

Sites and programs that provide assistance in downloading copy-
righted  music  and  videos,  sometimes  massive  copyright  infringe-
ment  frankly.  You  go  to  a  site  that  purports  to  provide  assistance 
in that regard and then you might or might not get the copyrighted 
material  you  were  seeking,  but  in  any  event  your  computer  would 
be  destroyed,  which  certainly  wasn’t  part  of  the  bargain  that  you 
were expecting. 

But  again,  it  can  happen  anywhere  and  so  we  should  not  paint 
a picture of victims as somehow having brought this on themselves. 
Maybe  in  a  few  instances  that’s  the  case,  but  as  a  general  rule 
that’s really not true. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Edelman,  in  your  experience  and  in  your 

opinion, is there any legitimate use for spyware? 

Dr.  EDELMAN.  The  programs  that  people  call  spyware  are  such 
a  broad  swath  of  programs,  it’s  hard  even  to  answer  the  question 
crisply.  Is  there  any  legitimate  use  for  a  program  that  takes  over 
a user’s computer and uses it to send unsolicited commercial e-mail 
to a variety of recipients who never asked for it, without telling the 
user  that  their  computer  would  be  so  used?  Absolutely  not.  How 
about  a  program  that  monitors  what  you’re  doing  and  shows  pop- 
up  ads?  You  know,  some  marketers  say  that  that  could  be  useful. 
You  didn’t  know  that  American  Airlines  existed  until  you  went  to 
United.com and up came an ad for American Airlines, which, to be 
clear,  they  would  never  do  because  they  are  good  advertisers  and 
are actually very careful about that sort of thing. 

In  principle,  it  could  be  good  for  competition,  I  guess,  to  have 
pop-ups  telling  users  about  alternatives.  But  in  practice  I’m  pretty 
suspicious.  I  think  these  pop-ups  tend  to  promote  software  and 
services  that  users  don’t  really  want.  If  they  want  them  they  al-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

42 

ready know about them and no one wants to be interrupted by that 
sort of thing. So I don’t see a lot of use for it. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Cerasale,  are  there  legitimate  purposes,  le-

gitimate uses for spyware? 

Mr.  CERASALE.  Well,  again  the  term  ‘‘spyware’’  means  lots  of 
things.  Clearly,  taking  over  someone’s  computer  and  so  forth,  is 
just  not  allowed.  That’s  spyware,  bad  stuff.  But  certain  toolbars, 
plug-ins, and web browsers, those types of things going on people’s 
computers clearly are things that individuals want and so forth. 

Looking at the definition of trying to be any kind of software, you 
even  have  requirements  for  e-mail  notices.  There  are  things  called 
web  beacons  that  are  computer  code,  software  code,  to  tell  people 
whether  or  not  an  e-mail  has  been  opened.  Some  of  those  things 
are  used,  for  example,  if  there  is  a  compelled  e-mail  notice  to  en-
sure  that  you  have  informed  individuals  of  this  notification.  Those 
kinds  of  web  beacons  and  things  of  that  sort  are  definitely  helpful 
and helpful to meet legal requirements. 

So  the  definition—as  you  look  at  definition  of  what  is  spyware, 
and actually as you go down further, the definition of what is soft-
ware,  becomes  very,  very  complicated.  We  have  to  be  careful  with 
that.  If  you  look  at  the  attachment  to  my  testimony,  the  DMA 
Guidelines,  we  have  a  thing  on  the  bottom,  this  does  not  include 
cookies  or  similar  types  of  software,  because  we  had  difficulty  try-
ing to define this. 

As we go further along with new technology, I think just defining 
software  becomes  a  major  problem.  There  are  things  that  go  on 
people’s computers that can be easily defined as software, that are 
advantageous to them. Now, our guidelines would say you’ve got to 
allow  me  to  take  it  off  if  I  suddenly  don’t  want  it.  But  that’s  the 
kind of thing that we think is—there are some legitimate uses for. 
There  are  major,  major  illegitimate  uses  for  it  that  are  already 
illegal.  Many  of  the  things  that  have  been  said  here  are  already 
under  Section  5  of  the  FTC  Act,  would  be  barred  in  its  own  right. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Does  the  Direct  Marketing  Association  have  a 

good and working definition of spyware? 

Mr. CERASALE. We do not. If you look at that, the attachment to 
my  testimony,  we  just  talk  about  computer  software,  ‘‘install  soft-
ware  or  other  similar  technology,’’  because  we  don’t  know  what’s 
coming  next,  and  then  define  some  of  the  bad  practices.  So  that’s 
what we’ve done, and then defining if you’re going to put this soft-
ware or similar technology on someone’s computer with notice, easy 
to  uninstall,  you  have  to  let  them  know  who  it  is  and  the  privacy 
policy.  That’s  the  way  we  had  to  go.  We  felt  that  trying  to  define 
software would in essence—was first of all very difficult to try and 
discern; but technology is going to change the definition of software 
as we move forward, and we want to—and I think that our decision 
was  to  focus  more  on  the  acts  and  try  and  stop  that,  no  matter 
what means was used for it. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Butler,  do  you  have  a  good  working  defini-
tion  of  spyware?  Do  you  differentiate  spyware  from  adware  and 
other types of software? 

Mr.  BUTLER.  To  us,  spyware  is  software  that  is  surreptitiously 
installed  on  someone’s  computer,  that  allows  the  outsider  to  inter-
cept or to seize even partial control over the user’s interaction with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

43 

the  computer,  without  that  user’s  informed  consent.  Anything  that 
meets that definition we think is spyware. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Cerasale,  you  just  heard  his  definition.  You 
said  the  DMA  doesn’t  differentiate  between  different  types  of  soft-
ware,  but  based  on  that  definition  you  just  heard,  are  you  aware 
of  any  legitimate  purpose  for  that  type  of  software,  surreptitiously 
installed, et cetera, et cetera, like he said? 

Mr.  CERASALE.  As  our  guidance  says,  surreptitiously  installed 
would  violate  our  guidelines.  So  yes,  that  clearly  fits  within  where 
DMA  is.  I  think  the  one  exception  might  be  in  an  area  where  Mr. 
Butler and I would disagree, in areas of trying to look at anti-fraud 
areas, that that might be something where there may be an excep-
tion here. But not talking about that, looking at it from that score, 
his  definition,  surreptitiously  put  on,  would  violate  our  guidelines, 
so even without our definition. 

Senator PRYOR. Let me ask this also if I may, Mr. Cerasale. That 
is,  a  couple  of  the  witnesses  either  in  their  written  testimony  or 
what  they  said  here  today  encouraged  us  to  focus  on  behavior,  not 
technology. 

Mr. CERASALE. Correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Is  that  where  the  direct  marketers  are  as  well? 
Mr. CERASALE. I believe so, yes. 
Senator PRYOR. Because the technology will change, but we know 
that  the  type  behavior  that  we  want  to  prevent,  presumably  we 
know the type of behavior we want to prevent, but the technology— 
there are lots of different ways to get there; is that fair? 

Mr.  CERASALE.  That’s  fair,  and  it  may  be  tomorrow  it  will  be 

something new. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Butler, do you agree with that? 
Mr. BUTLER. I think so. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Because  I  think  what  Senator  Vitter  said  was 
that  he  was  concerned  about  the  definition  and  I  think  the  idea, 
if  I’m  hearing  the  panel  correctly,  is  that  if  you  have  a  definition 
that’s  really  based  on  a  technology  or  a  specific  process  of  some 
sort,  that  could  change  because  some  programmer  out  there  could 
change that tomorrow and the law we pass today could be obsolete. 
But  if  we  focus  on,  I  guess,  the  end  result  and  the  behavior  that 
we’re trying to prevent, then regardless of what technology gets us 
there, I think that gets us what we’re trying to do. 

Do you agree with that, Mr. Edelman? 
Dr.  EDELMAN.  I  think  that’s  fine  as  far  as  it  goes,  but  it’s  still 
possible  to  be  both  over-inclusive  and  under-inclusive  as  to  behav-
iors.  So  it’s  possible  to  write  a  list  of  20  bad  behaviors  and  miss 
three  other  behaviors  that  either  the  Committee  didn’t  notice  or 
they haven’t started yet, but will start next week. 

Similarly,  it’s  possible  for  there  to  be  some  behavior  for  which 
the  behavior  itself  is  neither  good  nor  bad;  it’s  the  deceptive  prac-
tice  of  that  behavior,  doing  it  in  a  way  that  has  a  tendency  to  de-
ceive,  based  on  the  totality  of  the  circumstances,  the  context,  the 
method  in  which  it  is  promoted,  the  nature  of  the  disclosure,  the 
nature of the consent procedure. 

So  the  suggestion  that  behavior  versus  technology  is  the  magic 
bullet  that  solves  the  bill’s  problems,  I’m  not  sure  it  gets  you  all 
the way there. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

44 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Rotenberg? 
Mr.  ROTENBERG.  Senator,  I’ve  worked  on  quite  a  lot  of  privacy 
bills  over  the  years  and  I  just  want  to  say  I  very  much  support 
your  approach.  By  way  of  example,  the  Federal  Privacy  Act,  the 
legislation that protects the privacy of citizens with respect to their 
records  held  by  Federal  agencies,  was  passed  more  than  30  years 
ago.  It  actually  said  almost  nothing  about  technology.  It  spoke 
about  the  collection  and  use  of  personal  data,  who  would  have  ac-
cess  to  it,  how  you  could  obtain  it,  and  what  the  penalties  would 
be. It still works today. 

By  comparison,  the  privacy  provisions  in  the  Cable  Communica-
tions Act of 1984, which are very good privacy provisions, was actu-
ally quite specific about the type of industry that would be covered. 
In 1984 there was a clear understanding of what the cable industry 
looked  like,  what  interactive  television  looked  like,  and  what  pri-
vacy protection would require. 

Well,  today  we  have  a  great  deal  of  interactive  media,  but  those 
provisions from 1984 no longer apply because they were too techno-
logically  specific.  So  I  think  we  need  to  focus  on  the  activity,  and 
of course I think it’s possible by means of committee report or other 
means to give some examples. You can say with respect to current 
business  practice,  we  want  to  prohibit  surreptitious  collection  of  a 
person’s  personal  data  without  their  consent,  and  an  example 
might  be,  and  then  we  can  talk  about  some  of  the  things  that  are 
taking place right now. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  I  would  hope  that  all  the  panelists  here 
would  help  us  as  we  work  on  this  bill  and  help  us  make  sure  we 
get  it  right,  because,  assuming  the  Senate  passes  this  and  the 
House passes it and the President signs it, we are trying to address 
this  problem,  and  a  wrong  definition  or  a  wrong  section  in  the  bill 
could totally undermine the purpose of what we’re trying to do. 

So I’d love to have all of you help us draft this. You all raise good 

points. 

Let me ask, if I may, let me ask Mr. Weafer about the cost asso-
ciated  with  a  consumer  having  spyware  on  his  computer  and  hav-
ing  to  do  something  to  get  rid  of  that  infection.  What  does  it  typi-
cally  cost  John  Q.  Public  out  there  when  he’s  on  his  computer? 
What  does  it  typically  cost  him  to  get  rid  of  the  spyware  once  it 
has infected his computer? 

Mr.  WEAFER.  There  is  two  parts  to  that  answer.  One  is  the  ac-
tual physical damage, for example having to go in and remove pop- 
ups,  unwanted  software,  which  can  range  in  terms  of  dollars  from 
hundreds  of  dollars  to  thousands  depending  on  how  many  ma-
chines,  whether  it’s  to  be  completely  re-imaged,  and  who’s  doing 
the work. 

The bigger, greater cost is really on the personal privacy. If data 
has  been  exposed  or  is  assumed  to  be  exposed,  then  the  cost  in 
terms  of  cleaning  up  their  identity,  their  privacy,  going  after  that, 
actually is very difficult to calculate. But I think that’s the greater 
concern and the greater danger to a lot of users. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Will  a  software  product  sold  by  Symantec  stop 
spyware  from  being  added  in  the  first  place  or  does  it  remove  it 
once it’s on there, or both? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

45 

Mr.  WEAFER.  It  tries  to  do  both.  So  first  of  all,  we’re  really  just 
trying  to  give  the  tools  to  the  end-users  to  identify  what’s  on  their 
machine. We classify according to large spyware, which is a general 
category  of  software,  including  actual  spyware,  remote  access  pro-
grams,  tracking  tools,  hacking  tools,  and  information,  preventing 
them getting on. They’re deemed to be high risk or low risk, to help 
the  user.  Then  if  they  are  on  the  system,  helping  them  remove 
them from the system itself. 

In  some  cases  we  can  actually  work  with  the  vendors.  If  they’ve 
got a reasonable uninstaller, we can actually just call that and that 
becomes  the  uninstallation.  For  some  of  the  more  malicious,  insid-
ious programs, we have to do it ourselves. 

Senator PRYOR. Symantec has a number of competitors out there 

that are offering spyware protection as well, right? 

Mr. WEAFER. That is correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  About  how  many  are  in  that  marketplace  right 
now  that  are  offering  anti-spyware  programs  or  software  of  some 
sort? 

Mr. WEAFER. There is at least 20 major vendors who are offering 

similar programs. 

Senator PRYOR. Which ones are the best? 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. WEAFER. Symantec. I’m a little bit biased toward the Norton 

brand. 

Senator PRYOR. I just couldn’t resist that one. 
But  nonetheless,  there  may  be  some  ways  for  some  computer 
users to get anti-spyware software free, but a lot of people have to 
pay  for  it  as  well.  It  kind  of  depends  on  your  situation.  So  defi-
nitely  there’s  a  lot  of  cost  associated  with  this,  not  just  to  the  ma-
chine but also to your personal situation. 

Mr.  Cerasale,  you  said  in  your  testimony  that  you  think  the  in-

dustry—you prefer self-regulation, is that right? 

Mr. CERASALE. That’s correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  when  I  hear  the  numbers  of  some  of  the 
statistics,  I  get  the  very  distinct  impression  that  self-regulation 
isn’t working. So do you disagree with me on that? 

Mr.  CERASALE.  I  do.  What  we  heard  a  lot  of  today  and  a  lot  of 
the  statistics  are  basically  criminal  activity,  activity  that  is  decep-
tive,  activity  that  already  violates  Section  5  of  the  Act  or  other 
criminal  codes.  Self-regulation  requires  law  enforcement  to  stop 
criminal activities. Self-regulation is not there and cannot be there 
to prevent criminal activity. 

I  think  the  area  we’re  looking  at  and  the  area  that  we’re  con-
cerned in is going after the bad guys, the criminals, and being care-
ful  to  protect  the  legitimate  uses  on  the  Internet  that  foster  com-
merce.  And  I  think  in  that  arena  self-regulation  works  well,  for 
DMA  members  to  have  to  follow  our  guidelines,  the  ability  for  us 
to  quickly  change  guidelines,  to  take  a  look  at  new  technologies 
when  they  come  up.  We  have  our  own  ethics  procedure  to  go  after 
and try and stop certain activities. 

I  think  in  that  arena  it  works.  It  does  not  work  in  the  criminal 
arena  and  we  don’t  intend  it  to,  and  we  want  you  to  give  the  FTC 
as much money as they can to go out and try and enforce it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

46 

Senator PRYOR. I do think one of the shortcomings of self-regula-
tion  is  something  you  alluded  to,  and  that  is  I  think  you  have  a 
lot of members who are acting responsibly and are out there trying 
to do the right thing and they’re legitimate companies trying to be 
in this for the long term. But not all direct marketers are members 
of  the  DMA  and  a  lot  of  them  don’t  acknowledge  or  recognize  or 
even consider your guidelines that you lay out. 

So this may be one of those situations where the good actors out 
there may have to undergo some additional regulation to try to get 
the bad actors out of the marketplace. 

Mr.  CERASALE.  We  have  supported  legislation  in  the  past,  such 
as  CAN–SPAM  and  in  other  areas,  where  we  felt  that  self-regula-
tion didn’t work, and we pledge and have in the past and continue 
to  work  with  you  on  this  legislation,  with  you  and  the  Committee 
on this legislation, and others in this area. 

Our  biggest  concern  is  unintended  consequences  hurting  legiti-

mate business and that’s where we want to work. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Weafer,  let  me  ask  another  question  of  you, 
and  that  is—we  have  heard  some  statistics  today  that  are  helpful, 
but  I’m  curious  about,  from  your  company’s  standpoint  and  just 
from  your  personal  research  and  your  experience,  is  spyware  a 
growing  problem?  Is  it  becoming  more  prevalent  or  less  prevalent? 
Mr. WEAFER. In my opinion, the broader aspect of spyware is ac-
tually  becoming  more  prevalent.  We’re  seeing  more  and  more 
spyware. Now, most of this is driven by the underground economy. 
A  lot  of  it  is  the  criminalization  of  this.  We’re  certainly  seeing  in 
many  cases  up  to  500  percent  year  over  year  increases  in  the 
amount and variety of this type of spyware coming out. 

We  are  continuing  to  see  the  shady  commercialization  as  well, 
which  are  programs  which  are  continuing  to  drive  pop-ups,  pro-
grams  which  are  continuing  to  be  fraudulent,  programs  which  are 
still not giving users control, consent, and notification. So we do ap-
plaud  the  self-regulation,  but  we  want  to  see  additional  remedies 
on top of that. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  I  agree  with  you.  I  think  that  that’s  what 
you’re seeing out there. I just know really anecdotally from talking 
to  people—just  as  an  example,  not  too  long  ago  I  was  talking  to 
someone about their computer and they were getting all these pop- 
ups.  They  were  getting  a  new  toolbar,  they  were  getting  all  this 
stuff,  and  they  didn’t  know  where  it  came  from  or  how  it  came  on 
there. 

It’s  very  frustrating  for  people.  For  most  people,  like  for  home 
use,  your  personal  computer  is  your  personal  property  and  you 
don’t want it to be infected and somehow damaged by other people, 
and  certainly  you  don’t  want  your  personal  information  out  there 
going to people that you don’t want to have it. 

So this is a serious problem. We do have this piece of legislation. 
All  of  you  pointed  out  your  thoughts  on  the  legislation,  even  some 
of the shortcomings of the legislation. We appreciate that. We take 
all of that as constructive criticism. 

What  we’re  going  to  do  is  we’re  going  to  take  our  legislation, 
we’re  going  to  talk  to  the  Members  of  the  Committee,  and  we’re 
going  to  see  if  we  can  help  shape  it  and  get  it  in  the  type  of  form 
where it’s ready to move and move through the system. And hope-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

47 

fully  some  time  in  the  next,  I  don’t  know,  several  months,  maybe 
the  next  year,  we’ll  have  a  very,  very  strong  piece  of  legislation, 
very bipartisan, to try to make a big difference in the marketplace. 
So  I  just  want  you  to  know  you’ve  been  a  very  important  part 
of  this  process  and  we  appreciate  you.  Like  I  said,  we  definitely 
would  appreciate  your  input  as  we  go  along,  and  always  feel  free 
to  share  your  opinions  or  give  us  your  insights  because  we  don’t 
claim the expertise here. We know who the experts are. 

So  with  that,  what  I’m  going  to  do  is  I’m  going  to  adjourn  the 
hearing here in just 1 minute. But first let me say that we’re going 
to  keep  the  record  open  and  Senators  may  have  additional  ques-
tions or follow-up questions. So we’ll get those to you and we’d love 
for  you  to  get  those  back  to  us.  We’ll  try  to  leave  the  record  open 
for  2  weeks,  so  if  you  could  get  those  back  to  us  as  quickly  as  you 
can. 

Also, if there are documents—I think someone mentioned a study 
or  some  statistics  or  whatever  it  may  be.  If  there  are  documents 
that  you  want  to  submit  for  the  record,  again  the  record  will  be 
open  for  2  weeks  and  just  get  that  to  Committee  staff  and  they’ll 
distribute it as it should be. 

So we appreciate your time, we appreciate you looking at the leg-
islation, and we appreciate your being here today. With that, we’re 
going to adjourn the hearing, and just say thank you. 

[Whereupon, at 4:28 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

San Francisco, CA, June 24, 2008 

TRUSTE 

Hon. MARK PRYOR, 
Chairman, 
Subcommittee on Consumer Affairs, Insurance, and Automotive Safety, 
U.S. Senate, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Chairman Pryor, 

I am writing to respectively request that this letter be added to the official record 
of the Senate Commerce Committee’s hearing on June 11, 2008 entitled ‘‘The Impact 
and Policy Implications of Spyware on Consumers and Businesses.’’ 

I  am  the  Vice  President  in  charge  of  legal  policy  and  compliance  matters  for 
TRUSTe.  We  are  an  independent,  nonprofit  organization  with  the  mission  of  ad-
vancing  privacy  and  trust  for  a  networked  world.  Through  long-term  supportive  re-
lationships with our licensees, extensive interactions with consumers in our Watch-
dog Dispute Resolution program, and with the support and guidance of many estab-
lished  companies  and  industry  experts,  TRUSTe  has  earned  a  reputation  as  the 
leader in promoting privacy policy disclosures, informed user consent, and consumer 
education. 

TRUSTe  applauds  the  Committee’s  work  on  the  issue  of  spyware.  We  have  long 
articulated  a  public  policy  for  privacy  protection  that  incorporates  the  strength  of 
government oversight, the discipline of industry self-governance, and the innovation 
of privacy-enhancing technology. 

In  his  testimony  before  the  Committee  on  June  11,  Jerry  Cerasale,  senior  vice 
president of government affairs for the Direct Marketing Association, referenced the 
self  regulatory  work  underway  to  develop  standards  for  downloadable  software.  He 
spoke of the work that TRUSTe has undertaken to develop a program of best prac-
tices.  I  would  like  to  tell  the  Committee  a  little  more  about  our  Trusted  Download 
Program. 

TRUSTe  has  partnered  with  major  online  consumer  portals  and  other  industry 
leaders  to  develop  the  Trusted  Download  Program,  a  standards  and  a  certification 
program for downloadable consumer desktop applications. 

Program objectives: 
• Empower consumers to make informed decisions. 
• Establish  the  leading  industry-wide  standards  for  developers  of  downloadable 

applications. 

marketers. 

• Identify  and  elevate  trustworthy  consumer  applications  for  distributors  and 

• Protect the valued brands of online advertisers by enabling them to know which 

applications are trustworthy and which are not. 

The  Trusted  Download  Program  certification  combines  strict  standards,  thorough 
review,  ongoing  monitoring,  enforcement  mechanisms  and  powerful  market  incen-
tives. 

The  Program  elevates  those  applications  that  meet  the  certification  requirements 
through a whitelist, thereby providing consumer portals and other businesses a tool 
to distinguish responsible software applications. For downloadable desktop software 
developers,  the  program  provides  guidance  on  responsible  behavior.  A  Trusted 
Download Seal at the point of download allows consumers to recognize applications 
that  provide  improved  disclosures,  more  explicit  control  mechanisms,  easier 
uninstall, and more respect for their personal information. 

Trusted  Download  Sponsors  and  Advisory  Committee  Members  are  CNET 
download.com,  Microsoft,  Yahoo!,  and  the  Center  for  Democracy  and  Technology 
(CDT). 

(49) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

50 

Incentives for Compliance 

TRUSTe  serves  a  ‘‘whitelist’’  of  certified  applications  to  advertisers,  distributors, 
consumer  portals  and  other  interested  parties.  In  a  market  where  the  conduct  of 
partners  can  be  as  important  as  the  conduct  of  your  own  organization,  businesses 
are turning to TRUSTe to help determine which applications they want to be affili-
ated with. The Program’s whitelist is regularly used to influence decisionmaking in 
advertising  buys,  bundling  and  distribution  opportunities,  and  to  resolve  errant 
blacklistings. 

The  whitelist,  provides  an  economic  incentive  for  software  providers  to  achieve 
and  maintain  certification.  In  addition,  the  Trusted  Download  Seal  at  the  point  of 
download  reassures  consumers  and  increases  downloads,  providing  a  direct  eco-
nomic benefit to software developers. 
Scope 

While there are exceptions, the program is aimed at consumer downloadable desk-
top  software  applications.  It  does  not  cover  software  downloaded  exclusively  to 
handheld  devices  (i.e.,  mobile  phones).  While  there  are  additional  specific  require-
ments  for  advertising  and  tracking  software,  many  requirements  also  apply  to  all 
consumer  downloadable  applications.  Advertising  and  tracking  software  providers 
will likely need to significantly change current practices to earn certification. In ad-
dition, the program will provide standards for all applications to offer consumers en-
hanced disclosures, easier uninstall and other benefits. 
Certification 

Application  providers  submit  to  TRUSTe  a  contract  and  a  completed  question-
naire  including  questions  about  how  the  application  is  distributed.  TRUSTe  con-
ducts  a  thorough  evaluation  of  the  downloadable  applications  against  the  program 
standards  to  ensure  they  do  not  involve  activities  that  are  prohibited  by  the  Pro-
gram. Additional compliance assurance is being provided by AppLabs, a third party 
software  testing  lab  that  will  evaluate  the  application’s  relay  of  information  and 
interaction with the recipient’s operating system. 
Key Program Elements 

The  Program  outlines  certain  requirements  for  all  software  and  specifies  addi-
tional  requirements  for  advertising  and  tracking  software.  This  approach  ensures 
that the Program addresses practices that historically have created consumer confu-
sion  and  anxiety.  However,  all  software  must  meet  specific  program  requirements 
and  is  tested  for  monitoring,  relays,  and  behaviors  that  have  historically  been  con-
sidered deceptive. 
Notice 

The Program imposes a layered approach, via a primary notice and reference no-
tices  such  as  the  End  User  License  Agreement,  EULA,  and  the  privacy  statement. 
The  primary  notice  must  explain  functionalities  that  impact  the  consumer  experi-
ence  and  must  be  unavoidable,  to  ensure  that  users  understand  what  they  are 
downloading.  EULAs  and  ‘‘opt-out’’  mechanisms  are  insufficient  for  providing  such 
notice  or  obtaining  consent.  For  example,  unavoidable  notice  of  any  material 
changes to certain specified consumer settings is required for ail software. Further, 
all  ads  delivered  in  certified  advertising  software  must  be  labeled,  and  unavoidable 
notice of certain ad features must be provided. 
Consent to Install is Required 

Consumers must be offered notice and an opportunity to consent that is described 
in plain language and is as prominently displayed as the option to not install, Con-
sent to install may not be obtained with a pre-selected option. 
Easy Uninstall 

Instructions  for  uninstallation  must  be  easy  to  find  and  easy  to  understand,  and 
methods  for  uninstalling  must  be  available  in  places  where  consumers  are  accus-
tomed  to  finding  them,  such  as  the  Add/Remove  Programs  feature  in  the  Windows 
Control Panel, or the Add-On management menus in browsers for browser Add-Ons. 
Uninstallation  must  remove  all  software  associated  with  the  particular  application 
being uninstalled (with a few specific exceptions carved out in the Program Require-
ments),  and  cannot  be  contingent  on  a  consumer’s  providing  Personally  Identifiable 
Information, unless that information is required for account verification. 
Prohibited Activities 

No  company  can  have  an  application  certified  if  any  of  its  applications  exhibits 

a behavior listed in the Program’s Prohibited Activities section. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

51 

Examples of prohibited activities include: 
• Taking control of a consumer’s computer. 
• Modifying  security  or  other  settings  of  the  computer  to  cause  damage  or  harm. 
• Spyware tactics for surveillance and tracking, such as keystroke logging. 
• Preventing reasonable efforts to block installation or to uninstall. 
• Allowing a certified application to be bundled with any application currently en-

gaging in any of the prohibited activities. 

Special Protections for Children 

Companies  in  the  Program  must  prevent  the  distribution  of  their  advertising  or 
tracking software on children’s websites—including by prohibiting their distribution 
partners and affiliates from such distribution. 
Affiliate Controls 

Since  many  advertising  and  tracking  applications  are  distributed  through  second 
and  third-party  affiliates  and/or  bundled  with  other  programs;  relationships  must 
be  disclosed  in  attestations.  Certified  software  is  subject  to  random  testing  on  in-
stances found wherever an individual might encounter them. 
Prior Behavior 

The Program includes provisional certification for companies that have previously 
engaged  in  prohibited  activities  or  other  behaviors  that  call  into  question  the  Par-
ticipant’s ability to comply with the Program Requirements on an ongoing basis. In 
order  to  be  certified,  these  companies  will  be  subject  to  additional  oversight  includ-
ing enhanced monitoring and a requirement to go back to all users who downloaded 
an  uncertified  version  of  the  software  application  and  obtain  their  opt-in  consent. 
Segregated Ad Inventory 

Companies  in  the  Program  must  maintain  segregated  ad  inventory  in  certified 
versus  uncertified  applications.  The  application  provider  must  be  able  to  serve  ads 
to users from whom consent was obtained versus users from whom consent has not 
been acceptably obtained. 
Monitoring 

Certified  applications  are  monitored  by  TRUSTe  for  ongoing  compliance  with  the 
Program’s  strict  standards.  A  company  risks  termination  from  the  program  if  any 
one of its certified applications violates the standards. 
Enforcement 

If monitoring uncovers suspected non-compliance, an application, or in some cases 
all  of  a  company’s  applications,  will  be  subjected  to  enforcement  procedures  by 
TRUSTe.  Depending  on  severity  and  the  results  of  a  TRUSTe  investigation,  an  ap-
plication may be temporarily suspended or permanently removed from the program 
whitelist.  In  certain  cases,  a  company  or  application  may  be  terminated  from  the 
Program and the fact of its termination made public. 

JOHN P. TOMASZEWSKI, Esq. 

Vice President, Legal, Policy & Compliance. 

I  have  attached  a  copy * of  the  Trusted  Download  Program  certification  require-
ments to this letter and request that it also be included in the Committee’s spyware 
hearing record. 

TRUSTe  appreciates  your  work  in  this  area  and  would  be  pleased  to  serve  as  a 
resource  should  you  or  your  staff  have  any  questions.  If  you  have  any  questions, 
please do not hesitate to contact me. 

Sincerely, 

* This document is retained in the Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

52 

AMERICANS FOR FAIR ELECTRONIC COMMERCE TRANSACTIONS (AFFECT) 

June 25, 2008 

Hon. MARK PRYOR, 
U.S. Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 

RE: FOLLOW-UP COMMENTS FOR THE RECORD OF THE HEARING ON THE ‘‘IMPACT 
AND POLICY IMPLICATIONS OF SPYWARE ON CONSUMERS AND BUSINESSES’’ 

Dear Senator Pryor: 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  submit  additional  comments  on  behalf  of  AF-
FECT  (Americans  for  Fair  Electronic  Commerce  Transactions)  on  the  impact  and 
policy implications of spyware on consumers and businesses and on the Counter Spy 
Act (S. 1625). 

As  I  stated  in  my  testimony  during  the  June  11,  2008  hearing,  AFFECT  is  con-
cerned about the exception section of the Counter Spy Act, Section 6(a). That section 
says  that  the  list  of  prohibited  acts  in  Sections  3,  4,  and  5  of  the  bill  ‘‘do  not  apply 
to  any  monitoring  of  or  interaction  with,  a  subscriber’s  Internet  or  other  network 
connection  or  service,  or  a  protected  computer,  by  or  at  the  direction  of  a  tele-
communications  carrier,  cable  operator,  computer  hardware  arc  or  software  pro-
vider,  financial  institution  or  provider  of  information  services  or  interactive  com-
puter service . . .’’ 

These  entities  have  immunity  under  the  Counter  Spy  Act  when  what  they’re 
doing  is  done  for  a  number  of  innocuous-sounding  purposes.  The  first  nine  of  these 
liability  exemptions  include  network  or  computer  security,  diagnostics,  technical 
support,  repair,  network  management,  authorized  updates  of  software  or  system 
firmware, authorized remote system management, authorized provision of protection 
for  users  of  the  computer  from  objectionable  content,  and  authorized  scanning  for 
computer software used in violation of sections 3, 4, or 5 for removal by an author-
ized user. 

As I said at the hearing, AFFECT sees no legitimate reason why any of these nine 
activities  would  need  an  exemption  from  the  actions  prohibited  by  the  bill  because: 
• none of them justifies an outside entity in installing zombies, engaging in mod-
ern hijacking for the purpose of causing damage to the computer or causing the 
authorized  user  to  incur  unauthorized  financial  charges,  causing  a  denial  of 
service  attack  for  the  purpose  of  causing  damage,  causing  endless  loop  pop-up 
ads (Section 3(1)); 
• none of them justifies an outside entity in modifying an authorized user’s secu-
rity  settings  for  the  purpose  of  stealing  the  user’s  sensitive  personal  informa-
tion,  or  disabling  security  settings  for  the  purpose  of  causing  damage  to  the 
computer or another computer, or through unfair or deceptive means modifying 
browser settings (Section 3(2)); 
• none  of  them  justifies,  without  authorization,  an  outside  entity  in  preventing  a 
user’s reasonable efforts to block installation, to disable, or to uninstall software 
by unfair or deceptive means (Section 3(3)); 
• none  of  them  justifies  an  outsider  in  installing  software  that  collects  sensitive 
personal  information  from  an  authorized  computer  user  without  that  user’s  in-
formed  consent,  logs  keystrokes,  collects  and  correlates  personal  information 
with  a  history  of  websites  visited,  extracts  the  substantive  contents  of  files  or 
communications,  or  prevents  an  authorized  user  from  uninstalling  or  disabling 
software (Section 4); and, 
• none  of  them  justifies  an  outsider  in  installing  adware  that  conceals  its  oper-

ation (Section 5). 

An exemption from the prohibited activities listed in the bill is simply not needed 

to allow or protect any legitimate activity. 

AFFECT is particularly concerned about Subsection 6(a)(10). That tenth and final 
exemption would be granted when the otherwise prohibited acts are done for: ‘‘detec-
tion  or  prevention  of  the  unauthorized  use  of  software  fraudulent  or  other  illegal 
activities.’’  The  troubling  questions  raised  by  6(a)(10)  were  pointed  out  in  my  writ-
ten testimony, namely that the exemption would allow a software vendor to surrep-
titiously  download  code  onto  a  user’s  computer  and  freely  violate  their  privacy.  It 
would  allow  the  provider  to  set  itself  up  as  an  ad  hoc  police  force  to  conduct 
warrantless  searches  and  to  act  as  judge  and  jury  to  conduct  unilateral  seizures. 
Private  entities  do  not  and  should  not  have  the  right  to  conduct  law  enforcement 
activities. 

More  troubling  is  the  fact  that  the  language  of  Subsection  6(a)(10)  would  effec-
tively  allow  a  software  provider  to  unilaterally  decide  to  remotely  shut  down  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

53 

user’s computer or Internet or other network connection or service. But whether the 
use of a particular software is ‘‘unauthorized,’’ ‘‘fraudulent,’’ or ‘‘illegal’’ is often sub-
ject  to  legitimate  dispute  and  merits  some  judicial  consideration  before  a  provider 
is allowed to unilaterally employ a drastic remedy like remote disablement. 

In  his  written  testimony,  Vincent  Weafer,  the  Symantec  vice  president  who  was 
representing  the  Business  Software  Alliance  (BSA)  at  the  hearing,  praised  Section 
6(a)(10)  as  ‘‘essential  to  our  industry’s  ability  to  protect  our  products  against  theft. 
Software piracy results in almost $50 billion in losses to the software industry each 
year,  including  more  than  $8  billion  in  the  U.S.  alone.  Given  these  massive  losses, 
it  is  absolutely  critical  that  companies  that  engage  in  otherwise  lawful  conduct  to 
detect or prevent piracy or other unlawful acts are not unwittingly subject to liabil-
ity under anti-spyware laws.’’ 

Contrary to Mr. Wearer’s statement, exemption from the prohibited actions listed 
in  the  bill  is  neither  essential  to  a  software  vendor’s  legitimate  efforts  to  protect 
against piracy, nor is it essential to protect legitimate activities from liability under 
the bill. Software vendors have a variety of legal remedies to attack piracy. If a soft-
ware  contract,  for  example,  an  End  User  License  Agreement  (EULA),  is  breached, 
the vendor would have the right to sue and collect damages. It could seek an injunc-
tion against further use. In addition, statutes, like the U.S. Copyright Act, or inter-
national  copyright  laws,  may  grant  other  rights  and  remedies,  including  access  to 
Federal court and statutory damages, perhaps even enforcement by the FBI. In ad-
dition, the BSA itself is a well-known and very effective enforcement arm of the soft-
ware industry. 

Further,  there  is  no  reason  the  software  industry  can’t  employ  technological  ap-
proaches  to  combating  piracy  without  remotely  accessing  software  resident  on  the 
user’s  computer  and  unilaterally  shutting  it  down.  For  example,  the  agreement  be-
tween  the  software  vendor  and  the  user  could  clearly  provide  for  a  limited  period 
of  use  and  a  ‘‘time  bomb’’  built  into  the  software  that  disables  its  operation  at  the 
expiration of the named period of time. The parties then could agree that the period 
of  limited  use  could  be  renewed  by  the  user  obtaining  a  ‘‘key’’  from  the  vendor  or 
sending a ‘‘validation’’ to continue the use. 

It  is  not  necessary  to  reach  into  a  user’s  computer,  to  poll  the  machine,  extract 
data, and phone home. It is not necessary to build in a ‘‘backdoor’’ which will make 
the  computer  vulnerable  to  exploitation  by  spies,  hackers,  saboteurs,  or  terrorists. 
And,  there  is  no  legitimate  reason  why  a  software  vendor,  network  provider,  or 
other  outside  entity  should  be  allowed  to  unilaterally  decide  to  remotely  shut  down 
the  user’s  computer  or  Internet  or  other  network  connection  or  service.  At  a  min-
imum, a software vendor who thinks it has not been paid, should be required to give 
notice, an opportunity to cure, and obtain a court order before employing remote dis-
ablement. 

The  Business  Software  Alliance  appears  to  want  to  use  Section  6  of  your  bill  to 
gain  the  approval  of  policymakers  for  their  use  of  electronic  self-help.  The  fact  of 
the  matter  is  that  this  is  an  anti-spyware  bill,  not  a  bill  designed  to  address  tools 
for dealing with piracy. 

During  the  hearing  on  June  11,  you  specifically  asked  for  suggestions  about  how 
to  define  spyware.  AFFECT  offered  the  following  definition:  Spyware  is  computer 
software  that  is  surreptitiously  installed  on  a  computer  that  allows  an  outsider  to 
intercept or take partial control over the user’s interaction with the computer, with-
out the user’s informed consent. We believe this definition is broad enough to cover 
technologies that arc deployed without appropriate user consent or are implemented 
in ways that impair user control over material changes that affect their experience, 
privacy, or system security; their use of their system resources, including what soft-
ware  is  installed  on  their  computers;  and  the  collection,  use,  and  distribution  of 
their  personal  or  other  sensitive  information.  We  also  believe  it  should  cover  all  of 
the prohibited behaviors currently listed in the bill. 

AFFECT  also  sees  the  merit  in  the  suggestions  of  spyware  expert  Ben  Edelman, 
who  advocated  for  a  simplification  of  the  approach  of  S.  1625  that  would  focus  on 
increasing  the  penalties  such  as  a  treble  fine  in  FTC  actions.  That  approach  was 
also expressed by the FTC in its testimony. 

Finally,  I  want  to  express  AFFECT’s  support  for  the  three  key  principles  ex-
pressed by Ms. Eileen Harrington, Deputy Director of the Bureau of Consumer Pro-
tection  of  the  FTC,  in  her  written  and  oral  statements:  (1)  a  consumer’s  computer 
belongs to him or her, not to the software distributor, and it must be the consumer’s 
choice whether or not to install software; (2) burying in an End User License Agree-
ment (EULA) material disclosures necessary to correct an otherwise misleading im-
pression should not be sufficient to allow a spyware purveyor to escape liability; and 
(3)  a  consumer  should  be  able  to  uninstall  or  disable  any  program  he  or  she  does 
not want on a computer. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

54 

AFFECT  has  long  favored  a  competitive  and  fair  marketplace.  A  cornerstone  of 
AFFECT’s efforts was the creation of ‘‘12 Principles for Fair Commerce in Software 
and Other Digital Products’’ (http://www.ucita.com/pdf/AFFECTbrochure2-05.pdf). 
Two of those key principles are that: (1) customers are entitled to control their own 
computer  systems;  and  (2)  customers  arc  entitled  to  control  their  own  data.  We  be-
lieve these two principles are consistent with the three expressed by Ms. Harrington 
and should guide the Committee and the Congress in shaping its approach to deal-
ing with the insidious problem of spyware. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  the  opportunity  to  submit  these  additional  comments 
for the hearing record. AFFECT remains willing and interested in working with the 
Committee on S. 1625 and will be glad to be of whatever help we can. 

Sincerely, 

ARTHUR A. BUTLER, 

Attorney, Ater Wynne LLP. 

AMERICANS FOR FAIR ELECTRONIC COMMERCE TRANSACTIONS (AFFECT) CONCERNS 

WITH S. 1625, SECTION 6(A)(10) 

Americans for Fair Electronic Commerce Transactions (AFFECT) is a national co-
alition of consumers, retail and manufacturing businesses, insurance institutions, fi-
nancial institutions, technology professionals and librarians committed to promoting 
the growth of fair and competitive commerce in software and other digital products. 
S. 1625 (Pryor), introduced in June 2007, would protect against the unauthorized 
installation  of  software  that  is  used  to  take  control  of  a  computer  in  order  to  cause 
damage,  collect  personal  information  without  consent,  or  otherwise  enable  identity 
theft. 

AFFECT strongly supports S. 1625’s purpose to curb the use of harmful spyware. 
However, it has great concerns with S. 1625 (6), the exception section, which is over-
ly  broad  and  could  be  construed  to  protect  wrongful  acts  that  can  result  in  great 
harm  to  computer  users—which  is  in  direct  opposition  to  the  purpose  of  S.  1625. 
AFFECT strongly recommends that the exception provision of S. 1625 should only 
limit  liability  for  interaction  with  a  network,  service,  or  computer  that  is  under-
taken  to  detect  or  prevent  fraudulent  or  other  illegal  activities  as  prohibited  by  the 
act  itself.  Therefore,  AFFECT  proposes  that  Section  6(a)(10)  of  the  bill  be  amended 
as follows: 

(10) detection or prevention of fraudulent or other illegal activities as prohibited 
by this Act. 

Subsection 6(a)(10), as it is currently written, would permit a provider to monitor 
or  interact  with  an  individual’s  computer  or  Internet  or  other  network  connection 
or  service  for  the  ‘‘detection  or  prevention  of  the  unauthorized  use  of  software  for 
fraudulent  or  other  illegal  activities.’’  This  would  allow  the  provider  to  unilaterally 
decide to remotely shut down the user’s computer or Internet or other network con-
nection  or  service.  But  whether  the  use  of  a  particular  software  is  ‘‘unauthorized,’’ 
‘‘fraudulent,’’ or ‘‘illegal’’ is often subject to legitimate dispute and merits some judi-
cial consideration before a provider is allowed to unilaterally employ a drastic rem-
edy like remote disablement. 

Permitting  unilateral  remote  disablement  is  bad  public  policy.  It  allows  the  pro-
vider  to  set  itself  up  as  an  ad  hoc  police  force  to  conduct  warrantless  searches  and 
to  act  as  judge  and  jury  to  conduct  unilateral  seizures  in  the  name  of  protecting 
against  piracy,  fraud,  or  other  illegal  activities.  Private  entities  do  not  and  should 
not have the right to conduct law enforcement activities. 

Also, remote disablement can cause great harm to the owner who depends on ac-

cess to and use of that computer, connection or service. 

• For example, the shutdown of an owner’s system can cause great harm to: 

» a teacher using a computer to prepare for classroom lectures; 
» an insurer depending on a computer system to pay claims; 
» a  manufacturer  trying  to  deliver  its  products  to  meet  contractual  commit-

ments; or 

» the public’s access to online library materials. 

• In  reaching  into  an  individual’s  computer  remotely  to  disable  software  residing 
on his computer, the provider may not only violate privacy rights, but also dam-
age his other files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

55 

• The monitoring and remote disablement of software on an owner’s computer by 
a  provider  may  compromise  private  information  of  employees,  confidential  and 
proprietary  information  of  the  owner,  and,  in  some  cases,  national  security  in-
formation. 
• The code used to remotely enter a computer and disable the software or the net-
work  connection  (often  called  ‘‘black  holes’’)  make  the  computer  vulnerable  to 
security breaches by hackers and terrorists. When there is an opportunity to ne-
gotiate, many enterprises, including governmental entities, will insist that their 
software license agreements contain a warranty prohibiting any ‘‘self-help code’’ 
or other software routing designed to disable a computer program automatically 
or  that  is  under  the  positive  control  of  a  person  other  than  the  licensee  of  the 
software.  Unfortunately,  with  mass  market  licenses  individual  consumers  and 
businesses are not able to negotiate for a ‘‘no self-help code.’’ 

It  is  important  to  recognize  that  these  harms  that  can  result  from  permitting  re-
mote  disablement  can  be  significantly  larger  than  the  harm  to  a  software  vendor 
in not getting a license fee. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DAVID VITTER TO 

EILEEN HARRINGTON 1 

Question  1.  Who  do  you  think  would  define  ‘‘objectionable’’  in  S.  1625  section 

6(a)(8), and what does that term mean? 

Answer.  The  term  ‘‘objectionable  content’’  is  left  undefined  by  the  Counter  Spy 
Act,  S.  1625.  Absent  a  clear  definition  in  the  bill,  ‘‘objectionable  content’’  will  need 
to be interpreted by the courts. As drafted, however, ‘‘objectionable content’’ is suffi-
ciently  broad  that  it  might  include  content  or  software  (such  as  advertising  soft-
ware, toolbars, etc.) about whose value reasonable people may disagree. Accordingly, 
a covered party could have considerable discretion under the bill to identify and re-
move  software  as  ‘‘objectionable’’  without  giving  specific  notice  to,  and  perhaps 
against the intentions of, the consumer. 

Question 2. Under section 6(a)(9) of S. 1625, would a consumer’s purchase and use 
of a computer with pre-loaded operating system and anti-spyware software be suffi-
cient ‘‘authorization’’ to allow some software to remove or disable other software on 
the computer without notifying the computer user or obtaining her consent? 

Answer.  The  Commission  and  the  courts  would  need  to  approach  scenarios  like 
the one posed by Question 2 on a case-by-case basis, weighing the nature of the soft-
ware  and  its  potential  for  harm  against  the  nature  and  timing  of  notice  and  con-
sent—if any—provided. In the case of pre-installed anti-spyware software, we would 
need  to  know  how  much  notice  the  consumer  is  given  regarding  the  existence  and 
function  of  the  software,  and  whether  the  consumer  is  given  notice  before  the  anti- 
spyware  software  removes  or  disables  other  software  on  the  computer.  If  any  pre- 
installed software caused the type of harms outlined in sections 3, 4, or 5 of S. 1625, 
it is doubtful that the Commission would deem the mere acts of buying and turning 
on a computer to be sufficient ‘‘authorization.’’ 

Linking exemptions and immunity in section 6(a) to particular functions that are 
purportedly ‘‘authorized’’ poses the risk of creating a safe harbor based on unknow-
ing  authorization.  For  example,  a  software  provider,  an  information  services  pro-
vider,  or  an  ISP  might  argue  that  a  provision  buried  deep  in  an  End  User  License 
Agreement  or  privacy  policy  provides  sufficient  authorization  for  much  of  the  con-
duct prohibited by the bill. 

Question 3. Should we be careful when providing (broad) exemptions or immunity 
for software removal, given the FTC actions against companies that might represent 
their software as legitimate ‘‘anti-spyware’’ in order to scam consumers? 

Answer.  Yes.  I  share  Senator  Vitter’s  concern  that  there  is  a  need  for  caution  in 
providing  broad  exemptions  and  immunity  for  software  removal  when  addressing 
the problems of spyware. If not carefully drafted, these broad exemptions can create 
safe  harbor  loopholes  that  can  be  exploited  by  clever  spyware  and  malware  pur-
veyors.  Under  the  bill  as  drafted,  virtually  any  ‘‘software  provider’’  or  ‘‘provider  of 
information services’’ who can muster some plausible pretense of the list of the enu-
merated services will raise the exemption as a defense to enforcement. 

Take  the  example  of  a  purveyor  of  what  has  been  termed  ‘‘rogue  anti-spyware’’ 
software. Rogue anti-spyware software is usually sold via deceptive tactics. A broad 

1 As  with  my  responses  to  the  Committee’s  questions  at  the  hearing,  these  answers  present 
my personal views and do not necessarily represent the views of the Federal Trade Commission 
or of any Commissioner. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

56 

‘‘anti-spyware’’  exemption  may  shield  the  rogue  anti-spyware  sellers  from  liability 
for  their  deceptive  tactics.  Moreover,  it  could  potentially  permit  the  seller  to 
download  other  harmful  software,  such  as  a  keylogger,  if  that  seller  can  convince 
a  court  that  the  other  harmful  software  in  any  way  could  be  used  to  provide  func-
tions enumerated by sections 6(a)(1) through (10). 

If  the  main  purpose  of  including  section  6(a)  is  to  limit  liability  among  and  be-
tween civil litigants regarding questions about what is ‘‘authorized,’’ or what is ‘‘ob-
jectionable’’  (e.g.,  where  an  anti-spyware  company  is  sued  by  a  software  provider 
whose  product  is  deemed  objectionable),  it  is  misplaced  because  S.  1625  does  not 
provide  a  private  right  of  action.  Accordingly,  such  broad  exemptions  from  law  en-
forcement  in  this  legislation  are  unnecessary.  At  bottom,  the  broad  scope  of  section 
6(a)’s  limitations  on  liability—both  in  terms  of  the  number  of  exempted  parties  as 
well  as  the  breadth  of  the  exempted  conduct—may  make  the  FTC’s  job  more  chal-
lenging  and  potentially  do  more  harm  than  good  in  terms  of  effective  spyware  law 
enforcement. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:58 Oct 23, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\76328.TXT JACKIE

